nmental studies, won $26,000 in federal grants to develop an "ecologically self-sufficient" house, heated by solar energy and powered by a windmill. Students built the structure using materials recycled from an old barn and shed. 
George Hall, the boys' dormitory, was gutted in a fire on April 9, 1975. About 25 students were housed in the building, but most were at dinner in the cafeteria, and there were no deaths or injuries. 
The cost of operating a small private school proved more than the order could bear, and the school closed in 1982. After this, the property went through a succession of owners and schemes, suffering from neglect and vandalism. In 2008 it was purchased by Green Bay-based United Ministries, which has been converting the campus for use as a Christian youth center. 
Although all students were required to take theology and philosophy classes, the school and curriculum were nonsectarian, and welcomed people of all faiths. 
Enrollment in 1975 was about 160 students, about one third hailing from the Milwaukee metropolitan area, another 30 from the St. Nazianz area, and the remainder from other parts of eastern Wisconsin; the average classroom size was 7.4. About 30 of the students were African-American, the rest white. 
JFK Prep competed in the Wisconsin Independent Schools Athletic Association (dissolved in 2000). The team was originally called the "Royals" with the colors blue and white, but after they acquired uniforms from another school, they changed colors to black and gold and the team name to the "Moors." 
Athletics was otherwise not a major part of the student experience; Marty Crowe once remarked that it was "the most non-jock school in the state." 
The former school gymnasium was restored in April 2006. Jim and Linda Frasch of United Ministries acquired the property in 2008 and have been renovating other buildings for use as a summer and winter camp for children. 
The gymnasium houses a flea market to raise funds for the restoration. Additionally, the former football field, and several dormitories have been renovated, and a campground built near the lake. The church remains abandoned; however, a temporary roof has been installed which allows it to be open during the summer. 
He finished eighteenth at the 1984 European Indoor Championships fourteenth at the 1989 European Indoor Championships and won the bronze medal at the 1989 Jeux de la Francophonie. 
This biographical article about a French high jumper is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ilkka Villi (born 4 August 1975) is a Finnish actor and writer, best known internationally for his work in the video game Alan Wake as well as the crime drama series Bordertown. He has played a variety of roles in theatre, television, and film. 
Villi plays one half of the titular character in the Alan Wake video game franchise. In the role, Villi voices the character during live action sequences and also provides the model, motion capture, and facial expression capture for Wake. 
In 2016, Villi was cast as one of the lead police investigators in the crime drama series Bordertown, which was picked up by streaming service Netflix. 
Hernando Navarrete (born 28 April 1916) was a Colombian long-distance runner. He competed in the men's 5000 metres at the 1936 Summer Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to Colombian athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The wildlife refuge contains a Wild Animal Screening Centre (CETAS) and an Animal Rescue Service. These help wild animals that are threatened by risks such as habitat loss, domestic abuse, accidents and other problems. A veterinarian examines the animal and treats it if necessary.  Where practical it is restored to nature. Otherwise it may be allocated to a zoo or other institution. The refuge is not open to the public. 
Platycythara electra is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Mangeliidae. 
Belinuridae is an extinct family of arthropods belonging to the order Xiphosura. The family consists of several genera. 
"Terra Incognita" is the 20th episode of the fourth season of the American television drama series Person of Interest. It is the 88th overall episode of the series and is written by producer Erik Mountain and supervising producer Melissa Scrivner Love and directed by Alrick Riley. It aired on CBS in the United States and on CTV in Canada on April 14, 2015. 
Reese (Jim Caviezel) is notified by Fusco (Kevin Chapman) of the death of two Brotherhood members at the hand of an Elias ally. Finch (Michael Emerson) interrupts to announce their new number: Chase Patterson, who has been suspected of murdering his family and only avoided charges when he hid on Paris. Finch and Fusco decide to interrogate Elias' ally with the help of Root (Amy Acker) while Reese decides to investigate Chase's case and discovers that Carter investigated the case. 
With Live +7 DVR factored in, the episode was watched by 12.13 million viewers with a 2.2 in the 18-49 demographics. 
Alexa Planje of The A.V. Club gave the episode an "A" grade and wrote, "Reese's hallucinations of Carter are used to explore his psychology, a psychology that resembles that of a troubled superhero, a narrative that has been repeated time and time again, and is currently keeping The CW in business. 'Terra Incognita' recycles these conventions, but it does so with purpose." 
Sean McKenna of TV Fanatic gave the episode a 4.5 star rating out of 5 and wrote "Person of Interest does such a good job of trying to make everything it does carry some sort of purpose, and Carter's return was integral for Reese. You really felt something in such a sincere moment as Reese tearing up or Carter holding his hand." 
Hunter Bishop of TV Overmind wrote "This is probably my favorite Person of Interest episode ever, and that is saying something." 
This article about a Democratic Party member of the Wisconsin State Assembly is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The substitution principle in sustainability is the maxim that processes, services and products should, wherever possible, be replaced with alternatives which have a lower impact on the environment. An example of a strong, hazard-based interpretation of the principle in application to chemicals is: "that hazardous chemicals should be systematically substituted by less hazardous alternatives or preferably alternatives for which no hazards can be identified". 
The principle has historically been promoted by environmental groups. The concept is becoming increasingly mainstream, being a key concept in green chemistry and a central element of EU REACH regulation. Critics of the principle claim it is very difficult to implement in reality, especially in terms of legislation.[citation needed] 
Nonetheless, the concept is an important one and a key driver behind identifying Substances of Very High Concern in REACH and the development of hazardous substance lists such as the SIN List and the ETUC Trade Union Priority List. EU-funded projects such as SubsPort are under development to aid the identification and development of safer substitutes for hazardous chemicals. 
The Baytown Outlaws was released in the UK on both DVD and Blu-ray Disc on 26 December 2012 through Universal Pictures UK. The release includes a short behind the scenes documentary with cast and crew as well as the film's trailers. 
The film opened to mixed reviews.  The sense was that the movie was made to capture the essence of a Robert Rodriguez or Quentin Tarrantino styled movie, "but not as good," and "it has neither the stamina nor the wit to go the distance." Yet, it was deemed entertaining nonetheless. On review aggregator website Rotten Tomatoes, the film holds an approval rating of 22% based on 27 reviews, with an average rating of 4.13/10. 
He was a lineal descendant of John McCulloch, who was born in Kirkcudbright, Scotland in April 1747 and came to America before the Revolutionary War in 1759 (and later dropped the final C from his last name).  His paternal uncle was the civil engineer and professor Richard Sears McCulloh and his paternal grandfather was James W. McCulloh, Speaker of the Maryland House of Delegates. 
In 1885, McCulloh began working as a railroad clerk with the West Shore Railroad.  By 1890, he was assistant to the Superintendent of Telephone and Signals.  From 1890 to 1893, he studied at the joint operating headquarters of the West Shore Railroad and the Western Union Telegraph Company in Weehawken, New Jersey. 
McCulloh also served as a director of the National Surety Company, the Empire City Subway Company, the Holmes Electric Protective Company as a trustee of the Bowery Savings Bank, and served as vice-president of the New York State Chamber of Commerce.  He also served as a member of the "advisory committee of the American Express branch of the Chase National Bank of New York City." 
Gordon was a member of the American Yacht Club and the Apawamis Club, both in Rye (where he had been a resident since 1898 and was a governor and founder of the Manursing Island Club), and the Saint Andrew's Society of the State of New York where he served as second vice-president, first vice-president and president of the Society from 1932 to 1934. 
McCulloh died at Warriston, his residence, 890 Forest Avenue in Rye, on July 5, 1957. He was buried at Greenwood Union Cemetery in Rye. 
The Amanda's pennant (Celithemis amanda) is a species of dragonfly in the family Libellulidae. It is native to the southeastern United States. 
This species is 24 to 31 millimeters long with a hindwing 21 to 27 millimeters long. The face is yellow, darkening to brown or red in older male specimens. The thorax is yellow, darkening to brown. The abdomen is dark brown to black with a few dorsal spots and yellow or red markings. The bases of the hindwings are amber or brown with black stripes. 
Anadara notabilis, or the eared ark clam, is a clam in the family Arcidae. It can be found in Caribbean waters, ranging from Florida to Bermuda and Brazil. 
Adults have been recorded on wing from June to July and again from September to October. The larvae feed on various low-growing plants. 
Following his retirement from professional ice hockey, he spent 18 years as head coach of various teams at Princeton University. Quackenbush coached men's golf, and both the men's and women's ice hockey teams, at various times. He won eight Ivy League Championships with the men's golf team and three with the women's ice hockey team. 
Following his NHL career, Quackenbush worked as a manufacturer's agent while attending night school at Northeastern University in Boston, Massachusetts. At Northeastern, he earned an Associate's degree in engineering. Quackenbush also became an assistant coach at Northeastern. 
He married Joan Kalloch and the couple had three sons, Bruce, Scott and Todd. At the time of his death, Quackenbush also had seven grandchildren. He died of pneumonia and complications from Alzheimer's disease on September 12, 1999, at Chandler Hall Hospice in Newtown, Pennsylvania, at the age of 77. 
Quackenbush was an offensive defenceman who carried the puck up the ice, making use of his stick handling, passing skills and ability to read the play. Over the course of his career, he was considered one of the elite rushing defenceman in the NHL. He was a solid checker, but relied more on positioning and discipline than physical play. This is evident by his low yearly average of penalty minutes and the fact that he was assessed only one major penalty throughout his NHL career. 
Defensively he made use of poke checks to take the puck from his opponents and excelled at getting to loose pucks and clearing them out of the defensive zone. He was adept at keeping opposing forwards from creating offence from behind the net. 
His next assignment was with 1st Marine Regiment, with which he sailed for Guantanamo Bay, Cuba. Keating was stationed at Cuba for four months and returned to United States in March 1919. He received an honorable discharge in April 1919 and was promoted to the rank of first lieutenant. 
Following his discharge, Keating worked in the printing and publishing business in Philadelphia, before he rejoined Marine Corps Reserve in August 1930 as first lieutenant. He was assigned to the reserve 1st Battalion, 21st Marine Regiment, and his assignments included intelligence officer, operations officer, executive officer and later also commanding officer. For his reserve service, Keating was decorated with the Reserve Good Conduct Medal with two stars. 
Keating was recalled to the active duty with the Marine Corps in November 1940 with the rank of major and assigned to the Marine Corps Recruit Depot Parris Island, South Carolina. He was transferred to Guantanamo Bay, Cuba, in January 1941 and was assigned to 1st Marine Division under the command of Major General Holland Smith. Major Keating was subsequently appointed executive officer of 1st Battalion, 11th Marine Regiment under Colonel Pedro del Valle. 
Colonel Keating was transferred back to the United States in October 1944 and assigned to Intelligence Section within Headquarters Marine Corps. He was first appointed Section executive officer and later succeeded Colonel Edmond J. Buckley as section director in December 1944. Keating remained in this capacity until December 1945. 
During July 1945, Keating was commissioned in the regular Marine Corps and was appointed director of the Fourth Reserve District Headquarters in Philadelphia. He was later transferred to Hawaii, where he assumed command of Camp Catlin, where was stationed the Headquarters, Fleet Marine Force, Pacific. Keating also served simultaneously as assistant chief of staff and intelligence officer of Fleet Marine Force, Pacific. 
Tamino-Amir Moharam Fouad (born 24 October 1996), known mononymously as Tamino, is a Belgian singer, musician and model. He is of Belgian, Egyptian and Lebanese origin. He is the grandson of renowned Egyptian singer and movie star Muharram Fouad. 
In November 2016, Tamino was invited by Belgian band Het Zesde Metaal to play a Radio 1 session. His first single, Habibi, made an impression and he was immediately picked up by Radio 1. 
In 2017, Tamino won a new musical talent competition at Studio Brussels. On 11 October 2017 he played in the Ancienne Belgique (Brussels) where he was nicknamed 'the Belgian Jeff Buckley'. He has also played at Palais 12 (Brussels) and during the   Flemish Music Industry Awards  and the Melkweg in Amsterdam. During the summer of 2017, he was featured in festivals across Belgium and the Netherlands such as Rock Werchter and Pukkelpop.   
In the summer of 2018 Tamino performed in festivals across Europe including Rock en Seine (Paris).  On 19 October 2018 Tamino released his first full-length album Amir (Arts & Crafts/Communion). At the end of October, he played three sold-out shows at the Ancienne Belgique as part of a European headline tour. On 8 November 2018 he performed in Iceland at Iceland Airwaves.  
Tamino was featured in Live Nation's Ones To Watch, which spoke of Tamino's voice saying his "falsetto surpasses 'face melting' and rises to a space of pureness that can only be described as divine."  He recently announced his first headline stadium show in November 2019 at the Lotto Arena. 
In 2019, Tamino played four shows at SXSW, his first ever North American shows where he shared the live version of his single "Indigo Night", with Radiohead bassist Colin Greenwood. On 10 May, Tamino released his live EP titled Live at Ancienne Belgique. Following SXSW he returned to Europe for a tour across the continent, including France, Great Britain, Germany, and the Sziget Festival in Budapest.  
On 19 October 2018 Tamino released his first full-length album Amir. Throughout the album, Tamino is joined by a collective of Arabic musicians based in Brussels called Nagham Zikrayat, an orchestra predominantly made up of professional musicians from the Middle East, most of whom are refugees that fled Iraq and Syria. 
The BBC hailed Amir as "The New Sound Of The Nile" an ode to Tamino's grandfather Muharram Fouad. The Independent included Amir in their top 10 albums of 2018. Tamino won the Anchor Award at Germany's 2018 Reeperbahn festival and has been nominated for 5 MIA Award's in Belgium. 
It is about a top field agent in the National Intelligence Service (NIS). After going missing a year ago, he returns to the organization to find an internal traitor who dropped him into the abyss. 
The series received a 15 billion won investment from MBC and Wavve for its production. It is labelled as "MBC's 60th anniversary special project". 
Nevin William Hayes, O.Carm. (February 17, 1922 - July 12, 1988) was an American Bishop of the Catholic Church. He served as the prelate of the Territorial Prelature of Sicuani in Peru from 1959 to 1970 and as an auxiliary bishop of the Archdiocese of Chicago from 1971 to 1988. 
Born in Chicago, Illinois, Nevin Hayes professed religious vows in the Order of the Brothers of Our Lady of Mount Carmel (Carmelites).   
On June 8, 1946, he was ordained a priest.  Hayes was appointed as the prelate of the Territorial Prelature of Sicuani on January 10, 1959, by Pope John XXIII. While remaining the Prelate of Sicuani, Pope Paul VI appointed him as the Titular Bishop of Nova Sinna.  He was consecrated a bishop by Chicago Auxiliary Bishop Cletus F. O'Donnell. The principal co-consecrators were Bishops Bernard Joseph Flanagan of Worcester and William G. Connare of Greensburg. 
Hayes resigned as prelate on November 7, 1970, and was appointed Auxiliary Bishop of Chicago on February 2, 1971. He served in that capacity until his death on July 12, 1988. 
The film had its North America premiere on 8 September 2007 as part of the 2007 Toronto International Film Festival and was released as King of the Hill by the Weinstein Company. 
Kid Sister is an album by The Time Jumpers. It earned the group a Grammy Award nomination for Best Americana Album and the title track won songwriter Vince Gill the award for Best American Roots Song. 
Jealous of his personal ascendancy over Louis XVI, he intrigued against Turgot, whose disgrace in 1776 was followed after six months of disorder by the appointment of Jacques Necker. In 1781 Maurepas deserted Necker as he had done Turgot, and he died at Versailles on 21 November 1781. 
Laser blended vision provides a range of benefits, particularly in comparison to traditional monivision solutions, such as bifocal glasses or contact lenses. 
The key advantage of Laser blended vision is the freedom from reading glasses.  Between 95% and 98% of Laser Blended Vision patients can read normal newsprint and between 80% to 96% can read the very smallest print on medicine bottle inserts (J1 or N4 print size)., 
There is a creation of intermediate and far-intermediate distance zone of binocular fusion, allowing the merging of images from each eye in the brain so no dissociation occurs between the eyes as with monovision.  Due to increased depth of field in both eyes, the distance vision is significantly better than would otherwise be anticipated. 
Laser Blended Vision is a shape profile modification to the standard excimer laser eye surgery method that has been performed tens of millions of times worldwide, mostly as LASIK. LASIK provides a very high level of safety particularly when employing femtosecond laser flap creation (IntraLASIK) and eye tracker technology that tracks eye position at a feedback frequency significantly higher than the repetition rate of the excimer laser pulses themselves. 
Unlike with monovision surgery where it is generally advised to perform a "monovision contact lens trial", Laser Blended Vision screening does not incorporate this as it would automatically exclude many suitable candidates from having the procedure. This is because a much larger proportion of people are suitable for Laser Blended Vision (>95%) than monovision (59-67%). 
During the surgery, a corneal flap is created, during which there can be a sensation of slight pressure on the eye during the procedure. 
A year after Laser Blended Vision LASIK, approximately 95% of patients achieved 20/20 vision at distance while able to read newsprint type size at near. 
The Portuguese Karting Championship is a kart racing series based in Portugal. It has taken place in every year since 2007. 
Novitzky was the lead special agent on the federal perjury trial of Barry Bonds.  The trial detailed the extensive history of Bonds' athletic performance enhancing drug use during his quest for the two most hallowed records in American professional sports, the single season and all-time home run marks.  
The bulk of the names provided in the Mitchell Report about doping in Major League Baseball were provided by Radomski and Brian MacNamee, a personal trainer for MLB pitcher Roger Clemens, both of whom Novitzky persuaded to talk to Senator Mitchell and his staff. 
In his book The Secret Race, former professional cyclist Tyler Hamilton wrote that Novitzky drove a "bulldozer" through the sport of cycling in uncovering details about the pervasive use of performance enhancing drugs. 
Novitzky has been criticized by certain defendants in steroid-related cases as being biased and unfair.  Novitzky, in multiple cross examinations, including during the federal perjury investigation of Roger Clemens, has been a credible government witness.   
Novitzky has appeared as a guest on The Joe Rogan Experience podcast on three separate occasions. It was Brendan Schaub who coined Novitzky's nickname, "The Golden Snitch." 
This biographical article relating to Spanish athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The novel opens with five friends out for a night of drinking and occasional brawling. All five are teachers at  a less-than-first-rate boarding school called Feliss Academy, situated in the town of Simka in Feliss Province (a future version of Simcoe, Ontario, the author's home town, and not far from the author's Waterloo current home). Future versions of other real locations, such as Niagara Falls, Port Dover, and the Port Dover mausoleum appear in the novel. 
These animals had a variety of body sizes, and could be as small as domestic cats (Tetraclaenodon and Ectocion) and as large as sheep (Phenacodus). The skull of phenacodontids is long and narrow, and equipped with a small braincase. 
The skeleton of phenacodontids show several primitive characteristics (the long and heavy tail for example) but also a number of advanced, Perissodactyla-like adaptations: Their long legs, for example, had five fingers, but the first finger showed a clear reduction, and in some forms (like Phenacodus) the fifth finger was reduced as well. 
Some species had tapir-like adaptations suggestive of the presence of a short proboscis or a strong prehensile lip. 
The teeth of phenacodontids, particularly in the latter forms, were quite specialized: The molars and premolars were equipped with low cusps that sometimes joined in ridges, similar to the condition found in some perissodactyls. Some forms, like Meniscotherium, had enlarged ridges. This adaptation is unusual for mammals as old as phenacodontids. Only a few other archaic mammals possessed teeth with similar structures, such as Pleuraspidotherium. 
The phenacodontids evolved in the middle Paleocene in North America. Early forms were usually small; Tetraclaenodon, for example, was the size of a fox. Later forms were much larger and invaded Europe, although they never became as plentiful as in North America. 
Towards the beginning of the Eocene these animals slowly disappeared from the fossil record. Only a few forms survived into the middle Eocene: the Phenacodus in Europe and North America, Almogaver in Europe and Ectocion in North America. 
An exception to the scarcity of Eocene phenacodontids is the dog-sized genus Meniscotherium, whose fossils are very abundant. 
Phenacodontids have classically been included in the large group Condylarthra, now considered polyphyletic. In particular, the genus Phenacodus is often illustrated as a typical example of a "condylarth", due to the remarkable abundance of fossil remains. 
Some phylogenetic analyses have revealed effective relationships between the various groups of "condylarths". One phylogeny suggests there may be close correlations between a clade containing proboscidates, hyracoids, perissodactyls and phenacodontids and another clade with Microhyus and the macroscelids The clade including these forms would be analogous to the clade Taxeopoda, proposed in 1998. 
According to more recent views, instead of a monophyletic clade, the Condylarths are better understood as an evolutionary grade that lead to the true ungulates. Indeed, recent phylogenetic studies confirm that phenacodonts were most closely related to modern odd-toed ungulates. 
The specialized teeth found in at least some phenacodontids seem to indicate a primary herbivorous lifestyle. The shape of the legs indicated that some phenacodontids (like Phenacodus) were swift runners. 
iTunes Live: London Festival '08 is an EP by the classically influenced rock band Elliot Minor.  This 6-track EP was released on July 11, 2008 by digital download on iTunes. It was recorded on July 6, 2008  at the KOKO, London. The download package is accompanied with a PDF digital booklet. 
How Green Was My Valley is a 1939 novel by Richard Llewellyn, narrated by Huw Morgan, the main character, about his Welsh family and the mining community in which they live. The author had claimed that he based the book on his own personal experiences but this was found to be untrue after his death; Llewellyn was English-born and spent little time in Wales, though he was of Welsh descent. Llewellyn gathered material for the novel from conversations with local mining families in Gilfach Goch. 
In the United States, Llewellyn won the National Book Award for favourite novel of 1940, voted by members of the American Booksellers Association. 
The novel is set in South Wales during the reign of Queen Victoria. It tells the story of the Morgans, a respectable mining family of the South Wales Valleys, through the eyes of one of the sons, Huw Morgan. 
Huw's academic ability sets him apart from his elder brothers and enables him to consider a future away from the dangerous coal mines. His five brothers and his father are miners. After his eldest brother, Ivor, is killed in a mining accident, Huw moves in with his sister-in-law, Bronwen, with whom he has always been in love. 
Huw's father is later killed in a mine explosion. After everyone Huw has known either dies or moves away, and the town is reduced to a contaminated shell, he decides to leave, and tells the story of his life just before going away. 
The Middle Brothers: These are Huw's young adult brothers.  Ianto goes to London to find work early in the book, but returns unhappily; Owen and Gwilym do the same later. 
The first edition was published in 1939 by Michael Joseph Ltd, London. The first printing included a limited edition run of 200, numbered and signed by Richard Llewellyn. The original print run also included a glossary covering Welsh words and terms at the end of the book.  
The novel was adapted as a Broadway musical, called A Time for Singing, which opened at the Broadway Theatre, New York, on 21 May 1966. The music was by John Morris; book and lyrics were by Gerald Freedman and John Morris. The production was directed by Mr. Freedman, and it starred Ivor Emmanuel, Tessie O'Shea, Shani Wallis, and Laurence Naismith. 
A stage version, adapted by Shaun McKenna was performed at the Theatre Royal in Northampton in 1990.  It marked the stage debut of Aled Jones as the teenage Huw. It was directed by Michael Napier Brown and designed by Ray Lett. 
In 2017, the book was also adapted as a short film for the use in the music video for the song Pleader by the band alt-J. The music video adaptation takes some liberties in retelling the story, with the catastrophic family deaths being caused by a landslide, which was caused by a German V2 rocket during WWII rather than a mine explosion. 
This article about a location in the Nome Census Area, Alaska is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
After a year long illness, Frances Tipton Hunter died on March 3, 1957 at the Philadelphia Jefferson Hospital. She is buried in Howard, Pennsylvania. 
School league tables and other education statistics are often criticised as an example of target culture. The use of number of GCSE examinations passed at grade C as a measure of educational attainment has led schools to focus specifically on getting students on the boundary between grades C and D to improve enough to get a C. 
In 2007, the Police Federation of England and Wales criticised the bureaucratisation of policing and argued that the use of targets increased the number of arrests made for petty offences. 
The failure and investigation of Stafford Hospital has been blamed on target culture by some. The Guardian report in an interview with an anonymous senior NHS doctor that Stafford Hospital "was a graphic illustration of the growing disconnect we see every day between a target-driven culture and the best interests of our patients". 
In 2008, the British Conservative Party politician Liam Fox, writing for the website ConservativeHome, lists Bristol Eye Centre as an example of the negative effects of a target culture: by trying to meet government targets to recruit more patients, they failed to make follow-up appointments with existing patients leading to some patients losing some or all of their eyesight. 
Baxter was born at Rickhurst (Rykhurst), Alfold, Surrey, on 20 October 1781. Early in life he settled in Lewes as a bookseller and printer. Among the earliest of Baxter's enterprises was the publication of a large quarto Bible, annotated by the Rev. John Styles, D.D., and illustrated with wood engravings. 
The Library of Agricultural and Horticultural Knowledge  had a very extensive circulation. It was published in 1830, with a second edition in 1832. George Sinclair wrote an article On the cultivation of the natural grasses for the publication. Other authors included John Ellman. 
Southern High School is a public secondary school located at 1 Jose Perez Leon Guerrero Drive in the village of Santa Rita, in the United States territory of Guam. The school, a part of the  Guam Public School System, opened in 1997 and serves grades 9 through 12. Southern High  serves the villages of Santa Rita, Agat, Asan-Maina, Inarajan, Merizo, Piti, Talofofo, Umatac, and Yona. 
Students may participate in interscholastic athletics if they are under the age of nineteen on September 1 of the applicable school year. 
The Missouri-Pacific Railroad Depot-Gurdon is a historic railroad station building at North 1st Street and East Walnut Street in Gurdon, Arkansas.  The single-story masonry building was built c. 1917 by the Missouri-Pacific Railroad to house passenger and freight service facilities.  It is built in the Mediterranean Renaissance style which was then popular for building such structures in Arkansas.  It has a red clay tile roof, Italianate bracketing, and Baroque quoin molding. 
This article about a property in Clark County, Arkansas on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The 46th Yasar Dogu Tournament 2018, was a wrestling event held in Istanbul, Turkey between the 27th and 29th of July 2018. 
Geoff Hunt PPRSMA (born 1948) is a British maritime artist and former President of the Royal Society of Marine Artists. 
In addition to his illustrative work, Hunt has forged a successful career exhibiting across the globe.  He is a Past-President of the Royal Society of Marine Artists.  Whilst he continues to paint historic scenes, Hunt also depicts contemporary pleasure yachts, warships and other vessels. 
The Lepidoptera of Norway consist of both the butterflies and moths recorded from Norway. This list includes species recorded from Svalbard and Jan Mayen. 
Pama borders on Kittsee in the north, Gattendorf and Zurndorf in the south, Deutsch Jahrndorf in the southeast, Lower Austria in the west and Slovakia in the east. 
After the Ottoman wars, the strongly decimated population was supplemented by the influx of Croatian-speaking population. The Burgenland Croats have shrunk noticeably in recent decades, but are still very active in community life. The majority of church services are held mainly in Croatian. The town belonged to Hungary (German-Western Hungary) until the foundation of Burgenland in 1920/21. 
Before the Second World War, Jewish families lived in Pama, as well as in Kittsee, the neighboring town that was part of the seven Jewish communities in Burgenland. After the "Anschluss" of Austria to the National Socialist German Reich, the Jews living in Kittsee and Pama were expelled from their homes on 16 April 1938 and abandoned on a lonely island on the Danube. 
The municipal council has a total of 19 members. The Social Democratic Party of Austria has 10 councillors, the Austrian People's Party 9. 
 The Inn at 97 Winder is a luxurious historic Inn located at 97 Winder Street in Midtown Detroit, Michigan, within the Brush Park district. Originally known as the John Harvey House, it was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 1991. The Detroit hotel is two blocks from Comerica Park and three blocks from Ford Field. 
John Harvey was a successful pharmacist in Detroit, but he is best known for his philanthropy in educating and feeding the city's poor children and orphans, beginning in the period just after the American Civil War and continuing into the early twentieth century. Harvey established Detroit's Industrial School and later the Sabbath Mission School to educate indigent children. 
John Harvey died in 1905, but his widow lived in the house into the 1920s. In the 1920s, Jesse Hobbs, an automobile worker, purchased the home. In 1938, the structure was converted into a rooming house; some of the larger rooms were partitioned. 
Developers purchased the John Harvey House in 1986, renovated the structure, and, in 2005, opened it as the historic Inn at 97 Winder with 10-room guest rooms. 
Ali Akbar Moosavi-Movahedi (born in Shiraz, Iran, February 1953) is an Iranian Biophysicist, and  Biophysical Chemist at Institute of Biochemistry and Biophysics, University of Tehran. He is the founder of the Iran Society of Biophysical Chemistry. He is the fellow of The World Academy of Sciences (TWAS), fellow of Islamic World Academy of Sciences (IAS), and a member of the Islamic Republic of Iran Academy of Sciences. 
Ali Akbar Moosavi-Movahedi was born in Shiraz, Iran, in 1953. He attended Alborz High School in 1968, graduated from the National University of Iran (now known as Shahid Beheshti University) with a BSc in Chemistry in 1975, earned his MSc in Bioanalytical Chemistry at the Eastern Michigan University in 1979,  and obtained his PhD in Biophysical Chemistry at the University of Manchester in 1986. 
He is the founding member of the Federation of Iran Bioscience Societies (FIrBS), Universal Scientific Education and Research Network (USERN), Biochemical Society of Iran, Iranian Biology Society. 
He supports to organize National, Regional, and International conferences in the field of Biophysical Chemistry, Biothermodynamics, Biomolecular Sciences and also in the area of enculturing science and technology advancements. 
As a surgeon, Hesselbach is best known for his work with hernia operations. He was the first to describe a handful of anatomical structures, such as the cribriform fascia (Hesselbach's fascia), interfoveolar ligament (Hesselbach's ligament) and the inguinal triangle (Hesselbach's triangle). 
This article about a German person in the field of medicine is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Anthaxioides aurorus is a species of beetles in the family Buprestidae, the only species in the genus Anthaxioides. 
Karimganj district is one of the 34 districts of the Indian state of Assam. Karimganj town is both the administrative headquarters district and the biggest town of this district. It is located in southern Assam and borders Tripura and the Sylhet Division of Bangladesh. It makes up the Barak Valley alongside Hailakandi and Cachar. Karimganj was previously part of the Sylhet District before the Partition of India. It became a district in 1983. 
After the Conquest of Gour in 1303, many disciples of Shah Jalal migrated and settled in present-day Karimganj where they preached Islam to the local people. Syed Abu Bakr migrated to Chhotalekha, Adam Khaki and Shah Syed Badruddin to Badarpur and Shah Sikandar to Bundasil (Deorail). 
During the 15th century, an independent state was established in the region by a landowner named Malik Pratap, who seceded it from its previous rulers, the Manikya dynasty of Tripura. This state, named the Pratapgarh Kingdom, ruled there for several centuries and came into conflict with the neighbouring monarchs of Bengal and Kachar. Pratapgarh was eventually conquered by the latter during the early 17th century. 
Karimganj town is an important centre of trade and commerce in the North East India. Its river port, with elaborate infra-structures like cargo-terminal, jetty, warehouses etc., is capable of handling large volumes of cargoes carried by steamers plying through river ways via Bangladesh. Karimganj is also a border trade centre and import-export business worth crores of rupees is carried out through the custom trade point at Dakbangla Ghat in the town and Sutarkandi Custom Station. 
Karimganj is an agricultural district. Historically, tea has been the major agricultural product of Cachar region including Karimganj. Sugarcane is also grown in the district for sugar and Gur production.[citation needed] 
There are five Assam Legislative Assembly constituencies in this district: Ratabari, Patharkandi,  Karimganj North,  Karimganj South, and Badarpur. Ratabari is designated for scheduled castes. All five are in the Karimganj Lok Sabha constituency. 
According to 2011 Indian Census, the Muslims form a slight majority in the district constituting 56.4% of the population, with Hindus at 42.5% of the population, followed by 1.0% Christians. Small populations of Jain, Buddhists and Sikhs also reside in the district. 
According to the 2011 census, 86.84% of the district spoke Bengali, 5.70% Hindi, 2.00% Bishnupriya Manipuri and 1.65% Bhojpuri as their first language. 
Notable minority languages include Bishnupriya Manipuri and Meitei. There are also a small tribal communities like Hrangkhol, Kuki, Khasi, Tripuri and Sakachep. 
This article about an Ancient Greek writer or poet is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Postplatyptilia flinti is a moth of the family Pterophoridae. It is known from Argentina, Brazil and Paraguay. 
This article on a moth of the family Pterophoridae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Gold Afternoon Fix is the sixth album by the Australian alternative rock band the Church, released in April 1990. It was their second album for Arista Records in the US and was expected to capitalise and build on the success of 1988's Starfish. The album saw considerable promotion upon its release, but despite moderate success in the US, with the single "Metropolis" reaching the top of the Modern Rock Tracks chart, the release failed to deliver mass commercial appeal. 
Despite the album's title, Steve Kilbey was not yet using heroin at this point. He only started smoking (not fixing) the drug after the subsequent tour, having been introduced to it by Grant McLennan of the Go-Betweens. The title actually derives from a stock market term relating to the daily price which is set for gold. 
The album is unique among the Church's releases in the absence of any 12-string electric guitar. The missing trademark sound was due to guitarist Marty Willson-Piper's 12-string Rickenbacker having been stolen during the previous tour. 
Great Manson Farm is located on the southwest side of Manson Lane on the northern outskirts of Monmouth, in the Buckholt area. The farm is south of Buckholt Wood, and was within Wye Bridge Ward at the turn of the nineteenth century. It is currently located within the electoral division of Dixton with Osbaston. The farm includes three Grade II listed buildings: the Great Manson farmhouse, the large barn, and the old cider house. The farmhouse was built in the eighteenth century, circa 1760. 
The 1912 Tulane Olive and Blue football team represented Tulane University during the 1912 college football season. 
There is a statue of John Rockey Park in an alcove just to the left of the west (front) entrance to the University of Utah main administration building which bears his name.  There is a plaque fixed to the base of the statue. The plaque lists biographical dates and statistics from Park's life and career, and then repeats the following quote from an 1885 speech he gave to future teachers: 
I would have you remember that the best intellectual ability ... will result in worse than failure, unless it has underlying it a stratum of moral culture. 
Park was born in Tiffin, Ohio. As a young man he worked on his family's farm just outside town and attended Tiffin's public school. 
From 1853 to 1855, Park was employed as a teacher for the first time; he taught at the Academy in Republic where he had attended classes as a student. 
In 1855, Park entered medical school at New York University where he was a student of the chemist, historian and philosopher, John William Draper. In later life, Park would "gratefully acknowledge" the positive influence that Draper's teaching and friendship had on his life. In 1857, Park received his MD, and he began practicing medicine that same year. 
By 1860, Park had decided to leave the practice of medicine. Instead, he ventured out west where (initially at least) he would not always find employment as a teacher. 
Park came to Utah Territory in 1861 settling in Draper. In 1862, he was baptized a member of The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints (LDS Church). 
In 1869, Park became president of the University of Deseret, the predecessor of the University of Utah. 
In 1895, Park was elected as Utah Superintendent of Education on the Republican ticket. He continued to serve in this position until 1900. He was succeeded by Emma McVicker. 
Upon his death in 1900, Park bequeathed his entire fortune, plus his library, to the University of Utah. 
The Draper Park School, in Draper, Utah, near where Park taught school early in his career, is named after him, and is listed on the National Register of Historic Places. 
Cabela's GrandSlam Hunting: 2004 Trophies is the first sequel to Cabela's GrandSlam Hunting: North American 29. It was developed by American studio nFusion Interactive and released on August 28, 2003. The game was published by Activision, in conjunction with hunting supply company Cabela's. 
This biographical article related to fencing in Poland is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The building consists of three stories, a ground floor and two upper floors. Nights, it is being fully illuminated by floodlights. 
Sundlo was educated as an officer and graduated from the Norwegian Military Academy in 1902. He joined Nasjonal Samling in 1933, and was appointed commander of Infantry Regiment 15 the same year. 
When the Germans invaded Norway 9 April 1940, Sundlo held the rank of colonel and was commander-in-chief for Narvik area. 
After the surrender of Narvik on 9 April 1940, Sundlo was accused of treason by his divisional commander, General Carl Gustav Fleischer. However, the post-war trials only found that Sundlo had committed "negligent offences" at Narvik in 1940. He was still found guilty for a number of other acts during the occupation, and sentenced to life in prison. A minority of three of the eight judges at his trial voted for a death sentence. Konrad Sundlo was pardoned in 1952 and died in 1965. 
During the German occupation Sundlo was Rikshirdsjef (paramilitary collaborationist commander) from the autumn of 1940. After that he served as the collaborationist county governor of Oslo and Akershus from 1943 to 1944 and lastly in Sogn og Fjordane until the end of the war. 
The Old City of Freiburg is part of the city and business centres of Freiburg im Breisgau and is the core of the original city. It is divided into the two districts 111 Altstadt-Mitte and 112 Altstadt-Ring. The Altstadt-Mitte district was the city's build-up area at the time of its foundation and therefore formed the old city. The district Altstadt-Ring is connected westwards to the railway line and south to the Dreisam. 
Since 1979, the city hosts an annual outdoor art and design market called Kunst in der oberen Altstadt (English literally: Art in the upper old city) featuring many artists and designers of a number of different handicrafts. 
The Old City is the center for cultural life in Freiburg. The Theater Freiburg, the Konzerthaus Freiburg, most of the museums and cinemas, the headquarters of the city's library as well as the Planetarium located at the Freiburg's main train station are all located in the Old City. 
The University of Freiburg is also located in the Old City, alongside the faculties of humanities and social sciences as well as the university library. 
The district of Altstadt-Mitte has been a pedestrian zone since the mid-1870s. After the ring road was blocked between the two districts in 2012, the pedestrian zone was partially extended to the district Altstadt-Ring. The boundaries of the built-up old city form multi-lane streets as the main traffic arteries of individual traffic. Car parking is concentrated to several car parking areas on the main traffic axes, whilst in other streets residents have their own car parks. 
The Journal of a Disappointed Man is the first volume of published journal entries by English naturalist and diarist Bruce Frederick Cummings, writing under the nom-de-plume W. N. P. Barbellion. 
The Journal of a Disappointed Man was described by its author as "a study in the nude". The book was originally optioned by Collins, who eventually rejected the book because they feared the "lack of morals" shown by Barbellion would damage their reputation. An editor's note at the very end of the book claims Barbellion died on 31 December 1917, but Cummings in fact lived for nearly two more years. 
The first edition bore a preface by H.G. Wells, which led some reviewers to believe the journal was a work of fiction by Wells himself; Wells publicly denied this but the true identity of "Barbellion" was not known by the public until after Cummings' death. 
  This is a list of Gujarati language films that are scheduled to release in 2021. The film industry continued to be affected by COVID-19 pandemic. 
He has written extensively on medicine and public health for The New Yorker and Slate, and is the author of the books Complications: A Surgeon's Notes on an Imperfect Science; Better: A Surgeon's Notes on Performance; The Checklist Manifesto; and Being Mortal: Medicine and What Matters in the End. 
Gawande was born on November 5, 1965, in Brooklyn, New York, to Marathi Indian immigrants to the United States, both doctors. His family soon moved to Athens, Ohio, where he and his sister grew up, and he graduated from Athens High School in 1983. 
Soon after he began his residency, his friend Jacob Weisberg, editor of Slate, asked him to contribute to the online magazine. Several articles by Gawande were published in The New Yorker, and he was made a staff writer for that publication in 1998. 
A June 2009 New Yorker essay by Gawande compared the health care of two towns in Texas to show why health care was more expensive in one town compared to the other. Using the town of McAllen, Texas, as an example, it argued that a corporate, profit-maximizing culture (which can provide substantial amounts of unnecessary care) was an important factor in driving up costs, unlike a culture of low-cost high-quality care as provided by the Mayo Clinic and other efficient health systems. 
In 2012, he gave the TED talk "How Do We Heal Medicine?" which has been viewed more than 2 million times. 
Gawande published his first book, Complications: A Surgeon's Notes on an Imperfect Science, containing revised versions of 14 of his articles for Slate and The New Yorker, in 2002. It was a National Book Award finalist. 
His second book, Better: A Surgeon's Notes on Performance, was released in April 2007. It discusses three virtues that Gawande considers to be most important for success in medicine: diligence, doing right, and ingenuity. Gawande offers examples in the book of people who have embodied these virtues. The book strives to present multiple sides of contentious medical issues, such as malpractice law in the US, physicians' role in capital punishment, and treatment variation between hospitals. 
Gawande released his third book, The Checklist Manifesto: How to Get Things Right, in 2009. It discusses the importance of organization and preplanning (such as thorough checklists) in both medicine and the larger world. The Checklist Manifesto reached the New York Times hardcover nonfiction bestseller list in 2010. 
Being Mortal: Medicine and What Matters in the End was released in October 2014 and became a #1 New York Times bestseller. It discusses end of life choices about assisted living and the effect of medical procedures on terminally ill people. The book was the basis of a documentary for the PBS television series "Frontline" and was first broadcast on February 10, 2015. 
Gawande chairs Lifebox, a non-profit founded in 2011 which provides training and equipment for safer surgery. 
On July 13, 2021, President Biden announced his intention of nominating Gawande to the post of Assistant Administrator of U.S. AID for the Bureau of Global Health. 
In 2004, Gawande was selected as one of the "20 Most Influential South Asians" by Newsweek. In 2006, he was named a MacArthur Fellow for his work investigating and articulating modern surgical practices and medical ethics. In 2007, he became director of the World Health Organization's effort to reduce surgical deaths, and in 2009 he was elected a Hastings Center Fellow. 
Ixora johnsonii is a species of flowering plant in the family Rubiaceae. It is endemic to Ernakulam in the state of Kerala, India. 
Stoke again failed to make it past the second round this time West Ham United knocking City out of the League Cup. 
Yusuf Janfalan  is an Anglican bishop in Nigeria: he is the current Bishop of Ikara, one of ten dioceses within the Anglican Province of Kaduna, itself one of 14 provinces within the Church of Nigeria. 
Yachts club SMTU was an educational yacht club on Kirov Islands of St. Petersburg.  It occupied the island of Bezymyanniy. 
After the creation in 1930 of the Saint Petersburg State Marine and Technological University, based on the Saint Petersburg Polytechnical University, there was a requirement for sea engineers to have training and practice opportunities. 
During the Second World War, students gained this practice at the Admiralty Shipyard, but towards the end of the 1940s, a new place was allocated using institute yachts, on Krestovsky island. 
At the end of the 1950s, the territory of the Yacht club SMTU became an island, when a rowing canal was dug on Krestovsky island in 1958-1960.  This new island was named Anonymous (Russian: Bezymyanniy), and the city administration officially placed it under the authority of the SMTU (then known as the LMTU) in 1959. 
Club held competitions which often had no prize fund; for example winners of a Quartet - 2002 cup were awarded edible fungi.  The club had access to unusual vessels, such as a trimaran, and a submarine. 
The last director of the club was Jury Chistjakov,  who was in charge when the club was closed in 2003. The land is now being used for the building of a new sports centre.  This will belong to a noncommercial partnership Javara-Neva, and its president will be Vladimir Putin. 
Mr. Khalil Abdul-Karim joined the Muslim Brotherhood in his youth. After attaining his high school diploma he traveled to Cairo to study Law and he graduated from Cairo University (then, Fouad the First University).[citation needed] 
Mr. Abdul-Karim started his law-practice office where he was the head of the defense team (Primary and Appeal Courts) in the case of Professor Nasr Abu Zayd who was sued for ridda (apostasy from Islam) and for separation from his wife. 
The series was broadcast worldwide through Animax. The Secret of the Lovely Eyepatch was licensed in North America by Bandai Entertainment. The rights to The Counter Attack of Siberian Yagyu were held by Geneon Entertainment. Both series were licensed by Media Blasters in 2012. The series premiered on Toku in the United States in January 2016. 
After 300 years of searching, Koinosuke finds Jiyu Nanohana in modern Japan. Her figure makes her the ideal candidate to be the next Jubei. He approaches her and tries to give her the eyepatch but she steadfastly refuses. Only when they are attacked by a Ryujoji swordsman does she don the eyepatch and dispose of him. They eventually find out that the Ryujoji clan believes it will be vindicated once the reincarnation of Jubei is defeated. 
The introductory episodes follow the "Monster of the Week" formula, in this case, her teachers and peers constantly challenging her. Later episodes delve into Sai's pain of losing Jiyu's mother, the sacrifice that Jiyu has to make in order to live a double-life as Jubei, and the Ryujoji Family Curse. 
What ensues is a three way battle between the Siberian Yagyu, Freesia Yagyu and Yagyu Jubei's successor, Jiyu Nanohana. A major theme of the series is power and how differently people react to it. Jiyu does not want the responsibility and she's afraid to lose herself for power while Freesia does not understand anyone who is not willing to have more power. 
David Johnston (born 10 July 1955) is an Australian cricketer. He played fourteen first-class and one List A matches for New South Wales between 1977/78 and 1981/82. 
This biographical article related to an Australian cricket person born in the 1950s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Toucan Prize (German: Tukan-Preis) is a literary prize given by the city of Munich to the best new publication by a Munich author. It has been awarded since 1965 and is endowed with 6,000 Euros. 
The Isaacson House is a historic house at 2 Benson Street in Lewiston, Maine.  Built in 1959 for Philip M. Isaacson, a local lawyer, it is a distinctive regional example of modest Mid-Century Modern residential architecture, that drew nationwide notice in architectural circles after its construction.  It was listed on the National Register of Historic Places in 2011. 
The 2008 WPS Bathurst 12 Hour was an endurance race for Group 3J Performance Cars and Group 3E Series Production Cars. It was the sixth Bathurst 12 Hour to be held and the second since its 2007 revival. The race was won by Rod Salmon, Damien White and Graham Alexander driving a Mitsubishi Lancer Evolution. It was the first time a Mitsubishi had won the race. 
The event was staged at the Mount Panorama Circuit, Bathurst, New South Wales, Australia on 10 February 2008 with cars competing in the following classes: 
Belgrade (also known as Belgrade with Boris Malagurski) is a 2013 Serbian documentary film directed by Boris Malagurski about Belgrade, the capital of Serbia. The documentary film had its world premiere on 19 October 2013 at Sava Centar in Belgrade and was aired on Radio Television Serbia on 20 October 2014. 
The documentary features interviews with prominent Belgraders, such as tennis player Novak Djokovic, who was also featured in the official trailer of the film. 
The film was supported by the Serbian Ministry for Culture, the City of Belgrade, Serbs from the diaspora and foreign donors, while the filming took place in over 80 locations throughout Belgrade. 
A native of Reidsville, North Carolina, Owens made his Negro leagues debut with the Homestead Grays in 1921. He played 10 seasons with the Grays, and also played for the Pittsburgh Keystones in 1922. Owens died in Washington, D.C. in 1960 at age 66. 
Goose-Pie House was a small English Baroque house built by John Vanbrugh in Whitehall, London, in 1701.  The house was demolished in 1898.  The site now lies under the southeast corner of the Old War Office Building on Whitehall, near the  Gurkha Memorial statue on Horse Guards Avenue. 
Vanbrugh made his first essays in architecture earlier in the 1690s, when he was engaged by Charles Howard, 3rd Earl of Carlisle to design his palace at Castle Howard in Yorkshire.  Vanbrugh was a well-known playwright, and was friends with the prominent Whigs through his membership of the Kit-Cat Club, but he had no previous formal education in drawing or architectural design. 
Vanbrugh repeated the motif of three long round-headed windows at Castle Howard, and on the corner pavilions at Blenheim Palace.  He repeated the rusticated central block with plainer projecting wings at Seaton Delaval Hall. 
According to their website the organization hopes to pressure U.S. political leaders to enforce UN Security Council Resolutions relating to the establishment of an independent Palestinian State in the West Bank and the Gaza Strip. 
This article about an organization in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jason Lee Scott is a fictional character and the main protagonist in the first season of the Power Rangers franchise, played by actor Austin St. John. Jason is known as the original Red Ranger from the first entry of the franchise, Mighty Morphin Power Rangers, as well as the leader of the first team of Power Rangers. He later becomes the Gold Ranger in Power Rangers Zeo. 
According to a contest held by ABC Family in 2004, Jason was voted as the #1 Ranger of all time. Out of all Rangers, he has defeated more enemies by himself than any other Ranger and is the only one to beat Tommy Oliver in a fight. A subsequent contest on Toon Disney in 2007 also voted him as the most popular Power Ranger. As stated at the first Power Morphicon, Jason still holds this title. 
Following the failure of destroying the Green Candle, Tommy entrusts Jason with his Power Coin to prevent it from falling into Rita's hands again, allowing him access to the Green Ranger's powers (including the Dragon Shield and the Dragon Dagger, which also allows him to call the Dragonzord to aid the Rangers, even while Jason controls the Megazord, making him twice as powerful). 
One of Jason's most cunning moments is the gambit he plays against Goldar, who kidnaps the parents of Angel Grove High's students, then ransoms them for the Ranger's five Power Coins. Jason would later reveal that though he gave up his Tyrannosaurus Power Coin to Goldar, he kept the Dragon Power Coin. With it, Tommy eventually regains his Green Ranger powers, retrieves the other Ranger's Power Coins and helps the team save their captive parents. 
Some time later, Jason, Trini and Zack are chosen to act as ambassadors at a Peace Conference in Switzerland (after the actors playing the characters left the show over contract disputes, the characters simply being shown in their Ranger uniforms, using old footage, or with doubles who were never directly facing the cameras, until the transfer could be incorporated into the plot of the show), and are forced to leave the team. Zordon chooses Rocky DeSantos to replace Jason as the Red Ranger. 
Jason returns the Gold Ranger powers to Trey in the final episode of Zeo when he finds out that he cannot handle it much longer, as they are draining away - along with his life force - due to the Gold Ranger powers not being intended for human physiology. However, there are no apparent long-term effects, and Jason appears perfectly healthy after he transfers it back to Trey. Retired from superheroics once more, Jason then happily focuses on his relationship with Emily. 
Jason and the other Mighty Morphin Power Rangers return as part of the army of Legendary Rangers led by Tommy that helped the Mega Rangers defeat the Armada once and for all, fighting in a huge battle against hundreds of XBorgs and dozens of Bruisers. However, Austin St. John did not return and Jason only appears morphed, as do the other Mighty Morphin rangers besides Tommy. 
Jason returns in Season 2 of Power Rangers Beast Morphers, in the special episode "Grid Connection". 
Jason also appears in the Mighty Morphin Power Rangers comic from Boom Studios. This version of Jason is shown to have romantic interest in Trini Kwan (Yellow Ranger) and briefly Lauren Shiba (second Red Samurai Ranger). 
David Rupel is an American television soap opera script writer. Rupel is a graduate of Indiana University, with a BA in communications, where he graduated magna cum laude. 
Producer on Meet My Folks, American Princess, The Real Housewives of Orange County, The Real World, Big Brother 2 and Temptation Island. 
From 1989, Dreyer worked at the University of Mainz as a research assistant to Professor Hans-Joachim Pflug.  In 1991 she received her appointment as a probationary judge, and later as a prosecutor in Bad Kreuznach. 
Having served as State Minister of Social Affairs, Labor, Health and Demography since 2002, Dreyer was the designated successor of incumbent Minister-president Kurt Beck, who announced his upcoming resignation from the post on 28 September 2012. She was officially elected on 16 January 2013. 
As one of Rhineland-Palatinate's representatives at the Bundesrat, Dreyer serves on the Committee on Foreign Affairs and on the Committee on European Union Affairs. 
In the negotiations to form a Grand Coalition of Chancellor Angela Merkel's Christian Democrats (CDU together with the Bavarian CSU) and the SPD following the 2013 federal elections, Dreyer was part of the SPD delegation in the working group on cultural and media affairs, led by Michael Kretschmer and Klaus Wowereit. 
Following the 2017 national elections, Dreyer warned against another grand coalition and favored a minority government. 
She was diagnosed with multiple sclerosis in 1994. This inhibits her physical movement. She made her illness public in 2006, and when traveling she now always takes her "Rolli" (wheelchair) along, for covering longer distances. 
This article about a property in Dubuque County, Iowa on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a building or structure in Iowa is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Moon Lake is a 2009 Bulgarian-German-French art film written and directed by Ivan Stanev. The film was produced by independent Bulgarian producer Donka Angelova and co-produced by Stanev Films (Berlin) and Patrick Sandrin (Sofilm). It was presented at Sofia Film Fest 2010 and Cyprus International Film Festival 2012. The final version of the film is presented by advanced coproducers Kathrin Brunner and Oliver Czeslik (mYndstorm productions), Berlin. 
Moon Lake has a nonlinear narrative structure and uses a leitmotiv technique with recurring themes and day dreams. It focuses not on suspense but on distorted contemplation. The film follows the parallel stories of two couples that represent the doomed lovers Orpheus and Eurydice of Greek mythology. 
Moon Lake does not have a well-defined storyline, logically coherent cues or a straightforward message. The movie draws inspiration from the Greek Myth of Orpheus and Eurydice. In the myth Orpheus travels to the Underworld to save his wife but in the end she is trapped forever. 
The movie follows two young lovers in an otherworldly marsh by an abandoned crude-oil carrier named "Moon Lake". They play a game about the Thracian singer Orpheus, who ascends from the Underworld, followed by his beloved mistress, Eurydice. 
In an elite cave school in the rocky Black Sea coast, a cliff dwelling community is taught survival in a barren moonscape in the wake of the catastrophe. 
The story was inspired by a real ship called "Moon Lake", which crashed off the shore of the Black Sea. The director Ivan Stanev spent a summer with the person who had been sent to dismantle the ship, filming daily. Some of the footage was later used in the film. 
This ship became the inspiration for a group of loosely related works, which also included a poem called Moon Lake written in German and a theatre performance in Norway in 2004. 
Moon Lake was also inspired by the unique location where the movie was shot, the steep cliffs and caves in the Yalaita National Archaeological Reserve, south of Kamen Bryag, on the Black Sea. 
It only features non-professional actors, the majority of whom were studying art and languages, and the others were musicians, painters or anarchists. The cast also included a group of professional teachers, specialists in subjects ranging from Ancient Greek to astrophysics. 
The languages spoken in Moon Lake include English, French, Russian, German, Spanish, Bulgarian, Ancient Greek, and Esperanto. 
The film was produced independently from national film centers. It was funded by producer Donka Angelova. 
The postproduction was carried out by "The Post Republic" and done at Babelsberg Film Studio in Berlin using a complex color grading. 
Moon Lake was released in select theaters and on the Vimeo on Demand streaming service on January 28, 2021 
Sepia pardex is a species of cuttlefish native to the western Pacific Ocean, specifically off Japan, along the Pacific coast from the Chiba Peninsula, and along the Japan Sea coast from Toyama Bay to South Korea. It is also present off Taiwan and in the East China Sea. The depth range of this species is unknown. 
The type specimen was collected off Kajiyama, Chiba Prefecture, Japan. It is deposited at the University Museum of the University of Tokyo. 
The Scarred People is the tenth studio album by Swedish gothic metal band Tiamat. The album was released on November 2, 2012 through Napalm Records in digital download, CD and limited edition vinyl formats. 
All tracks written and composed by Tiamat except Born to Die by Elizabeth Woolridge Grant and Justin Parker, and Paradise by Bruce Springsteen. 
The Texas Statutes or Texas Codes are the collection of the Texas Legislature's statutes: the Revised Civil Statutes, Penal Code, and the Code of Criminal Procedure. 
This article relating to law in the United States or its constituent jurisdictions is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Alonso Ignacio Medel Araya (born 19 December 2001) is a Chilean badminton player. In 2016, he won the Chile International tournament in men's doubles event partnered with Diego Castillo and the runner-up in mixed doubles event partnered with Mickaela Skaric. He represented his country competed at the 2018 Summer Youth Olympics in Buenos Aires, Argentina. 
This biographical article related to Chilean sport is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to the sport of badminton is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Meerakutty was born at Thankalam in Kothamangalam Municipality in Kerala state, India on 28 February 1930 to Marottickal Pareeth Mammy and Kayyamma. 
He did his school education from Mathirappilly Govt. Primary School, Thrikkariyoor NSS Middle School, Muvattupuzha NSS Malyalam High School and Kothamangalam Mar Basil English High School. He earned Bachelor of Arts (BA) in Malayalam Literature, Master of Arts (MA) Malayalam Literature, Malayalam Sahithya Visarad and Hindi Rashtrabhasha Visarad degrees through self study. He did his 'Bachelor in Education (BEd) study in Thalassery Govt. Training College. 
Meerakutty's literary works falls under the categories of Literary Criticism, History of Literature, Grammar, History, biography, Children's Literature and Translation. His views on Sabarimala Ayyappan and Onam are controversial. 
He married K.Suleikha Beevi in the year 1960. He has four children, Dr. Shiney Ali, Dr. Rejula Rabi, M.Shairaj IRS and Dr. Lajni Shafeeq.[citation needed] 
In 2010, dementia and memory loss symptoms developed and he was identified as having Alzheimer's disease (AD) which ultimately led to his death during the early hours of 24 August 2017 
The Malayalam monthly Bhoomikkaran instituted an award in the memory of Meerakutty. The first award was presented to Sri.K.Sukumaran for his Malayalam novel Mahanadikkarayil in 2018 February. The award for 2019 was presented to Sri. Ramachandran Karavaram for his novel Aparaswathwam Nirakaram. 
The Prof. P. Meerakutty Foundation, Thrikkakkara, Kochi has instituted an yearly award worth Rs 25,000. The first award was presented to Sri. Iyyamkodu Sreedharan, a writer and former Secretary of Kerala Kalamandalam for his biographical book Swapnadanam dedicated to poet P. Kunhiraman Nair.[citation needed] 
Note: Rensselaer's athletic teams were unofficially known as 'Cherry and White' until 1921 when the Engineers moniker debuted for the men's basketball team. 
The Tullymore Classic was a tournament on the Symetra Tour, the LPGA's developmental tour. It was part of the Symetra Tour's schedule between 2015 and 2017. It was held at Tullymore Golf Resort in Stanwood, Michigan. 
After Memnon's death, Zeus was moved by Eos' tears and granted him immortality. Memnon's death is related at length in the lost epic Aethiopis, composed after The Iliad circa the 7th centuryBC. Quintus of Smyrna records Memnon's death in Posthomerica. His death is also described in Philostratus' Imagines. 
Dictys Cretensis, author of a pseudo-chronicle of the Trojan War, writes that "Memnon, the son of Tithonus and Aurora, arrived with a large army of Indians and Ethiopians, a truly remarkable army which consisted of thousands and thousands of men with various kinds of arms, and surpassed the hopes and prayers even of Priam." 
When Memnon reaches the Greek ships, Nestor begs Achilles to fight him and avenge Antilochos, leading to the two men clashing while both wearing divine armour made by Hephaestus, making another parallel between the two warriors. Zeus favours both of them and makes each man tireless and huge so that the whole battlefield can watch them clash as demigods. Eventually, Achilles stabs Memnon through the heart, causing his entire army to flee in terror. 
In honour of Memnon, the gods collect all the drops of blood that fall from him and use them to form a huge river that on every anniversary of his death will bear the stench of human flesh. The Aethiopians that stayed close to Memnon in order to bury their leader are turned into birds (which we now call Memnonides) and they stay by his tomb so as to remove dust that gathers on it. 
Roman writers and later classical Greek writers such as Diodorus Siculus believed Memnon hailed from "Aethiopia", a geographical area in Africa, usually south of Egypt. Because the original historical work by Arctinus of Miletus only survives in fragments, most of what is known about Memnon comes from post-Homeric Greek and Roman writers. Homer only makes passing mention to Memnon in the Odyssey. 
Herodotus called Susa "the city of Memnon," Herodotus describes two tall statues with Egyptian and Ethiopian dress that some, he says, identify as Memnon; he disagrees, having previously stated that he believes it to be Sesostris. One of the statues was on the road from Smyrna to Sardis. Herodotus described a carved figure matching this description near the old road from Smyrna to Sardis. 
Pausanias describes how he marveled at a colossal statue in Egypt, having been told that Memnon began his travels in Africa: 
According to Manetho Memnon and the 8th Pharaoh of the 18th dynasty Amenophis was one and the same king. 
According to ancient Greek poets, Memnon's father Tithonus was snatched away from Troy by the goddess of dawn Eos and was taken to the ends of the earth on the coast of Oceanus. 
There are statues of Amenhotep III in the Theban Necropolis in Egypt that were known to the Romans as the Colossi of Memnon. According to Pliny the Elder and others, one statue made a sound at morning time. 
Dense populations of Pleuromeia hardly allowing for other species, are recorded around the world from habitats ranging from semi-arid to tidal. 
Balswarup Chaubey was an Indian nephrologist and medical academic. A Fellow of the Royal College of Physicians of London, Chaubey was the retired dean of Government Medical College and Hospital (GMCH) Nagpur and had served as the secretary of the Maharashtra State Medical Teachers Association. 
Chaubey was married to Pramila and the couple had a son, Sameer Chaubey, who is a practicing nephrologist, and two daughters, Sarika and Swatee. He died on 20 November 2011 succumbing to the complications developed from a chest infection. 
In May 2008 Toporovsky was elected chairman of the National Union of Israeli Students. In the same year, he founded the Tzabar party, heading its list for the 2009 Knesset elections, However, it received only 0.14% of the vote and failed to pass the electoral threshold. The party did win seats on Tel Aviv city council. He remained chairman of the National Union of Israeli Students until 2010. In March 2011 he became chairman of the Issta travel agency, holding the role until February 2013. 
He was placed fourteenth on the party's list for the 2015 elections, losing his seat as the party was reduced to 11 seats. Prior to the April 2019 elections Yesh Atid joined the Blue and White alliance, with Toporovsky placed thirtieth on its list. He re-entered the Knesset after the alliance won 35 seats. He was again placed thirtieth on the Blue and White list for the September 2019 elections, retaining his seat. 
Toporovsky lives in Ness Ziona and is married to Shelly Herman, who participated in MasterChef Israel. The couple have three children. 
Every year, a group of Tatar activists organizes Sabantuy festival in Montreal, which brings together Tatars and members of other Turkic diasporas from all over the country. 
In mathematics, an almost periodic function is, loosely speaking, a function of a real number that is periodic to within any desired level of accuracy, given suitably long, well-distributed "almost-periods". The concept was first studied by Harald Bohr and later generalized by Vyacheslav Stepanov, Hermann Weyl and Abram Samoilovitch Besicovitch, amongst others. There is also a notion of almost periodic functions on locally compact abelian groups, first studied by John von Neumann. 
With this initial motivation to consider types of trigonometric polynomial with independent frequencies, mathematical analysis was applied to discuss the closure of this set of basic functions, in various norms. 
The theory was developed using other norms by Besicovitch, Stepanov, Weyl, von Neumann, Turing, Bochner and others in the 1920s and 1930s. 
Bohr (1925) defined the uniformly almost-periodic functions as the closure of the trigonometric polynomials with respect to the uniform norm 
An alternative definition due to Bochner (1926) is equivalent to that of Bohr and is relatively simple to state: 
The Bohr almost periodic functions are essentially the same as continuous functions on the Bohr compactification of the reals. 
The space Bp of Besicovitch almost periodic functions was introduced by Besicovitch (1926). It is the closure of the trigonometric polynomials under the seminorm 
where      f  0   =   1 P     {\displaystyle f_{0}={\frac {1}{P}}}   is the fundamental frequency and the Fourier coefficients are 
where      f  0   ( t ) =   1  P ( t )      {\displaystyle f_{0}(t)={\frac {1}{P(t)}}}   is the possibly time-varying fundamental frequency and the  time-varying Fourier coefficients are 
Paul Goodman Changed My Life is a 2011 documentary film directed by Jonathan Lee and distributed by Zeitgeist Films. 
Paul Goodman Changed My Life is the first documentary feature about Paul Goodman, social activist, lay psychologist, public intellectual and author best known for Growing Up Absurd.  The film tells Goodman's story primarily through interviews with his contemporaries, with extensive use of archival footage and personal photographs, as well as readings of his poetry and journals. 
This article about a biographical documentary film is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Born in Orange, Ray McNamee went to school at Waverley College in Sydney, and played cricket for Randwick in the Sydney grade competition. 
A medium-pace bowler, McNamee was a member of the New South Wales practice squad in 1925-26, and made his first-class debut for New South Wales in the 1926-27 Sheffield Shield, when he was 31. His first match was also Queensland's first Shield match. He opened the bowling throughout the season, finishing as the team's leading bowler, with 27 wickets at an average of 29.81, and conceding just over two runs per eight-ball over. 
In the fourth match in 1926-27 he took no wicket for 124 as Victoria made the world record score of 1107. In the final match of the competition in Sydney he took 7 for 21 to dismiss Victoria for 35. On a damp pitch, "He kept a splendid length, turning the ball sharply from the off, and at times making it get up very awkwardly ... at one stage he took five wickets without a run being scored off him." At the end of the season he played for The Rest against an Australian XI, taking five wickets. 
Hato-Udo Administrative Post (Hatu Udo, Hotudo) is an administrative post in Ainaro District, East Timor. 
Maison Alcan (English: Alcan House) is a building complex located on Sherbrooke Street in the Golden Square Mile district of Montreal. The complex was used to house the world headquarters for Alcan, now part of Rio Tinto Alcan, until 2015. Completed in 1983, the complex's integration of new construction with restored or renovated buildings marked a turning point in corporate Montreal's approach to development. 
Maison Alcan was designed by the Montreal-based architectural firm of Arcop (Architects in co-partnership), with Ray Affleck as lead architect. Peter Rose collaborated with Peter Lanken on the interior planning and design. 
In 2015, Alcan moved its HQ from the building and relocated to the Deloitte Tower, which is located between Windsor Station and the Bell Centre. 
Maison Alcan was classified as a heritage immovable by the Ministry of Culture and Communications the 23 February 2017. 
Elections for Greenwich Council in London were held on 6 May 2010.  The 2010 United Kingdom General Election and other local elections took place on the same day. 
In London council elections the entire council is elected every four years, as opposed to some local elections where one councillor is elected every year in three of the four years. 
Inape pompata is a species of moth of the family Tortricidae. It is endemic to Ecuador (Loja Province). 
The rapper Shahin Najafi, whose music has been banned in Iran, has used some of Ekhtesari's poems in his songs. 
In 2013, Ekhtesari was among the invited poets who appeared at the Gothenburg poetry festival. After her visit in Sweden she was arrested when she was about to travel to Turkey together with poet Mehdi Moosavi and imprisoned at the Evin prison in Tehran. Her Facebook account was hacked and her blog was closed. 
In January 2016, Ekhtesari told the Associated Press that she and Moosavi had fled Iran. For safety reasons, she declined to provide any more details. 
The yellow-breasted boubou (Laniarius atroflavus) is a species of bird in the family Malaconotidae. It is found in the Cameroonian Highlands forests. 
Its natural habitats are subtropical or tropical moist montane forests, subtropical or tropical moist shrubland, and subtropical or tropical high-altitude shrubland. The species is monotypic and sedentary. 
November marks the start of the breeding season, which is typically ends in late March. Two eggs are present in the clutch. 
Wyden castle (German: Schloss Wyden) is a castle in the municipality of Ossingen of the Canton of Zurich in Switzerland. It is a Swiss heritage site of regional significance. 
The castle complex served as a control for the Thur river valley. It has been rebuilt several times. The oldest part, the fortified tower dates from the 13th century. In his later years, the painter Felix Meyer (1653-1713) lived here. In 1903, the castle became the home of Max Huber. Today, his descendants occupy the castle. It is a private residence. 
Before entering electoral politics, Jayapal was a Seattle-based civil rights activist, serving until 2012 as the executive director of OneAmerica, a pro-immigrant advocacy group. She founded the organization, originally called Hate Free Zone, after the September 11 attacks. Jayapal co-chaired the Congressional Progressive Caucus from 2019 to 2021, henceforth serving as chair. She serves on both the Judiciary Committee and Budget Committee. 
Jayapal was born in Chennai, India, to Maya Jayapal, a writer, and MP Jayapal, a marketing professional. She spent most of her childhood in Indonesia and Singapore. She immigrated to the U.S. in 1982, at age 16, to attend college. She earned a Bachelor of Arts from Georgetown University and a Master of Business Administration from Northwestern University. 
Jayapal worked for PaineWebber as a financial analyst after graduating from college. At PaineWebber, she began to work on development projects from Chicago to Thailand. Later, she briefly worked in sales and marketing for a medical company before moving into the public sector in 1991. 
Jayapal served on the Mayoral Advisory Committee that negotiated Seattle's $15 minimum wage and co-chaired the mayor's police chief search committee, which resulted in the unanimous selection of the city's first female police chief. 
After State Senator Adam Kline announced his retirement in early 2014, Jayapal entered the race to succeed him. She was endorsed by Seattle Mayor Ed Murray and won more than 51% of the vote in the August 5 primary, out of a field of six candidates. She defeated fellow Democrat Louis Watanabe in November. 
In the Washington State Senate, Jayapal was the primary sponsor of SB 5863, which directs the Washington State Department of Transportation to administer a pre-apprenticeship program targeting women and people of color; the bill passed into law in July 2015. She co-sponsored a bill to test and track thousands of police department rape kits. 
Jayapal endorsed Senator Bernie Sanders for President of the United States in the 2016 Democratic primaries. 
In the final weeks of the race, Jayapal and her supporters contested claims from Walkinshaw that she had not advanced enough legislation. Jayapal won the general election with 56% of the vote. 
On January 6, 2017, Jayapal objected to Georgia's 16 electoral votes, which Donald Trump had won by over 200,000 votes. Because no senator joined her objection, the objection was dismissed. 
During Trump's inauguration, Jayapal met with constituents in her congressional district instead of attending the ceremony. The Nation called her "a leader of the resistance," quoting Minority Leader Nancy Pelosi calling Jayapal "a rising star in the Democratic caucus." In September, Representative Don Young apologized to her after calling her "young lady" in an exchange that went viral. Jayapal has described facing sexism from colleagues in Congress. 
Jayapal is a co-sponsor of legislation intended to make public colleges and universities tuition-free for most families and to significantly reduce student debt. 
On April 25, 2018, 57 members of the House of Representatives, including Jayapal, released a condemnation of Holocaust distortion in Ukraine and Poland. They criticized Poland's new Holocaust law, which would criminalize accusing Poles (as a nation[nb 1]) of complicity in the Holocaust, and Ukraine's 2015 memory laws glorifying the Ukrainian Insurgent Army (UPA) and its pro-Nazi leaders, such as Roman Shukhevych. 
In February 2019, Jayapal sponsored and introduced the Medicare for All Act of 2019 with more than 100 co-sponsors. The bill would create a publicly financed comprehensive, universal and guaranteed health care insurance system for every U.S. resident. It represented the continuation of progressives' long-term campaign in Congress to introduce a system of guaranteed health care. In 2021, Jayapal introduced similar legislation for the 117th Congress. 
In December 2019, Jayapal introduced a bill to urge India to lift curbs on communications in Kashmir. These curbs were introduced as part of revocation of the special status of Jammu and Kashmir in August 2019. Later that month, the Foreign Minister of India canceled a meeting with U.S. lawmakers, citing Jayapal's inclusion on the invitee list. The bill has seen no movement since its introduction in Congress. 
On January 20, 2020, Jayapal endorsed Senator Bernie Sanders in the 2020 Democratic presidential primaries. 
Jayapal supports decreasing U.S. military spending. She, Barbara Lee and Mark Pocan attempted to reduce the size of the $740 billion National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2021, but their motion was rejected 93-324. 
In September 2021, BuzzFeed reported that 14 former staffers had described Jayapal's congressional office as a volatile and dysfunctional workplace. Jayapal's office responded with a statement calling the allegations "sexist", "ugly stereotypes", and lacking context. 
Jayapal initially lost her Green Card when she gave birth prematurely in India during a visit with her husband, unable to return in time to maintain Permanent Resident status. She later became a U.S. citizen in 2000. She is the author of Pilgrimage: One Woman's Return to a Changing India, published in March 2000. 
Jayapal lives in Seattle with her husband, Steven R. Williamson. Janak, Jayapal's child from a previous marriage, is gender non-binary. She also has a stepson, Michael. In 2019, Jayapal publicly wrote that she had chosen to abort a pregnancy because the pregnancy would risk her and the unborn child's health. 
Jayapal tested positive for COVID-19 on January 11, 2021. In a statement released after her diagnosis, she criticized her Republican colleagues for refusing to wear masks when members of Congress were placed on lockdown during the 2021 United States Capitol attack. 
Boss Tenors (subtitled Straight Ahead from Chicago August 1961) is an album by saxophonists Gene Ammons and Sonny Stitt recorded in Chicago in 1961 and originally released on the Verve label. 
The Allmusic review stated "Tenor saxophonists Gene Ammons and Sonny Stitt co-led a small group in 1950, and this follow-up, taped in the studio in 1961, finds the two picking up where they left off". 
Parkview Hockey Club is a hockey club affiliated to the Ulster Branch of the Irish Hockey Association. It was founded as Fisherwick Hockey Club in 1898, changing its name to Parkview in 1924. It is based in the Co Antrim village of Doagh, near Ballyclare. The club's founding members were workers from the local spinning mills and from agriculture. The club currently plays in Section 2 of the Ulster Senior League. It currently fields two teams every Saturday. 
In 1970 a clubhouse built by the members was opened, and in 1974 it was renovated to include a bar. The senior team has to play its home matches on the artificial turf at the Valley Leisure Centre. Plans are advancing for the laying of an artificial pitch at Doagh. 
In 1948-49 Parkview won a test match against Antrim in the Ulster Senior League. In 1950, 1955 and 1956, Parkview lost three test matches to decide the destination of the Keightley Cup. The Kirk Cup was shared in 1955-56 and the Anderson Cup was won in 1958-59. 
The 1960s saw Parkview bounce between the Senior League and the Qualifying League. However further success was achieved in knock-out competitions with another Kirk Cup win in 1966-67. 
Maqluba can include a variety of vegetables, such as fried tomatoes, potatoes, cauliflower, and eggplant, accompanied by either chicken or lamb. The most common are cauliflower and eggplant. All the ingredients are carefully placed in the pot in layers, so that when the  pot is inverted for serving, the dish looks like a layer cake. 
Maqluba is typically garnished with pine nuts and chopped fresh parsley. It sometimes served with salad and fresh yogurt, and is often prepared for feasts and large gatherings. 
After conflict with the board over transfer policy and other issues, Monk was sacked on 18 June 2019. His assistant, Pep Clotet, was named caretaker head coach. 
The EFL hearing, originally scheduled for February 2019, was postponed to mid-March after a panel member recused themselves, "with the intention of the Disciplinary Commission delivering the outcome quickly so the matter can be fully resolved before the end of this season." The panel finally sat on 18 March, and ruled that nine points be deducted in the current season; neither party took up their right to appeal. 
Their first win finally arrived on 22 September, away to Leeds United, unbeaten and top of the table, courtesy of Adams' sharpness and what Leeds' manager Marcelo Bielsa claimed as a "tactical error" on his part. After conceding what Monk described as two poor goals stemming from two mistakes, Jutkiewicz scored twice in the second half to secure a draw at home to Ipswich Town and finish September in 16th place. 
They went through the remaining seven fixtures unbeaten. Adams' 22nd and last goal of the season completed a double over Leeds United, the return to goalscoring form of Jutkiewicz and Morrison earned points against Sheffield United, Ipswich Town and Derby County, and a comfortable win against Rotherham United confirmed their Championship status for next season with two matches still to play. They finished 17th, twelve points above the relegation places. 
In the first round of the EFL Cup, Birmingham were drawn away to another Championship team, Reading. With a televised Championship fixture three days later, Monk made eleven changes from the team that started the previous Saturday, with debuts for Lee Camp, Dan Scarr and Gary Gardner and first starts for Connor Mahoney, Beryly Lubala and Omar Bogle. Reading fielded a full-strength side and were rarely tested. 
Martin Hill started collecting over fifty years ago. After he got out of the army, he and his wife, Patsy, moved into her mother's house, which was 900 square feet. He began dealing in army surplus. One day, he used all of their savings and bought a literal ton of gun parts for $200. He cataloged and sorted all the pieces, over 36,000, and sold them to dealers. He turned a $200 investment in a $4000 one. 
Hill and his childhood friend, Harry Joyner, a cinematographer in Charlotte, NC, made amateur 8mm films when they were young. In 1971, they shot a 35mm film called "Body Shop." Hill believes it was the first 35mm film shot and produced in Charlotte. The film may still be found in obscure video stores by the name of "Dr. Gore." 
Hill's camera collection includes a VistaVision camera from "The Ten Commandments," among others, most of which have "scrap" stamped on their side. Hill and his family are working with museums and studios to try and raise awareness about preserving the historical artifacts of Hollywood. 
Hill calls the cameras "monuments to my folly," his folly being his love of movies and movie making. Over the years, he has collected hundreds of cameras, but sells very few. He says on his death bed, he'll still be buying junk, knowing he won't sell it all. 
GreyHawk Films, a Charlotte, North Carolina film production company, is currently completing a documentary on Martin Hill. Joanne Hock and John Disher, who work for GreyHawk Films, discovered Hill's story on a prop scout and thought it would make a great documentary. 
The documentary has had a few rough cut test screenings, but has not been released yet due to copyright issues. 
On July 3, 2012, Hill suffered from a stroke that paralyzed half of his body. As of 2012, the 76-year-old is currently living in a Harrisburg rehab center. 
Martin Hill passed away peacefully on March 24, 2017 at Clear Creek Nursing Home and Rehab.  At the time of his death, he is survived by his wife of 56 years, Patsy Hill. 
Similar to Ming and Song typefaces, sans-serif typefaces were designed for printing, but they were also designed for legibility. They are commonly used in headlines, signs, and video applications. 
Sans serif typefaces, especially for default system fonts, are common in Japanese computing.  Also, many Korean computing environments use Gulim which includes soft curves but is a sans-serif typeface. 
In Chinese versions of Microsoft Windows XP and older, the default interface typefaces are seriffed (MingLiU and SimSun), which deviates from the sans serif styling use in most other (including East Asian) regions of the product. Starting in Windows Vista, the default interface typefaces in all regions were changed to sans-serif styles, using Microsoft JhengHei in Traditional Chinese environments and Microsoft YaHei in Simplified Chinese environments. 
Joique Dewayne Bell Jr. (born August 4, 1986) is a former American football running back. He played college football at Wayne State. Bell was signed by the Buffalo Bills as an undrafted free agent in 2010. He has also been a member of the Philadelphia Eagles, Indianapolis Colts, New Orleans Saints, Detroit Lions, and Chicago Bears. 
As a senior at Wayne State, Bell was the winner of the Harlon Hill Trophy, awarded to the Division II player of the year, after he rushed for 2,084 yards and 29 touchdowns in the 2009 season. 
After going undrafted in the 2010 NFL Draft, Bell signed with the Buffalo Bills on April 29, 2010. On September 4, 2010, he was released by the Bills during final team cuts. Bell was signed to the Bills' practice squad on the following day. 
On September 21, 2010, the Philadelphia Eagles signed Bell off the Bills' practice squad. He was released by the Eagles on November 10, 2010. 
Bell was claimed off waivers by the Indianapolis Colts on November 11, 2010. On December 15, 2010, Bell was released by the team. 
One day after his release from the Colts, on December 16, 2010, Bell was signed to the Eagles' practice squad. 
Bell was signed off the Eagles' practice squad by the New Orleans Saints on January 5, 2011 before the playoffs began. He was released by the team on September 20, 2011, and re-signed to the Saints' practice squad the following day. 
On December 26, 2011, Bell was signed by the Detroit Lions. He played his first game with the Lions on September 9, 2012, and appeared in all 16 games of the 2012 season, compiling 414 rushing yards on 82 carries (5.0 average) with three rushing touchdowns. He also hauled in 52 receptions for 485 yards; 28 of his receptions were for first downs. 
He was re-signed by the Lions in April 2013. He again played all 16 games for Detroit, finishing with 650 rushing yards and eight rushing touchdowns. Bell also caught 53 passes for 547 yards, as he and teammate Reggie Bush, who had 54 receptions for 506 yards, became the first running back duo in NFL history to both top 500 rushing yards and 500 receiving yards in a season. 
On March 11, 2014, he signed a two-year, $7 million contract extension with $4.3 million in guaranteed money. Combined with the second round tender he signed worth $2.187 million, he was under contract for three years and $9.3 million overall. 
On September 27, 2016, Bell was signed by the Chicago Bears. On October 24, he was released by the Bears. 
The Detroit Lions re-signed Bell on December 6, 2016, after starting running back Ameer Abdullah suffered a fractured foot. 
Bell was born in Benton Harbor, Michigan and majored in criminal justice at Wayne State. While a student at Wayne State, Bell worked as a security guard at the Detroit Lions' training camp. 
Tang is from Selangor. He represented the Federation of Malaya at the 1959 and 1961 Southeast Asian Peninsular Games, winning bronze at the latter in the three positions event. He ranked first in the Malaysian domestic selection trials for shooting at the 1966 Asian Games, and was assigned to the prone rifle team along with Tan Seng Keat, Wong Foo Wah, and Chan Kooi Chye. He later represented Malaysia at the first Asian Shooting Championships in 1967. 
This biographical article relating to sport shooting in Malaysia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Yallourn, Victoria was a company town in Victoria, Australia built between the 1920s and 1950s to house employees of the State Electricity Commission of Victoria, who operated the nearby Yallourn Power Station complex. However, expansion of the adjacent open-cut brown coal mine led to the closure and removal of the town in the 1980s. Whilst the township no longer exists, at the 2006 census, the adjacent region classified as Yallourn had a population of 251. 
The town was planned by A.R. La Gerche, the State Electricity Commission's Architect. (It was often mistakenly thought to have been designed by Walter Burley Griffin, who planned Canberra, Australia's capital city.) 
The design of Yallourn incorporated lessons learnt from the early UK garden cities of Welwyn Garden City and Letchworth Garden City inspired by Ebenezer Howard. The design of Yallourn established a formal central square adjacent to the shopping area and a formal "Broadway" bounded by parks between the shopping area and railway station.  The whole town area was surrounded by a green belt varying between native vegetation, open parkland and sporting and recreational complexes. 
The town boasted outstanding public facilities many years in advance of similar rural or suburban communities of similar size, the majority funded by the S.E.C.V. A close community spirit developed within the town, in part through enthusiastic usage of the excellent facilities. 
Yallourn Post Office opened on 8 October 1923 (being renamed from Western Camp which opened the previous year) and closed in 1980 when the town was removed. An earlier Yallourn Post Office opened in 1921 and was renamed Eastern Camp in 1923. Another Western Camp Post Office opened in 1924 and closed in 1968. 
At its peak the town's population reached 5000. However, in 1968 the S.E.C. decided to demolish the town to make way for further mining. Despite an attempted green ban to save the town, by 1983 demolition was complete, the underlying brown coal reserves being used to feed the Yallourn W Power Station. Many of the people who were relocated from Yallourn built homes in Moe, Morwell, Newborough, Traralgon, Yallourn North and other surrounding towns in the Latrobe Valley. 
Golfers play at the course of the Yallourn Golf Club on Golf Links Road in neighbouring Yallourn Heights. 
In 1974 the SEC made a living history documentary about Yallourn, Born to Die. In June 2008, the ABC Radio program Hindsight presented a two-hour radio documentary about the history of Yallourn, The Model Town and the Machine: A History of Yallourn. 
The Weddings, Parties, Anything song Industrial town is about Yallourn. The band's frontman Mick Thomas was born in Yallourn and lived there as a child, where his father worked for the SEC. 
  The 1974 Havering Council election took place on 2 May 1974 to elect members of Havering London Borough Council in London, England. The whole council was up for election and the council went in no overall control. 
Martin Haldbo Hansen (born 2 February 1969 in Frederikssund) is a Danish rower. Together with Lars Christensen he finished fourth in the double sculls at the 1996 Olympics. 
This biographical article relating to Danish rowing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
He was born in Wellington, Herefordshire, a twin, and the youngest of fourteen siblings. His parents were William Evesham of Burghope Hall and his wife, Jane Haworthe, daughter of Alexander Haworthe. The family moved to London in the early 1580s. 
Evesham studied sculpture under Richard Stephens, a Dutchman who specialised in alabaster work in the 'Southwark' style, at his studio in that town. He also studied metal engraving, and one such inscription remains: a memorial to one Edmond West, dated 1618. This can be found in the parish church in Marsworth, Buckinghamshire. He is known as one of the first members of the gentry to train as a sculptor. 
Between 1600 and 1615, Evesham was living and working in Paris, creating monuments for major figures, including one of the Archbishop of Sens, for the cathedral of Notre-Dame. 
Ruslan Musayev (born 11 May 1979) is a retired Azerbaijani football player who played for the Azerbaijan national team. 
This biographical article relating to Azerbaijani association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Martin, a native of Milwaukee, Wisconsin, got his start writing scenarios and titles for silent films, first at Mascot and then at Republic. 
In the 1940s, he started working for Hal Roach, Monogram, Columbia, and Paramount. By the 1950s, he was working on various television shows, in addition to writing sci-fi films for Roger Corman. His final feature was 1958's In the Money, a Bowery Boys film. 
He had a son, Harvey Martin, with his first wife, Mildred Seib. After Mildred's death, he married Helen Abrams, who he co-wrote Invisible Ghost with. 
He once held a party for his dog at the Knickerbocker Hotel, and invited notable A-listers like Joan Crawford and their dogs. 
The Flint Flashes was a weekly paper published by the Socialist Party in Flint, Michigan during the early 20th Century, possibly started around 1907.  G. W. Starkweather was its manager and G. N. Lawrence its editor. In 1911, the Flint Flashes had a circulation of over 3,000 copies.  
She graduated with Candace Parker of the Los Angeles Sparks and Alexis Hornbuckle of the Detroit Shock and Nicky Anosike of the Minnesota Lynx. 
Bobbitt was the 15th pick in the 2008 WNBA draft on April 9, as the Sparks made her the first pick in the second round. Bobbitt joins teammate Candace Parker and former college teammate Sidney Spencer on the Los Angeles squad, which also features Olympian Lisa Leslie. 
On July 22, 2008, Bobbitt and her teammates were involved in a skirmish with the Detroit Shock. The fight broke out at The Palace of Auburn Hills with 4.6 seconds left in the game, the game ended with the LA Sparks winning. The WNBA suspended a total of 10 players and Detroit assistant coach Rick Mahorn. Bobbitt received an in-game technical and was later suspended two games for leaving the bench. 
The team captains for Penn State's 125th season of football were tackle Quinn Barham, wide receiver Derek Moye, safety Drew Astorino, and defensive tackle Devon Still. 
Penn State began the season with an unsettled quarterback situation. Sophomore Rob Bolden and former walk-on junior Matt McGloin split starting duties in the 2010 season. Rob Bolden was named the starter for the season opener against Indiana State. 
Penn State did not play Michigan, Michigan State, and Minnesota in the 2011 Big Ten football season. The schedule was as follows: 
Seven players were invited to the 2012 NFL Scouting Combine, held February 22 to 28 at Lucas Oil Stadium in Indianapolis, Indiana: Jack Crawford, D'Anton Lynn, Derek Moye, Chaz Powell, Devon Still, Nate Stupar, Johnnie Troutman. 
Carolyn Mackenzie (born in Toronto, Ontario) is a Canadian television journalist for Global News. She is currently the co-host for Global's Morning talk show program The Morning Show. She graduated from Carleton University in 1998 with a Bachelor of Journalism. 
MacKenzie began her career as host of Rogers TV's Toronto Living. She then moved to Sydney, Nova Scotia where she worked as a videographer, reporter, camera operator and editor for ATV/CTV News. She moved to Barrie, Ontario and worked as an anchor for a new television station, New VR. In 2005, MacKenzie moved back to Toronto where she joined Global Television Network. The following year, she won an Edward R. Murrow Award for excellence in journalism for her coverage of transit inaccessibility. 
MacKenzie has covered Queen Elizabeth's Jubilee Visit, reported on Toronto terror suspects, and achieved the "Best Spot News Story" for reporting on a home attack in Vaughan, Ontario.[citation needed] 
In 2013, MacKenzie switched from anchoring Global's weekend news, to anchoring its weekday 11:00 pm news. 
MacKenzie and her firefighter husband Chris have two children. They live in Etobicoke, a suburb of Toronto. Mackenzie has Maltese and Scottish descent. 
This biography of a member of an African royal house is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
After receiving her Bachelor of Commerce in Economics, Essers worked as a strategic consultant for the leading global professional services company Accenture as well as in private equity where she rose to prominence in the commercial and financial sector of South Africa. 
In her early 30s, Essers worked as an independent curator and film producer. Her interest in documentary filmmaking came from its closeness to contemporary art. Her passion for contemporary art stemmed from its ability to effect social change. In an interview, Essers has credited her experiences as the inspiration for her desire "to work in the contemporary art world with artists who make work that can force shifts in thinking." 
Essen took over Goodman Gallery in 2008. Since acquiring the gallery, Essers shifted from showing artists primarily from South Africa to working with artists from the rest of the continent, bringing in artists who actualize social change. Her ambition is to "embrace the shared histories and narratives of South Africa with other parts of the continent and the world." 
Under her directorship, 26 new artists, both established and emerging, from various parts of the Africa and beyond have joined Goodman Gallery. These includes Ghada Amer, Candice Breitz, Kudzanai Chiurai, Mounir Fatmi, Alfredo Jaar, Liza Lou, Hank Willis Thomas, Adam Broomberg & Oliver Chanarin. The most recent additions to the gallery's stable are Shirin Neshat, Kiluanji Kia Henda and revolutionary South African performance collective The Brother Moves On. 
Roaring Brook is a river in Delaware County, New York. It flows into Beaver Kill east of the hamlet of Peakville. 
Oreopanax oroyanus is an evergreen shrub or tree in the family Araliaceae, native to pockets of montane forest on the western slopes of the Peruvian Andes. It occurs at elevations between 2800 and 3800 meters above sea level. 
Vilainiai has been known since 1744. There was a manor and a watermill till the mid-20th century. It developed largely during the Soviet era as a settlement of Land Improvement Institute. 
David Shifrin received early musical training at the Interlochen Center for the Arts in 1963. He attended the Music Academy of the West summer conservatory in 1968 and later graduated from the Curtis Institute of Music in Philadelphia in 1971, where he studied with Anthony Gigliotti. 
In 1984, Shifrin commissioned the construction of a special elongated clarinet, the basset clarinet, to enable the playing of Mozart's Clarinet Concerto and Clarinet Quintet in their original form. Shifrin's 1985 recording of the Mozart Clarinet Concerto and Quintet with Gerard Schwarz and the Mostly Mozart Festival Orchestra was named "Record of the Year" by Stereo Review magazine. 
Shifrin has served as Principal Clarinetist with the Cleveland Orchestra, American Symphony Orchestra (under the direction of Leopold Stokowski), Honolulu Symphony, Dallas Symphony Orchestra, Los Angeles Chamber Orchestra and the New York Chamber Symphony. 
Shifrin joined the faculty of the Yale School of Music in 1987 and was appointed Artistic Director of the Chamber Music Society of Yale and Yale's annual concert series at Carnegie Hall in September 2008. He has also served on the faculties of The Juilliard School, University of Southern California, University of Michigan, Cleveland Institute of Music and the University of Hawaii. In 2007 he was awarded an honorary professorship at China's Central Conservatory of Music in Beijing. 
David Shifrin has been instrumental in broadening the repertoire for clarinet and orchestra by commissioning and championing the works of 20th- and 21st-century American composers including John Adams, Joan Tower, Stephen Albert, Bruce Adolphe, Ezra Laderman, Lalo Schifrin, David Schiff, John Corigliano, Bright Sheng and Ellen Taaffe Zwilich. In 2020, he will premiere a new clarinet concerto that he commissioned from David Ludwig at Chamber Music Northwest in Portland. 
Shifrin's recordings on the Delos, Deutsche Grammophon, Angel/EMI, Arabesque, BMG, Sony Classical Records and CRI labels have consistently garnered praise and awards. In addition to his "Record of the Year" accolade from Stereo Review for his 1985 Mozart album, Shifrin has received Grammy Award nominations for three different recordings: 
Mobley was born near Hillsboro, Jones County, Georgia; attended the common schools; and graduated from Mercer University with a law degree in 1928. While at Mercer, he was a member of Sigma Pi Fraternity. 
Following retirement from the Court, he resided in Atlanta, Georgia until his death on October 14, 1981.  He is interred in Forsyth, Georgia. 
Kundt's tube is an experimental acoustical apparatus invented in 1866 by German physicist August Kundt for the measurement of the speed of sound in a gas or a solid rod. The experiment is still taught today due to its ability to demonstrate longitudinal waves in a gas (which can often be difficult to visualise).  It is used today only for demonstrating standing waves and acoustical forces. 
The detailed motion of the powder is actually due to an effect called acoustic streaming caused by the interaction of the sound wave with the boundary layer of air at the surface of the tube. 
Irene Linda Mugisa, is a female Ugandan politician, psychologist and a member of parliament for the Fort Potal City in the 11th Parliament of Uganda representing the National Resistance Movement (NRM) party. 
She attained a Bachelor's of Social and Community Development degree from Mountain of the Moon University, a Diploma in Counselling Psychology from Uganda Martyrs University, and certificates in gender and development, policy making and implementation in Local Government, Finance Business and Customer Management. 
She has a political experience of a period of 20 years as a councilor and secretary in Kabarole Local Government Council. She is also a community development scientist with advocacy and counselling skills and has worked with some non-governmental organisations. 
In 1997 she served as the General Secretary of Kasusu cell in Central Division, Fort Portal City.   She was also Secretary for Gender at the South Division Fort Portal Municipality. 
In 2001, she was elected the Kabarole District Youth Councilor and later she was appointed the Secretary for Finance and Planning for the district council at the age 24 years and became the youngest among other leaders. 
The Best Years of Our Lives (aka Glory for Me and Home Again) is a 1946 American epic drama film directed by William Wyler, and starring Myrna Loy, Fredric March, Dana Andrews, Teresa Wright, Virginia Mayo and Harold Russell. The film is about three United States servicemen re-adjusting to civilian life after coming home from World War II. 
In 1989, The Best Years of Our Lives was one of the first 25 films selected by the Library of Congress for preservation in the United States National Film Registry for being "culturally, historically, or aesthetically significant". 
Teresa Wright was only thirteen years younger than her on-screen mother, played by Myrna Loy. Michael Hall (1927-2020), with his role as Fredric March's on-screen son, is absent after the first one-third of the film. 
Samuel Goldwyn was inspired to produce a film about veterans after reading an August 7, 1944, article in Time about the difficulties experienced by men returning to civilian life. Goldwyn hired former war correspondent MacKinlay Kantor to write a screenplay. His work was first published as a novella, Glory for Me, which Kantor wrote in blank verse. Robert E. Sherwood then adapted the novella as a screenplay. 
Director Wyler had flown combat missions over Europe in filming Memphis Belle (1944), and worked hard to get accurate depictions of the combat veterans he had encountered. Wyler changed the original casting, which had featured a veteran suffering from post-traumatic stress disorder, and sought out Harold Russell, a non-actor, to take on the exacting role of Homer Parrish. 
For The Best Years of Our Lives, he asked the principal actors to purchase their own clothes, in order to connect with daily life and produce an authentic feeling. Other Wyler touches included constructing life-size sets, which went against the standard larger sets that were more suited to camera positions. The impact for the audience was immediate, as each scene played out in a realistic, natural way. 
Recounting the interrelated story of three veterans right after the end of World War II, The Best Years of Our Lives began filming just over seven months after the war's end, starting on April 15, 1946 at a variety of locations, including the Los Angeles County Arboretum and Botanic Garden, Ontario International Airport in Ontario, California, Raleigh Studios in Hollywood, and the Samuel Goldwyn/Warner Hollywood Studios. 
In The Best Years of Our Lives cinematographer Gregg Toland used deep focus photography, in which objects both close to and distant from the camera are in sharp focus. For the passage of Fred Derry's reliving a combat mission while sitting in the remains of a former bomber, Wyler used "zoom" effects to simulate Derry's subjective state. 
The fictional Boone City was patterned after Cincinnati, Ohio. The "Jackson High" football stadium seen early in aerial footage of the bomber flying over the Boone City, is Corcoran Stadium located at Xavier University in Cincinnati. A few seconds later Walnut Hills High School with its dome and football field can be seen along with the downtown Cincinnati skyline (Carew Tower and Fourth and Vine Tower) in the background. 
After the war, the combat aircraft featured in the film were being destroyed and disassembled for reuse as scrap material. The scene of Derry's walking among aircraft ruins was filmed at the Ontario Army Air Field in Ontario, California. The former training facility had been converted into a scrap yard, housing nearly 2,000 former combat aircraft in various states of disassembly and reclamation. 
Upon its release, The Best Years of Our Lives received extremely positive reviews from critics. Shortly after its premiere at the Astor Theater, New York, Bosley Crowther, film critic for The New York Times, hailed the film as a masterpiece. He wrote, 
It is seldom that there comes a motion picture which can be wholly and enthusiastically endorsed not only as superlative entertainment, but as food for quiet and humanizing thought... In working out their solutions, Mr. Sherwood and Mr. Wyler have achieved some of the most beautiful and inspiring demonstrations of human fortitude that we have had in films." He also said the ensemble casting gave the "'best' performance in this best film this year from Hollywood".
Several decades later, film critic David Thomson offered tempered praise: "I would concede that Best Years is decent and humane... acutely observed, despite being so meticulous a package. It would have taken uncommon genius and daring at that time to sneak a view of an untidy or unresolved America past Goldwyn or the public." 
The Best Years of Our Lives has a 98% "Fresh" rating at Rotten Tomatoes, based on 56 reviews. Chicago Sun Times film critic Roger Ebert put the film on his "Great Movies" list in 2007, calling it "... modern, lean, and honest". 
Among films released before 1950, only Gone With the Wind, The Bells of St. Mary's, The Big Parade and four Disney titles have done more total business, in part due to later re-releases. (Reliable box office figures for certain early films such as The Birth of a Nation and Charlie Chaplin's comedies are unavailable.) 
However, because of the distribution arrangement RKO had with Goldwyn, RKO recorded a loss of $660,000 on the film. 
In 1989, the National Film Registry selected it for preservation in the United States Library of Congress as "culturally, historically, or aesthetically significant". 
American Film Institute included the film as #37 in its 1998 AFI's 100 Years... 100 Movies, as #11 in its 2006 AFI's 100 Years... 100 Cheers, and as #37 in its 2007 AFI's 100 Years... 100 Movies (10th Anniversary Edition). 
In 1947 and 1949, there were four separate half-hour adaptations from Hedda Hopper's This Is Hollywood, Screen Guild Theater (two) and Screen Directors Playhouse. In all four cases, various actors reprised their film roles. 
Littoraria zebra is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Littorinidae, the winkles or periwinkles. 
A Dozen Summers is a 2015 family comedy film. It was written and directed by Kenton Hall and stars Scarlet Hall, Hero Hall, Colin Baker, Ewen MacIntosh, Sarah Warren and Kenton Hall. It received a limited UK cinema release on 21 August 2015. 
Maisie and Daisy McCormack are two, ordinary twelve-year-old girls trying to make their way through the minefield of life in the 21st century. Which, as far as their concerned, is largely a case of trying to work out why grown-ups behave so oddly on such a regular basis. 
When they interrupt a children's adventure story in progress, by scaring off the Narrator, they hijack the film and proceed to tell the story of their own lives, through the lens of the movies they've seem. 
Jacqueline, their mother is a struggling model with an idiosyncratic parenting method. Henry, their father, a writer who has sacrificed more than they realise to give them a stable home life. 
Maisie and Daisy lead us through their day-to-day life -battling bullies Jennifer, Audrey and Beth and the pull of first love -Matty Archer, the school heartthrob for Maisie and, unbeknownst to Daisy, her best friend Samuel for her. 
They take us through bad dates with Jacqueline, home-life with Henry, school life (with added were-wolves and vampires), before finally being forced to take the first tentative steps into adulthood when Jacqueline finally settles down and they decide to set their father up with their teacher, Miss Walters. 
And they need to do it all before the story they interrupted re-asserts itself. It's a race against time -and Maisie and Daisy are learning it's not necessarily a race they can win. 
A Dozen Summers premiered in the US on 19 May 2015 at Phoenix Comicon. In the US, it was also an official selection of Mill Valley Film Festival as part of its Children's Film Fest and Mind the Gap strands. In its native UK, it received a limited theatrical release in the UK from 21 August 2015 via Ballpark Film Distributors. 
"A Dozen Summers" was nominated for or won several awards during its festival run, including nominations for "Best Feature Film for Children" at Fan Chile  and Int. Children's TV Festival Dytiatko in the Ukraine, and wins for Best Screenplay (Kenton Hall) and Best Actress (joint - Scarlet Hall and Hero Hall) at Festival de Cine Fantastico de Torremolinos in Spain. 
Hayden was born in Harrow, Middlesex, the younger sister of Linda Hayden, although their name at birth was Higginson. Their screen surname is an adaptation of their father's first name; he was Haydn Henley Higginson.  Both sisters trained at the Aida Foster Theatre School, and Jane Hayden's first screen role came in 1970, when she played a child in a BBC television film about Lenin, Out of This Spark: The Making of a Revolutionary. 
WR 114 is a Wolf-Rayet star in the constellation of Scutum.  It is an early type star of the carbon sequence (WCE) classified as WC5. 
WR 114 is listed in the Catalogue of galactic Wolf Rayet stars as a possible binary system with an OB companion, but more recent studies have not confirmed this and it is now considered a single WC5 star.  No x-rays have been detected from WR 114, which would be expected by a close hot companion. 
Kichikir is located 20 km southwest of Yanaul (the district's administrative centre) by road. Vedresevo is the nearest rural locality. 
Elijah was the Founder of Hazard, Perry County, Kentucky on November 2, 1820 which he named after General Oliver Hazard Perry, a hero of the War of 1812. Perry County was formed by the Kentucky General Assembly from portions of Clay and Floyd Counties in Kentucky.  
In addition to founding Hazard, Elijah was a Whig politician. In 1832 he was listed as the Jailer for Perry County. In 1833 he was listed as its Magistrate. In 1836 and 1837 he was listed as the Sheriff. In 1840 he served in the Kentucky State House. 
Elijah went by the title 'General' and was known to dress up as a 'general' in his regimental uniform as the 'General of the local militia' for Hazard and Perry County. Although no evidence of an actual command as a General has been found, he is listed as making a materials request after the War of 1812 (for the State of Kentucky). 
During the 1840 Presidential Election, Elijah was running for a seat in the Kentucky House of Representatives which he won. He gave speeches on behalf of the Whig candidate for President, William Henry Harrison. 
Elijah married Sarah 'Sally' Roark, the daughter of patriot US Revolutionary militia war spy, Michael Roark. 
Jake Dillon (born 13 January 1993) is an Irish hurler who plays as a right wing-forward for the Waterford senior team. 
Born in Waterford, Dillon first played competitive hurling whilst at school in De La Salle College. He arrived on the inter-county scene at the age of seventeen when he first linked up with the Waterford minor team, before later lining out with the under-21 side. He made his senior debut in the 2013 National Hurling League. Dillon has since gone on to play a key role in the forwards for Waterford, however, he has yet to claim any silverware. 
At club level Dillon is a one-time Munster medallist with De La Salle. He has also won two championship medals. 
Merkers Adventure Mines are a visitor attraction in Krayenberggemeinde in the Wartburgkreis district of Thuringia, Germany, owned and operated by K+S AG of Kassel. They lie near the village of Merkers. The mines have a long history of salt extraction, and hold the record for concealing large amounts of Nazi gold during World War II. A hundred tons of gold and many works of art presumed to be stolen were discovered by the liberating United States Army in 1945. 
Documents stolen (fictionally) from the Nazi hoard in the mine form the basis for the plot of the Len Deighton novel XPD. 
This article about a Thuringia building or structure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Evelyn Roth (born December 27, 1936) is an interdisciplinary artist who has worked in the areas of textiles, sculpture, performance, dance and interactive fabric arts. She specializes in environmentally sensitive events, festivals, school programs and art gallery exhibits. Roth is based in the town of Maslin Beach, on South Australia's Fleurieu Peninsula. 
From 1973 through the 1980s Roth explored the intersections of sculpture, dance and the environment and formed the Evelyn Roth Moving Sculpture Company. A film Woven in Time was created in 1977 that features Roth's textile work and shows the company in various outdoor settings. Her work became a catalyst for many creators with a wide variety of interests in different countries. 
Roth has lived and worked in Australia since 1996. She has an annual residency with the Storybook Theatre Company in Hawaii. 
Roth has been featured in many solo exhibitions over the years and participated in various festivals and group exhibitions. 
In 1973, she was awarded Artist of the Year by the Vancouver Sun. In 1999 and 2006, Roth won the World of Wearable Art international design competition in New Zealand. 
Centre for Voting Opinion & Trends in Election Research, or CVoter, is an Indian international polling agency headquartered in Delhi, India. 
May 2016 saw elections in Bengal, Assam, Tamil Nadu and Kerala. CVoter was the only one of five polling agencies to predict the Tamil Nadu outcome correctly. 
ABP-C-Voter Opinion Poll 2021 Kerala: analysis of Kerala election, does pinarayi vijayan came back or Congress alliance came, what's the situation of Kerala bjp  
Bihar Opinion Poll 2020: CVoter survey says Nitish Kumar may return; Chirag Paswan unlikely to be a factor  
Bihar Assembly polls: Most exit polls miss the mark The ABP-CVoter exit poll prediction was the closest among all  
Bihar election: Star pollsters fumble as NDA punches way above expectation CVoter, which partnered with Times Now and ABP News, hit the bullseye in its vote share projection  
The UPI/CVoter poll is only one of two mainstream polls that often predicted a Trump victory or shown a nearly tied election in 2016 US Presidential Elections. 
The Vedette was manufactured in Poissy until 1961 and the Ariane until 1963. After that, production continued in Brazil, where the Vedette finally evolved into the Simca Esplanada, following Simca's takeover by Chrysler. 
French production of the V8-engined cars ended in the summer of 1961, by when 173,288 had been produced, although a Simca Chambord was exhibited at the Paris Motor Show in October of that year, suggesting that Simca still had some stock of the cars to clear.   The small-engined 4-cylinder Ariane, of which 166,363 were produced, survived until 1963. 
Following an announcement in July 1959 that it would assemble and market Simca models in Australia, Chrysler Australia produced the Vedette Beaulieu through to 1962, using both fully imported and locally sourced components. 
Wald has a population (as of 2020[update]) of 882.  In 2008 about 10.1% were foreign nationals.  Over the last 10 years the population has decreased at a rate of -6.3%.  Most of the population (as of 2000[update]) speaks German (93.6%), with Serbo-Croatian being second most common (2.3%) and French being third (0.8%). 
In Wald about 77.5% of the population (between age 25-64) have completed either non-mandatory upper secondary education or additional higher education (either university or a Fachhochschule). 
Wald has an unemployment rate of 0.58%.  As of 2005[update], there were 73 people employed in the primary economic sector and about 31 businesses involved in this sector.  133 people are employed in the secondary sector and there are 16 businesses in this sector.  88 people are employed in the tertiary sector, with 29 businesses in this sector. 
Peter Crawley (born 4 January 1969) is an English cricketer. He played four first-class matches for Cambridge University Cricket Club in 1992. 
This biographical article related to an English cricket person born in the 1960s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Born in Brighton, Ontario, he was a barrister before being elected to the House of Commons of Canada from the riding of Peterborough West in the 1921 federal election. A Liberal, he was defeated in the 1925 federal election. From 1922 to 1925, he was the Deputy Speaker and Chairman of Committees of the Whole of the House of Commons. In 1925, he was the Minister of Immigration and Colonization. 
This article about a Liberal Party of Canada Member of the Parliament of Canada is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Suspense is a 1913 American silent short film thriller directed by Lois Weber and Phillips Smalley. Weber also wrote the scenario and stars in the film with Valentine Paul. The film features early examples of a split screen shot and a car chase. The Internet Movie Database lists Lon Chaney as having an unconfirmed and uncredited brief role;  however, this is disputed by silentera.com, which states "Despite attributions to the contrary, Lon Chaney does not appear in the film." 
 In 2020, it was selected for preservation in the United States National Film Registry by the Library of Congress as being "culturally, historically, or aesthetically significant". 
Suspense was released on July 6, 1913 by the Rex Motion Picture Company. A print of the film is preserved at the film archive of the British Film Institute.  It was released on DVD/Blu-ray in 2018 in a box set called "Pioneers: First Women Filmmakers", with a new score by composer Skylar Nam. 
The monastery is located on a 151 meter high hill, 1.5 kilometers north of the village Kontariotissa and 6 kilometers southwest of the city Katerini. 
The monastery is subordinate to the diocese Kitros Katerini, belonging to the archdiocese of Athens. 
In addition to the general liturgies, individual studies and prayers of the nuns shape the everyday life of the monastery. 
This biographical article related to association football in Germany, about a defender, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to a Japanese association football midfielder born in the 1980s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Spencer-Smith's twin brother, Orlando Spencer-Smith represented Hampshire in a single first-class match in 1866 and played six first-class matches for Oxford University. 
This biographical article related to an English cricket person born in the 1840s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
2997 Cabrera, provisional designation 1974 MJ, is an asteroid from the central regions of the asteroid belt, approximately 8 kilometers in diameter. 
Theodore C. Blegen wrote that "some stones with runelike markings actually carry traces left by small prehistoric creatures" which might mislead anyone who was not a professional runologist. 
This biographical article related to an Australian cricket person born in the 1890s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Dr. William R. Harvey Museum of Art is an art museum at Talladega College in Talladega, Alabama in the United States. The museum, which is named after donor and alumni William R. Harvey, includes the Amistad Mutiny murals by Hale Woodruff. 
In 2014, William R. Harvey, an alumnus of Talledega College, and his family, donated $1.3 million to Talladega College which established an art museum in Harvey's name. Groundbreaking for the museum took place in November 2017. The State of Alabama, led by governor Kay Ivey, donated $1.5 million to the construction efforts. 
The Dr. William R. Harvey Museum of Art opened on February 3, 2020. The ribbon cutting included Harvey and Talladega College president Billy C. Hawkins. 
Erik Thompson (born July 22, 1959 in La Jolla, California) is an American voice actor and television announcer. 
After starting out as a disc jockey in San Diego and Los Angeles radio, he began pursuing a career in voiceover. Thompson eventually found work as a promotional voice of HBO, which led to promotional announcements and program narration on several other networks. 
Currently he is narrator of the TV series The Universe on The History Channel, Crimes of the Century on CNN, World's Most Amazing Videos and many other television series featured on Discovery Channel, The Science Channel, The History Channel, NBC, MSNBC, The Weather Channel, National Geographic Channel, Spike and CNN. 
Thompson has performed voice-overs for hundreds of national television and radio commercials, non-broadcast narration, television infomercials, animated voice and web-based content. 
As a promotional voice, he has at various times been a fixture of several television networks, including  Ion Television, National Geographic Channel, Nat Geo Wild, FX, CBS, NBC, HBO, Animal Planet, Showtime, TBS, Discovery Channel, Investigation Discovery, and others. He also is the promotional voice of several local affiliate stations across the United States. 
The Information Awareness Office (IAO) was established by the United States Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency (DARPA) in January 2002 to bring together several DARPA projects focused on applying surveillance and information technology to track and monitor terrorists and other asymmetric threats to U.S. national security by achieving "Total Information Awareness" (TIA). 
Following public criticism that the development and deployment of this technology could potentially lead to a mass surveillance system, the IAO was defunded by Congress in 2003. However, several IAO projects continued to be funded and merely run under different names, as revealed by Edward Snowden during the course of the 2013 mass surveillance disclosures. 
The IAO was established after Admiral John Poindexter, former United States National Security Advisor to President Ronald Reagan, and SAIC executive Brian Hicks approached the US Department of Defense with the idea for an information awareness program after the attacks of September 11, 2001. 
Poindexter and Hicks had previously worked together on intelligence-technology programs for the Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency. DARPA agreed to host the program and appointed Poindexter to run it in 2002. 
The TIA program itself was the "systems-level" program of the IAO that intended to integrate information technologies into a prototype system to provide tools to better detect, classify, and identify potential terrorists with the goal to increase the probability that authorized agencies of the United States could preempt adverse actions. 
Among the other IAO programs that were intended to provide TIA with component data aggregation and automated analysis technologies were the Genisys, Genisys Privacy Protection, Evidence Extraction and Link Discovery, and Scalable Social Network Analysis programs. 
On August 2, 2002, Dr. Poindexter gave a speech at DARPAtech 2002 entitled "Overview of the Information Awareness Office" in which he described the TIA program. 
In addition to the program itself, the involvement of Poindexter as director of the IAO also raised concerns among some, since he had been earlier convicted of lying to Congress and altering and destroying documents pertaining to the Iran-Contra Affair, although those convictions were later overturned on the grounds that the testimony used against him was protected. 
As a result, House and Senate negotiators moved to prohibit further funding for the TIA program by adding provisions to the Department of Defense Appropriations Act, 2004 (signed into law by President Bush on October 1, 2003).  Further, the Joint Explanatory Statement included in the conference committee report specifically directed that the IAO as program manager for TIA be terminated immediately. 
IAO research was conducted along five major investigative paths: secure collaboration problem solving; structured discovery; link and group understanding; context aware visualization; and decision making with corporate memory. 
The Human Identification at a Distance (HumanID) project developed automated biometric identification technologies to detect, recognize and identify humans at great distances for "force protection", crime prevention, and "homeland security/defense" purposes. 
Evidence Extraction and Link Discovery (EELD) developed technologies and tools for automated discovery, extraction and linking of sparse evidence contained in large amounts of classified and unclassified data sources (such as phone call records from the NSA call database, internet histories, or bank records). 
EELD was designed to design systems with the ability to extract data from multiple sources (e.g., text messages, social networking sites, financial records, and web pages). It was to develop the ability to detect patterns comprising multiple types of links between data items or people communicating (e.g., financial transactions, communications, travel, etc.). 
It is designed to link items relating potential "terrorist" groups and scenarios, and to learn patterns of different groups or scenarios to identify new organizations and emerging threats. 
Genisys aimed at developing technologies which would enable "ultra-large, all-source information repositories". 
Another goal was to develop "a large, distributed system architecture for managing the huge volume of raw data input, analysis results, and feedback, that will result in a simpler, more flexible data store that performs well and allows us to retain important data indefinitely." 
Genisys had an internal "Privacy Protection Program." It was intended to restrict analysts' access to irrelevant information on private U.S. citizens, enforce privacy laws and policies via software mechanisms, and report misuse of data. 
Scalable Social Network Analysis (SSNA) aimed at developing techniques based on social network analysis for modeling the key characteristics of terrorist groups and discriminating these groups from other types of societal groups. 
Translingual Information Detection, Extraction and Summarization (TIDES) developed advanced language processing technology to enable English speakers to find and interpret critical information in multiple languages without requiring knowledge of those languages. 
Outside groups (such as universities, corporations, etc.) were invited to participate in the annual information retrieval, topic detection and tracking, automatic content extraction, and machine translation evaluations run by NIST. 
Genoa and Genoa II focused on providing advanced decision-support and collaboration tools to rapidly deal with and adjust to dynamic crisis management and allow for inter-agency collaboration in real-time. Another function was to be able to make estimates of possible future scenarios to assist intelligence officials in deciding what to do, in a manner similar to the DARPA's Deep Green program which is designed to assist Army commanders in making battlefield decisions. 
Wargaming the Asymmetric Environment (WAE) focused on developing automated technology capable of identifying predictive indicators of terrorist activity or impending attacks by examining individual and group behavior in broad environmental context and examining the motivation of specific terrorists. 
Effective Affordable Reusable Speech-to-text (EARS) developed automatic speech-to-text transcription technology whose output is substantially richer and much more accurate than previously possible. The aim of EARS was to focus on everyday human-to-human speech from broadcasts and telephone conversations in multiple languages. It is expected to increase the speed with which speech can be processed by computers by 100 times or more. 
The intent is to create a core enabling technology (technology that is used as a component for future technologies) suitable for a wide range of future surveillance applications. 
Babylon aimed to develop rapid, two-way, natural language speech translation interfaces and platforms. Its goal was to help the warfighter in field environments to complete tasks such as force protection, refugee processing, and medical triage. 
Bio-Surveillance aimed to develop the necessary information technologies and resulting prototype capable of detecting the covert release of a biological pathogen automatically, and significantly earlier than traditional approaches. 
Communicator was to develop "dialogue interaction" technology that enables warfighters to talk with computers, such that information will be accessible on the battlefield or in command centers without ever having to touch a keyboard.  The Communicator Platform was to be both wireless and mobile, and to be designed to function in a networked environment. 
Live exercises were conducted involving small unit logistics operations involving the United States Marines to test the technology in extreme environments. 
TIA's two core projects are now operated by Advanced Research and Development Activity (ARDA) located among the 60-odd buildings of "Crypto City" at NSA headquarters in Fort Meade, MD. ARDA itself has been shifted from the NSA to the Disruptive Technology Office (run by the Director of National Intelligence). They are funded by National Foreign Intelligence Program for foreign counterterrorism intelligence purposes. 
One technology, codenamed "Basketball", is the Information Awareness Prototype System, the core architecture to integrate all the TIA's information extraction, analysis, and dissemination tools. Work on this project is conducted by SAIC through its former Hicks & Associates consulting arm, and run by former Defense and military officials and which had originally been awarded US$19 million IAO contract to build the prototype system in late 2002. 
The other project has been re-designated "Topsail" (formerly Genoa II) and would provide IT tools to help anticipate and preempt terrorist attacks. SAIC has also been contracted to work on Topsail, including a US$3.7 million contract in 2005. 
The first mention of the IAO in the mainstream media came from The New York Times reporter John Markoff on February 13, 2002.  Initial reports contained few details about the program.  In the following months, as more information emerged about the scope of the TIA project, civil libertarians became concerned over what they saw as the potential for the development of an Orwellian mass surveillance system. 
On November 14, 2002, The New York Times published a column by William Safire in which he claimed "[TIA] has been given a $200 million budget to create computer dossiers on 300 million Americans."   Safire has been credited with triggering the anti-TIA movement. 
Depending on when the employee sells the shares, the disposition will be classified as either qualified or not qualified. If the position is sold two years after the offering date and at least one year after the purchase date, the shares will fall under a qualified disposition. If the shares are sold within two years of the offering date or within one year after the purchase date the disposition will not be qualified. These positions will have different tax implications. 
ESPPs differs from other types of employee stock ownership, such as Employee Stock Ownership Plans (ESOPs), both in how the stocks are bought, access to the stocks (either after vesting or upon retirement), taxation for the employees, and how much these plans cost to implement for the company. 
The majority of publicly disclosed ESPPs in the United States are tax-qualified plans that follow the rules of Section 423 of the IRC. 
The largest oil refinery in eastern Canada, owned by Valero Energy Corporation, is located in Saint-Romuald. 
Chordal graphs are a subset of the perfect graphs. They may be recognized in linear time, and several problems that are hard on other classes of graphs such as graph coloring may be solved in polynomial time when the input is chordal. The treewidth of an arbitrary graph may be characterized by the size of the cliques in the chordal graphs that contain it. 
A perfect elimination ordering in a graph is an ordering of the vertices of the graph such that, for each vertex v, v and the neighbors of v that occur after v in the order form a clique. A graph is chordal if and only if it has a perfect elimination ordering. 
Since both this lexicographic breadth first search process and the process of testing whether an ordering is a perfect elimination ordering can be performed in linear time, it is possible to recognize chordal graphs in linear time.  The graph sandwich problem on chordal graphs is NP-complete whereas the probe graph problem on chordal graphs has polynomial-time  complexity. 
The set of all perfect elimination orderings of a chordal graph can be modeled as the basic words of an antimatroid; Chandran et al. (2003) use this connection to antimatroids as part of an algorithm for efficiently listing all perfect elimination orderings of a given chordal graph. 
The largest maximal clique is a maximum clique, and, as chordal graphs are perfect, the size of this clique equals the chromatic number of the chordal graph. Chordal graphs are perfectly orderable: an optimal coloring may be obtained by applying a greedy coloring algorithm to the vertices in the reverse of a perfect elimination ordering. 
In any graph, a vertex separator is a set of vertices the removal of which leaves the remaining graph disconnected; a separator is minimal if it has no proper subset that is also a separator. According to a theorem of Dirac (1961), chordal graphs are graphs in which each minimal separator is a clique; Dirac used this characterization to prove that chordal graphs are perfect. 
An alternative characterization of chordal graphs, due to Gavril (1974), involves trees and their subtrees. 
From a collection of subtrees of a tree, one can define a subtree graph, which is an intersection graph that has one vertex per subtree and an edge connecting any two subtrees that overlap in one or more nodes of the tree. Gavril showed that the subtree graphs are exactly the chordal graphs. 
A representation of a chordal graph as an intersection of subtrees forms a tree decomposition of the graph, with treewidth equal to one less than the size of the largest clique in the graph; the tree decomposition of any graph G can be viewed in this way as a representation of G as a subgraph of a chordal graph. The tree decomposition of a graph is also the junction tree of the junction tree algorithm. 
Interval graphs are the intersection graphs of subtrees of path graphs, a special case of trees. Therefore, they are a subfamily of chordal graphs. 
Split graphs are graphs that are both chordal and the complements of chordal graphs. Bender, Richmond & Wormald (1985) showed that, in the limit as n goes to infinity, the fraction of n-vertex chordal graphs that are split approaches one. 
Ptolemaic graphs are graphs that are both chordal and distance hereditary. Quasi-threshold graphs are a subclass of Ptolemaic graphs that are both chordal and cographs. Block graphs are another subclass of Ptolemaic graphs in which every two maximal cliques have at most one vertex in common. A special type is windmill graphs, where the common vertex is the same for every pair of cliques. 
K-trees are chordal graphs in which all maximal cliques and all maximal clique separators have the same size. Apollonian networks are chordal maximal planar graphs, or equivalently planar 3-trees. Maximal outerplanar graphs are a subclass of 2-trees, and therefore are also chordal. 
Chordal graphs are a subclass of the well known perfect graphs.  Other superclasses of chordal graphs include weakly chordal graphs, cop-win graphs, odd-hole-free graphs, even-hole-free graphs, and Meyniel graphs. Chordal graphs are precisely the graphs that are both odd-hole-free and even-hole-free (see holes in graph theory). 
Every chordal graph is a strangulated graph, a graph in which every peripheral cycle is a triangle, because peripheral cycles are a special case of induced cycles. Strangulated graphs are graphs that can be formed by clique-sums of chordal graphs and maximal planar graphs. Therefore, strangulated graphs include maximal planar graphs. 
The Doomsday Flight is a 1966 television-thriller film written by Rod Serling and directed by William Graham. The cast includes Jack Lord, Edmond O'Brien, Van Johnson, Katherine Crawford, John Saxon, Richard Carlson and Ed Asner. 
The film concerns a bomb placed on an airliner, and the efforts to locate it before it explodes. The terrorist who placed the bomb demands money in exchange for necessary information. The film inspired real-life copycat incidents involving bomb threats.  
At Los Angeles International Airport, a Douglas DC-8 airliner takes off for New York. Shortly after takeoff, the airline receives a bomb threat.  The stranger (Edmond O'Brien) on the telephone asks for a sum of $100,000 in small denominations. He also states that the bomb is hidden in the cabin. The stranger is actually a former engineer who worked in the aviation industry. 
The company Chief Pilot Bob Shea (Richard Carlson) decides to warn the flight crew. He orders pilot Capt. Anderson (Van Johnson), to circle around Las Vegas. He also asks the flight crew to search for the bomb on board. It is revealed that the bomb has an aneroid, altitude-sensitive switch and will detonate if the aircraft lands. 
Meanwhile, the search to find the bomb on board the flight involves the opening of passenger hand luggage and tearing open several areas in the cabin and cockpit. All efforts are unsuccessful. The passengers are alerted to the emergency and start to panic. 
The bomb threat caller telephones again to tell the police how to pay the ransom. A delivery man will simply come to the airport and take the money. The police follow the van closely, but the van has a serious accident on a ring road and catches fire. The terrorist has trouble believing the police who confirm that they are preparing a second payment. He seeks refuge at a bar, where he drinks a lot and starts talking to the bartender (Malachi Throne) who is suspicious of the caller. 
When the caller has a heart attack, the bartender calls the police who come running, but the man is dead. The FBI Special Agent Frank Thompson (Jack Lord) then interrogates the bartender asking him to report the exact words of the terrorist. The police discover that the bomb will explode if the airliner drops below 4,000 feet. 
The chief pilot then decides to tell the flight crew to land the aircraft at Stapleton International Airport in Denver, Colorado, whose altitude is higher, and landing there will not trigger the bomb. After the airliner is safely on the ground, the flight crew meet in the airline operations room of his company. 
The Doomsday Flight premiered on NBC in the United States on December 13, 1966 and was the most watched made-for-TV movie to that time, with a Nielsen rating of 27.5 and an audience share of 48% until it was surpassed by Heidi in 1968. 
The Doomsday Flight was released theatrically in cinemas in other countries around the world, and distributed by the Rank Organisation in the UK. 
In a contemporary review by J. Gould in The New York Times decried the "exploitation of bomb scares on passenger airplanes" engendered by The Doomsday Flight. [N 1] 
Sigfrido Ranucci (born 24 August 1961) is an Italian journalist, known for directing Fallujah, The Hidden Massacre. 
Wind River is a 2017 neo-Western murder mystery film written and directed by Taylor Sheridan. The film stars Jeremy Renner and Elizabeth Olsen as a U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service tracker and an FBI agent, respectively, who try to solve a murder on the Wind River Indian Reservation in Wyoming. Gil Birmingham, Jon Bernthal and Graham Greene also star. 
Sheridan has said that he wrote the film to raise awareness of the issue of the high number of Indigenous women who are raped and murdered, both on and off reservations. 
Lambert discovers that Natalie's new boyfriend is Matt Rayburn, who works security at a nearby oil drilling site. The next day, Lambert and Banner discover Matt's body, nude and ravaged by scavenging wildlife. Lambert tells Banner about the death three years earlier of his 16-year-old daughter Emily, who was a friend of Natalie's. Emily's body was discovered in the snow, following a party at the Lambert house while his wife and he were away. No one was charged in her death. 
A flashback shows Natalie in bed with Matt, in what seems like a loving relationship. Unexpectedly, Matt's colleagues barge into Matt's trailer after a night of hard drinking. Matt's roommate Pete taunts them and tries to sexually assault Natalie, which provokes Matt to violence. The other guards retaliate by beating Matt while Pete rapes Natalie. Matt's attempt to fight back gives Natalie an opportunity to escape, while the group beats Matt to death. 
According to Sheridan, he was inspired to write this film because he learned about the "thousands of actual stories just like it": referring to the high number of Indigenous women who are victims of sexual assault and/or murder. He wrote and directed the movie to make more people aware of this problem. 
The film is the third installment of Taylor Sheridan's trilogy of "the modern-day American frontier", the first being Sicario in 2015, and Hell or High Water the next year. Principal photography on the film began on March 12, 2016, in Utah and lasted until April 25, 2016. 
The Weinstein Company acquired the distribution rights on May 13, 2016, during the 2016 Cannes Film Festival. In January 2017, it was announced that the company would no longer distribute the film, but the distribution deal was later finalized. It had a limited release on August 4, 2017, before going wide on August 18. 
In October 2017, following reporting on the Harvey Weinstein sexual abuse scandal, Lionsgate announced that it would distribute the film on home media and streaming services. The Weinstein Company (TWC) name and logo were omitted from the credits, trailer, and packaging. As a result, The Weinstein Company finally stopped distributing the film. Sheridan had required that TWC be deleted from the materials, and demanded that all money Weinstein would have made on this work be donated to charity. 
Wind River grossed $33.8 million in the United States and Canada and $11.2 million in other territories for a worldwide total of $45 million, against a production budget of $11 million. 
Owen Gleiberman of Variety described Wind River as a "humanistic crime drama, though this one has more skill than excitement". Chris Plante of The Verge described it as "a thrilling, violent finale to the Hell or High Water and Sicario trilogy", and as "Coen brothers noir meets the case of the week." 
In a High Country News article titled "Why do white writers keep making films about Indian Country?", Native commentator Jason Asenap praises the film as "a thinking-person's thriller" full of complex characters, and describes the film's focus on missing Native American women as "admirable." He criticizes the film for perpetuating the "dying Indians" motif:  
The filmmakers were criticized for casting non-Native actors in some of the Native American roles. Kelsey Chow had been advertised as Eastern Band Cherokee, leading the Eastern Band Cherokee to issue a statement that she is neither an enrolled member nor descended from the tribe. 
Commodore Power/Play was one of a pair of computer magazines published by Commodore Business Machines in the United States in support of their 8-bit home computer lines of the 1980s. The other was called Commodore Interface, changed to just Commodore in 1981, Commodore Microcomputer in 1983, and finally to Commodore Microcomputers in 1984 and for the rest of its run. The two magazines were published on an alternating, bimonthly schedule. 
See tips for writing articles about magazines. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
Both Abel Arena and Cooper Gym are available for other events, including high school basketball and hockey. 
In occupied Poland, she engaged in underground education for children and continued to write children's stories for the underground press, even during the Warsaw Uprising. During this time she contributed to the resistance-published children's magazine "Jawnutka". 
Live at Montreux and Northsea is an album by drummer Art Blakey and The Jazz Messengers Big Band recorded in 1980 at the Montreux Jazz Festival in Switzerland (with one track recorded at the North Sea Jazz Festival in the Netherlands) and released on the Dutch Timeless label. 
Scott Yanow, writing for AllMusic called it "a historically significant and rather enjoyable release". 
The Yavneh Academy is a Modern Orthodox Jewish day school located in Paramus, in Bergen County, New Jersey, United States. It educates students from pre-kindergarten through eighth grade. The school's motto is "Stimulating the mind, Nourishing the soul." The school was originally established in Paterson, New Jersey. 
In 2006, the SINAI Special Needs Institute, an educational program for Jewish children and young adults with special needs, opened its first full-time Jewish elementary school program in Northern New Jersey at Yavneh Academy. 
Yavneh used that campus until 1981, when it took over a five acre school campus in Paramus. In 1986, the Paterson Public Schools district opened the Rosa L. Parks School of Fine and Performing Arts, a high school, on the Griggs campus. 
Yavneh Academy has received awards including: winning the Stock Market Game in New Jersey for middle school students in 1995, 1996, 2001, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2012, and 2016. 
Yavneh Academy has a basketball team and a hockey team.  The hockey team won the Yeshiva League 2006 floor hockey Championships beating SAR Academy, and were the runners-up in the 2007 league losing to SAR Academy, and making it to the championship game in 2008, against Moriah School of Englewood. The girls' basketball team won the 2003 championship, going undefeated. Now, they also have a girls' hockey team. 
In 2013-14, Yavneh's boys' basketball team finished with a 9-1 record in the regular season.  Having secured home court advantage, Yavneh went on to beat Ramaz in the quarterfinals in a 58-44 victory and defeated Moriah 59-39 in the semifinals to make it to the championship game.  They lost to the undefeated SAR Sting in the championship game. 
In 2013-14, the boys' soccer team had an undefeated championship season in the first year of the middle school yeshiva soccer league. 
An International Certificate of Competence (ICC) is a certificate, which may be issued to anyone who has successfully completed certain national boating licenses or has passed an examination to prove the necessary competence for pleasure craft operation. ICC is the only sailing license approved by United Nations as a legitimate recreational sailing license. 
Persons wishing to be tested in the United Kingdom need to be tested by an approved ICC test centre  
Although only guaranteed to be accepted in countries that have adopted the relevant UN Resolution, the ICC is a useful document to carry and will generally be accepted where proof of competence is required. 
In very general terms an ICC is required for the inland waterways of Europe and for inland and coastal waters of Mediterranean countries. For the coastal waters of Northern Europe the ICC is generally  not required, however to all of these generalisations there are exceptions. 
The ICC is a product of the United Nations Economic Commission for Europe Inland Water Committee (UN ECE IWC) Resolution 40 (hereafter called Resolution 40). This states that the ICC may be issued by a government of one state to its nationals and residents who may be on the waters of a foreign state, on condition that both accept the requirements and conditions set out in Resolution 40. 
Governments may appoint competent authorities to issue ICC on their behalf. Globally International Yacht Training Worldwide (IYT) has been delegated such authority by both Ireland and the UK, and the Royal Yachting Association (RYA) and the British Sub-Aqua Club (BSAC) are both authorized by the UK. 
The ICC provides documentary assurance from one government to another that the holder meets the levels of competence laid down in Resolution 40. However, the acceptance of Resolution 40 is often caveated. 
In the mid-nineties, the Working Group on Inland Water Transport considered that Resolution 14 needed updating and strengthening and on 16 October 1998 the Working Party adopted their revisions as Resolution 40; this replaced Resolution 14. 
The International Certificate for Operators of Pleasure Craft created in Resolution 40 is now more commonly referred to as the International Certificate of Competence or simply ICC. The ICC is only applicable where the visited state has also adopted or recognises the ICC as a valid standard of competency. 
Resolution 40 not only included operators of pleasure craft bound for or on the inland and coastal waters of foreign states but specifically included bareboat charter vessels. Significantly, it also set out the nautical, regulatory and technical competency requirements to be achieved and a minimum age (16 years of age) for the issue of an ICC irrespective of individual national schemes. 
The following UNECE member states have adopted Resolution 40 and thus officially accept the ICC as a proof of competence in their territories: 
Austria, Belarus, Belgium, Bulgaria, Croatia, Czech Republic, Finland, Germany, Hungary, Ireland, Latvia, Lithuania, Luxembourg, Netherlands, Norway, Romania, Slovakia, South Africa (not a member state), Switzerland the United Kingdom and Ukraine. 
The following UNECE member states have adopted the earlier Resolution 14. Also these countries accept the ICC: 
Finland has adopted the resolution but does not require the ICC for normal yachts ("sufficient age and skill" is enough) and does not use CEVNI for its inland waters. 
Some official and some quality assured non-official certificates (mainly the coastal master certificates of the navigation association and the scouts) are regarded as fulfilling knowledge requirements of ICC for coastal waters. Courses for the CEVNI part are arranged separately by many organisations. The certificate itself is issued by the authorities, usually based on such documents. 
The ICC is required for masters of boats chartered manned for international voyages (in addition to a domestic certificate) and for masters of recreational vessels with length more than 24 metres. 
The Irish Sailing Association is uniquely authorized by the Irish Department of Transport to issue ICC's to only Irish Citizens.  Holders of the ICC license are able to operate recreational vessels for recreational use in European waters where an ICC is required, and proves to local authorities that the skipper has the required Irish qualifications for skippering the vessel. 
International Yacht Training Worldwide (IYT Worldwide), The Royal Yachting Association (RYA),  and the British Sub-Aqua Club (BSAC) are with the authority of the Maritime and Coastguard Agency (MCA) approved to issue ICCs to those who meet the mandated requirements and the competency requirements. 
ICC's are able to be issued by these Associations to citizens of Nations who are not signatories. In this manner, for example, USA citizens can gain the ICC. In the USA, NauticEd International Sailing Education facilitates the issuance of the ICC through the UK government via the Royal Yachting Association. 
The UK ICC was only available to British citizens or bona fide British residents. This has now been extended to cover other Nationals. 
Glycomyces scopariae is a bacterium from the genus of Glycomyces which has been isolated from roots of the plant Scoparia dulcis from Xishuangbanna in China. 
Teleprompter again finished unplaced on his seasonal debut but then failed by only a short-head against Prismatic in Lockinge Stakes (then a Group Two race) at Newbury Racecourse. In July he was ridden by Tony Ives as won his second Pacemaker International, beating Northern Plain by six lengths and then finished second to Parliament in the Land of Burns Stakes. 
At the end of the season it was announced that most all-aged Group One races in Europe would be opened to geldings in the following year. The successes of Teleprompter were regarded as being an important factor in bringing about this change. 
Teleprompter began his final season promisingly by finishing second to Vertige in the Sandown Mile after leading until the final strides. In his next race however, he aggravated an old back injury when finishing unplaced in the Lockinge Stakes. He failed to reproduce his best form when he finished unplaced in the Queen Anne Stakes and the Pacemaker International and was retired. 
Teleprompter was retired from racing to his birthplace, Lord Derby's Woodlands Stud, and later spent many years at the New England Stud. He died at the age of twenty-three in 2003 and was buried at the Stanley House stud in Newmarket. 
Per Ola Markus Lindgren (born 29 February 1964, in Halmstad) is a Swedish former handball player and current coach. He is the head coach for IFK Kristianstad since 2012 and was head coach for Sweden from 2008 to 2016. As a player, he won two World Championships, four European Championships and participated in four Olympic Games. He also won four Swedish Championships with Drott. 
Domestic Disturbance is a 2001 American psychological thriller film directed by Harold Becker and starring John Travolta, Vince Vaughn, Teri Polo, Steve Buscemi, and Matt O'Leary. 
In Southport, Maryland, Susan Morrison (Teri Polo), recently divorced from her husband Frank (John Travolta), a struggling boat builder, is marrying a younger and wealthier Rick Barnes (Vince Vaughn). Danny (Matt O'Leary), Susan and Frank's twelve-year-old son, is clearly unhappy that his mother is remarrying. Susan asks Frank to allow Rick to go sailing with him and Danny, to help Danny bond with and accept Rick as a stepfather. 
Danny reports the murder to his father and to the local police. Rick, however, has managed to dispose of most of the evidence, and is widely considered a pillar of the local community as he invested his money in the area, whereas Danny has a history of lying and misdemeanors. Frank believes his son, though, stemming from Rick's notable unease around Ray at the ceremony and the fact that Danny never lies to him. 
In April 2001, while shooting the film in Wilmington, North Carolina, actor Steve Buscemi was slashed in the face while intervening in a bar fight between his friend Vince Vaughn, screenwriter Scott Rosenberg and a local man, Timothy Fogerty, who allegedly instigated the brawl. 
Paramount Pictures held the world premiere of Domestic Disturbance at the studio on October 30, 2001. The film's stars were in attendance as well as many other guest celebrities. The film was then officially released on November 2, 2001 in 2,910 theaters throughout the United States. It did not prove to be a financial success, grossing only $45,246,095 domestically. By the end of its run, the film was only able to gross $54 million worldwide from its $75 million budget. 
Domestic Disturbance was received poorly by critics, and gains a 24% rating on Rotten Tomatoes based on 100 reviews, with an average rating of 4/10. The consensus reads: "Well-made but extremely predictable, Domestic Disturbance is an average thriller that may work better on TV." On Metacritic, it holds a score of 29 out of 100, based on reviews from 27 critics, indicating "generally unfavorable reviews". 
Roger Ebert awarded it one-and-a-half stars out of a possible four, reciting an anecdote about how the Chicago film critics had been shown the wrong last reel. He saw the correct one the following Monday, and scathingly said of it in his review: "The earlier reel was lacking the final music. Music is the last thing wrong with that reel." 
The idea of a union for inmates of mental hospitals was first posed by Archie Meek, a 91 year old geriatric patient. He made this remark to Thomas Ritchie, another patient who was helping Archie shave at the time. 
Matthew Vincent Lattanzi (born February 1, 1959) is an American former actor and dancer. He is most commonly recognized as the first husband of singer and actress Dame Olivia Newton-John, and for his acting in films such as My Tutor and the soap opera Paradise Beach. 
While filming Xanadu, Lattanzi met Olivia Newton-John, whom he married in 1984. The couple had one daughter, Chloe Rose Lattanzi, born on January 17, 1986. By 1992, his acting career was largely over, and he took a job as a contractor for a homebuilding company in California. Lattanzi and Newton-John moved to their farm in Australia in 1993 so that he could audition for the new soap opera, Paradise Beach. He won a six-month contract for the show. 
On April 24, 1995, Lattanzi and Newton-John announced their divorce. From 1997 to 2003, Lattanzi was in a relationship with Cindy Jessup.  
Lattanzi's career consists mostly of small movie parts, though he did have a starring role in 1983's My Tutor.  Other film credits include Rich and Famous, Grease 2, That's Life!, Roxanne, Catch Me If You Can, and Diving In. Lattanzi also had a significant role in the Australian soap opera, Paradise Beach, and he appeared in four of Newton-John's music videos: "Landslide", "Soul Kiss", "Toughen Up" and "Can't We Talk It Over In Bed". 
Born in Lisbon, Correia grew up in the Santa Cruz neighbourhood of Benfica with four siblings, two brothers and two sisters. He first started at C.F. Benfica, before joining the under-19 team of S.L. Benfica in 1965, his boyhood club from which he had been a registered member since birth. 
Correia represented his country in the Brazil Independence Cup, also in 1972. He was regularly called up until 1979, but failed to appear in any major competition. 
In June 2015, Correia had his left leg amputated because of problems related to his circulatory system. On 20 July of the following year, he suffered a second stroke that put him in a coma, and after five days in critical condition he died at the age of 66. 
As of 2001[update] India census, Khariya had a population of 9836. Males constitute 55% of the population and females 45%. Khariya has an average literacy rate of 72%, higher than the national average of 59.5%: male literacy is 79%, and female literacy is 63%. In Khariya, 15% of the population is under 6 years of age. 
The Hospital Provincial de Rosario (Spanish, Provincial Hospital of Rosario) is a general hospital in Rosario, Argentina, which depends on the Health Ministry of the provincial state of Santa Fe. It is a public hospital (managed partly by an elected council) and serves as the base hospital for Programmatic Area III of Zone VIII of the Santa Fe Ministry of Health. 
The HPR was the first hospital in Rosario and the first in the south of Santa Fe. It was inaugurated on 4 October 1855, with the name Hospital de Caridad (Charity Hospital), by the Sociedad de Beneficencia de Rosario (Charitable Society of Rosario). At the time of its foundation, the hospital was outside the main populated area of the then-small village of Rosario (which had little over 3,000 inhabitants). 
Presently the HPR is located in the center of the city (taking up a whole block) and serves an area with a population estimate of 386,000 residents, treating 182,000 people a year, admitting 25 patients a day, and performing 300 surgeries per month. The hospital also manages 16 primary care centers distributed in the southern part of Rosario. 
This article about an Argentine building or structure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article related to a hospital in South America is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Alexis Joann-Louise Kaufman (born August 9, 1991) is an American professional wrestler. She is currently signed to WWE, where she performs on the Raw brand under the ring name Alexa Bliss. In 2013, Bliss signed a contract with WWE and was assigned to their Performance Center and developmental brand NXT. She made her main roster debut on the SmackDown brand in 2016, later becoming a two-time SmackDown Women's Champion and the first woman to hold the title twice. 
Bliss was transferred to the Raw brand in 2017 and would go on to become a three-time Raw Women's Champion, with her initial reign making her the first woman to win both the Raw and SmackDown Women's titles. She and Nikki Cross are also the first two-time Women's Tag Team Champions in WWE history, making Bliss the second Women's Triple Crown Champion. In 2018, she won both the second women's Money in the Bank ladder match and first women's Elimination Chamber match. 
Bliss went to defend her title on September 24 at No Mercy in a fatal five-way match against Bayley, Nia Jax, Emma, and Sasha Banks. Bliss was then confronted the following night on Raw by Mickie James due to remarks Bliss made about her. At TLC: Tables, Ladders & Chairs, Bliss defeated James to retain the title, and did so again on the October 30 episode of Raw. 
At The Horror Show at Extreme Rules, Bliss appeared during the cinematic match between Braun Strowman and Bray Wyatt. Wyatt used Bliss' image as Strowman had an affection for her. Bliss then became involved in the storyline between Strowman and Wyatt, as she was attacked by Wyatt's alter ego, The Fiend, on the July 31 episode of SmackDown. Bliss' involvement with The Fiend would continue in the coming months, with Bliss going into trance and using his finisher, Sister Abigail. 
Following Wrestlemania 37, Bliss declared that The Fiend was her mentor, but now she no longer needed him. She then introduced her new friend, a demonic looking doll named Lilly. 
As her primary finisher, Bliss uses a diving barani flip from the top rope dubbed Twisted Bliss, which originates from her background in gymnastics and was initially called the Sparkle Splash. As an alternate finisher, she also employs a snap DDT known as the Twisted DDT. During her alliance with "The Fiend" Bray Wyatt, she adopted his finishing move, a swinging reverse STO called Sister Abigail. 
On July 24, 2017, it was announced that Bliss would be joining the seventh season of Total Divas. She is also a recurring guest on Xavier Woods' YouTube channel UpUpDownDown, where she goes by the nickname Miss Bliss. In November 2019, she defeated Cesaro, Rusev, and The Miz in the finals of a Brawlhalla tournament to win Cesaro's UpUpDownDown Championship, but she immediately lost the title to Tyler Breeze in Saturday Night Slam Masters. 
In early 2020, Bliss appeared in the music video for a song by Bowling for Soup, having previously cited them as her favorite band. 
On June 23, 2020, Bliss confirmed her long rumored WWE podcast, which is titled Uncool with Alexa Bliss and debuted on September 22, 2020. 
Kaufman has been an avid fan of Disney since the age of three, which she attributes to her family's annual trips to Walt Disney World despite their low income at the time. She enjoys cosplaying, which has inspired many of her wrestling outfits such as Freddy Krueger, Harley Quinn, Iron Man, The Riddler, Supergirl, and Chucky. She also supports her hometown Columbus Blue Jackets. She has cited Trish Stratus and Rey Mysterio as her influences in wrestling. 
Kaufman was previously engaged to fellow professional wrestler Matthew Adams, better known by the ring name Buddy Murphy. They ended their engagement in 2018, but remained friends. She had a pet pig named Larry-Steve, whom she shared with Adams, but the pig died on May 25, 2021. As of February 2020, she had started dating American musician Ryan Cabrera. They became engaged on November 14, 2020. 
"He's a Whore"/"The Model" is the last single released by American noise rock band Big Black in 1987. Both songs on this release are covers, the first track by Cheap Trick and the second by Kraftwerk. The cover of the 7" sleeve imitates both of the original singles. Both songs can be found on the CD version of the album Songs About Fucking, while the vinyl version includes only "The Model" (with a different intro). 
Everything is a desktop search utility for Windows that can rapidly find files and folders by name. It is released under a free software license that allows modification and commercial redistribution, requiring only attribution. 
When Everything first runs, it creates an index of the names of every file and folder on all NTFS and ReFS volumes on the system from file metadata, in the case of NTFS from the NTFS Master File Table. By default, all mounted NTFS and ReFS volumes are indexed. Once created, the index is continually updated by the application; in the case of NTFS the updates are fetched from the NTFS change journal. 
Specific folders on any file system can also be added to the index, but the indexing of folders not using NTFS or ReFS will be slow, although searching using the completed index will not be.  
Regardless of the file system used on the indexed drives and folders, Everything searches its index for file names matching a user search expression, which may be a fragment of the target file name or a regular expression, displaying intermediate and immediate results as the search term is entered.  
Because Everything does not index content and, for NTFS drives, relies only on the NTFS change journal to filter file updates, the only file system activity it requires on NTFS drives is updating its index, and it uses very little memory and processor time to provide its service when only indexing NTFS and ReFS drives. 
Take Command Console incorporates the internal command everything to allow command line access to the program. 
No updates of Everything were issued from November 2009 to January 2013. Since then the program has received many updates. 
These alternative and also free search engines use the same technique of reading the NTFS index directly: 
Hulme Hall in Port Sunlight, on the Wirral Peninsula in Merseyside, England, is a Grade II listed building, first registered as such in 1965. 
The building was designed by William Owen and his son, Segar. Built in 1901 as a women's dining hall, it became an art gallery from 1911, housing some of the collection of William Lever, 1st Viscount Leverhulme, prior to its removal to the Lady Lever Art Gallery around 1922. During World War I, the artworks were packed away and the building housed refugees from Belgium. 
The Beatles gave four performances at Hulme Hall, the first on 7 July 1962. On 18 August 1962, Hulme Hall served as the venue for Ringo Starr's first official performance as a Beatle following the sacking of Pete Best; the band's first performance as the Fab Four. Other shows followed on 6 and 27 October 1962. 
It has been used as a community centre and, as of 2015[update], it is used as a conference, banqueting and wedding centre. 
Kerry O'Flaherty (born 15 July 1981) is an Irish runner competing primarily in the 3000 metres steeplechase. She competed at the 2015 World Championships in Beijing without qualifying for the final. O'Flaherty competed in the 2016 Olympic Games. She has also competed at two European Championships and one European Indoor Championships. 
She began competitively training in 2009. She had hoped to qualify for the 2012 Summer Olympics in London but was plagued by an Achilles injury. 
She improved on her Northern Ireland 3000m steeplechase record at the 2014 International Flanders Athletics Meeting in Oordegem with a time of 9:52.94, finishing fifth. She was injured at the same event the previous year and missed most of the season due to a faulty water barrier. Her time qualified her for the 2014 Commonwealth Games in Glasgow. 
She qualified for the 2015 World Championships and the 2016 Summer Olympics after running a 9:42.61 at the 2015 Letterkenny AC International. She beat her personal best time by ten seconds. O'Flaherty competed in the third heat of the World Championships and finished with a time of 10:05.10. She was disappointed by her finish and did not qualify for the finals. 
In the 2016 European Championships, she finished in sixth place, behind her teammate Sara Treacy, and achieved a personal best time of 9:45.53, advancing to the finals. All three Irish athletes advanced to the finals, the first time ever in any event at the European Championships. She finished in 12th place with 9:45.88. She was also part of the bronze-medal winning Irish team that raced at the 2016 European Cross Country Championships. 
O'Flaherty competed in her first Olympics, the 2016 Games in Rio, at the age of 35. She finished the 3000m steeplechase with a time of 9:45.35, placing 14th in the heat. It was her season best, but she did not advance to the finals. 
She competed in the 3000m steeplechase at the 2018 European Championships, but did not qualify for the finals after finishing her heat in 10:09.81 and 17th place. 
She qualified for the 2018 European Athletics Championships during the IFAM Flanders International. She placed third with 9:53.00, qualifying under the B standard. 
In 2019 O'Flaherty was working to qualify for the World Championships. During the European Permit Meeting in Spain, she was hit from behind as she attempted to jump a barrier. When she landed, she broke her fifth metatarsal, ending her hopes to qualify for the World Championships. 
Asparagaceae, known as the asparagus family, is a family of flowering plants, placed in the order Asparagales of the monocots. Its best known member is Asparagus officinalis, garden asparagus. 
Asparagaceae includes 114 genera with a total of approximately 2,900 known species. Unless otherwise noted, the alphabetical list below is based on genera accepted by the World Checklist of Selected Plant Families as in the family Asparagaceae (with synonyms from the same source). The reference against the subfamily name is to the source which places the genus in that subfamily. 
James Satalin (born November 18, 1943) is an American former college basketball coach and the current radio play-by-play announcer for Syracuse men's basketball. Satalin spent 16 seasons as a head coach for St. Bonaventure and Duquesne. 
Following his coaching career, Satalin stayed close to college basketball. He oversaw officials with both the Big East Conference and Atlantic 10 and was national director of Coaches vs. Cancer. In 2013, he began doing radio play-by-play for Syracuse men's basketball. 
Single Flame, the second album of British singer-songwriter Lucy Ward, was released in the United Kingdom by Navigator Records on 19 August 2013. It was critically acclaimed and received a four-starred review in The Guardian. 
In a four-starred review for The Guardian, Robin Denselow said that Lucy Ward "proves to be an even more mature and thoughtful singer-songwriter than she was on Adelphi Has to Fly" and described her follow-up album as "impressive and original" and "a brooding, often angry set that deals with everything from politics to love, death and personal tragedy, with a couple of powerful traditional songs added in". 
Hazel Davis, for americanaUK, described it as a much angrier album than her debut release but "a genuinely eclectic sounding collection" with "songs that are Thea Gilmore-good". 
Simon Holland, for Folk Radio UK, said that the album was "charged, emotive and utterly compelling". 
Single Flame was produced by Stu Hanna from Megson, who also performs on the album, with his wife Debbie Hanna providing backing vocals. The photography and artwork on the CD cover was by Elly Lucas. 
This biographical article relating to weightlifting in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Like all Plasmodium species P. uluguruense has both vertebrate and insect hosts. The vertebrate hosts for this parasite are reptiles. 
Young schizonts are elongate with blunt ends and become oval or round following the second nuclear division. Mature schizonts are smaller than the host cell nuclei, produce 4-12 merozoites and are usually arranged as a fan. 
Immature gametocytes like young schizonts are elongate with blunt ends. Mature gametocytes are usually oval and approximate the host cell nuclei in size. Their pigment granules concentrated in a single focus. 
Basile was one of only two knights defending the castle and was renowned amongst the English attackers for his appearance: the castle was so ill-prepared for King Richard's siege that Basile was forced to defend the ramparts with cobbled-together armour and a makeshift shield constructed from a frying pan, much to the mirth of the English besiegers. It is perhaps this dismissive attitude that led to Richard taking little precaution on the day he was shot. 
Although there are numerous variations of the story's details, it is generally agreed that King Richard ordered that Basile suffer no punishment (and, in fact, that he be paid 100 shillings).  Nevertheless, after Richard's death, mercenary captain Mercadier disregarded his orders and Basile was flayed alive and then hanged. 
'Peter Basili' or 'Pierre Basile' is not believed to be his real name, since it variates with the names 'John Sabroz' and 'Bertran de Gurdun' as the name of Richard's killer. In truth, it is considered unlikely that contemporary chroniclers knew his real name. 
Margaret Seton, Lady Paisley (died 1616) was a Scottish aristocrat and a favourite of Anne of Denmark. 
In July 1568 Regent Moray granted her the goods of a number of men from Tranent, Winton, Longniddry, Winchburgh, and elsewhere, all tenants and servants of her father. They were implicated in the escape of Mary, Queen of Scots from Lochleven Castle and supporting her at the battle of Langside. Mary had first made her way to the Seton castle of Niddry in West Lothian and Lord Seton's retainers had escorted her to Hamilton. 
After she married Claud Hamilton in 1574 she was known as "Lady Paisley". Married women in early modern Scotland did not change their surnames when they married. She continued to sign her letters, "Margaret Setoun". 
Her brother, Alexander Seton, asked for leave from his duties in Edinburgh to visit her at Paisley in December 1591 because she was ill. 
She and her mother Isobel Hamilton, Lady Seton, became favourites of Anne of Denmark, the wife of James VI. 
On 25 December 1602 Beatrix Ruthven, forbidden from the royal presence since the Gowrie Conspiracy, was smuggled into the apartments of Anne of Denmark at Holyrood House posing as a gentlewoman servant to Lady Paisley and her daughter Lady Angus, at the queen's request. 
Lady Paisley wrote from Monkton to Anne of Denmark on 1 September 1610. She was hoping that the queen could help her avoid censure by the Presbytery of Ayr. She wrote that she had suffered from debilatating headaches and toothache for the last four years. 
She married Claud Hamilton, 1st Lord Paisley in August 1574 at Niddry Castle. The wedding was celebrated with "great triumphs". Their children included: 
Three children who died as infants, Margaret (1577), Henry (1585), and Alexander (1587), are commemorated by an inscription at Paisley Abbey. 
KXDG is a mainstream rock radio station licensed to Webb City, Missouri, owned by Zimmer Radio Group. KXDG began broadcasting in HD Radio in 2006 and ceased HD Radio broadcast in 2014. It was the first radio station in the four-state area to begin multicasting. Its slogan is "Big Dog 97.9 Joplin's Rock Station and The 4 States Rocker Big Dog 97.9" 
Bobby Holcomb was born in 1947 in Honolulu, Hawaii, the son of an African-American father from Georgia, and a Hawaiian-Portuguese mother. 
He was passionate about Tahitian culture, and taught local children their cultural heritage. He campaigned against nuclear testing. For his educational efforts, he was named French Polynesia's Personality of the Year in 1988. 
He died from cancer on February 15, 1991.  Local Tahitian television stations treated his death as a matter of great national importance. 
One of Holcomb's most popular paintings is "The Kites of Mata'Irea" depicting native Polynesians flying kites. 
Holcomb never signed with a major label, and his early music was mostly produced on cassettes. The albums that did make their way to compact disc are out of print, and used copies are very rare.  Tahitian television made some videos of Holcomb performing his tunes in the 1980s, and some of those videos can be found on the internet, on sites such as YouTube. 
The constituency was established for the 1963  elections, but for the next election (1966) the Nyakach Constituency was split out of it. In 1987 Muhoroni Constituency was split from Nyando, while parts of the disestablished Winam Constituency was incorporated into Nyando. It was one of three constituencies of the former Nyando District. 
The Popularity Papers is a middle grade book series written and illustrated by Amy Ignatow.  The first book of the series was published in 2010.  To date, six sequels have been published. 
Two fifth-grade friends, Lydia Goldblatt and Julie Graham-Chang, want to learn how to be popular before entering middle school.  The first book of the series is their journal, documenting their misadventures to become more popular, as well as their family and school life.  Sequels continue the story of Lydia and Julie and their friends and families, as they progress into middle school. 
The first book in The Popularity Papers series was selected as a top-ten title for 2011 by the American Library Association's Rainbow Project. It was a 2010 Gold Award winner by the National Parenting Publications Association and selected by the Chicago Public Library as one of the 2011 "Best of the Best" books. 
The first book's review in the New York Times 2010 summer reading issue (June 4, 2010) called the author "hugely talented". Publishers Weekly noted that the plot was "predictable", but stated that "Readers will quickly devour this hilarious, heartfelt debut." 
On July 17, 1992, the Azerbaijani government established State Land Committee according to Presidential Decree No. 54. of the Republic of Azerbaijan. In 2001, both the State Land Committee and State Geodesy and Mapping Committee were abolished and according to Presidential Decree No. 460 dated April 18, 2001, the new State Land and Cartography Committee was established in their place. 
State Land Structure Project Institute, State Land Cadastre and Monitoring Science Production Center, State Aerogeodesy Institution, Baku Mapping Factory are all state institutions subordinate to the committee. 
The committee cooperates with respective state bodies of Ukraine, Russia, Belarus, Kazakhstan, Dagestan, Tajikistan etc. 
Hospital Sketches (1863) is a compilation of four sketches based on letters Louisa May Alcott sent home during the six weeks she spent as a volunteer nurse for the Union Army during the American Civil War in Georgetown. 
Tribulation Periwinkle opens the story by complaining, "I want something to do." She dismisses suggestions to write a book, teach, get married, or start acting. When her younger brother suggests she "go nurse the soldiers", she immediately responds, "I will!" After substantial hardship in trying to obtain a spot, she has further difficulty finding a place on the train. She then describes her travel through New York, Philadelphia, and Baltimore en route to Washington DC. 
Immediately after her arrival, Periwinkle must attend to the wounded from the Battle of Fredericksburg. Her first assignment is washing them before putting them to bed. She converses with the various wounded soldiers, including an Irishman and a Virginia blacksmith. The death of the blacksmith, a man named John, in particular touches her deeply. 
While serving as a nurse, Alcott wrote several letters to her family in Concord. At the urging of others, she prepared them for publication, slightly altering and fictionalizing them. The narrator of the stories was renamed Tribulation Periwinkle but the sketches are virtually authentic to Alcott's real experiences. 
The first of the sketches was published on May 22, 1863, in the abolitionist magazine Boston Commonwealth edited by family friend Franklin Benjamin Sanborn. The final sketch was published on June 26. Alcott herself did not care much for the writings, dismissing the idea that they were "witty", and admitted, "I wanted money." The pieces received great critical and popular acclaim making Alcott an overnight success. 
Fourteen years later after its publication, Alcott reflected on avoiding Roberts Brothers, who later published Little Women (1868): "Shortsighted Louisa! Little did you dream that this same Roberts Brothers were to help you make your fortune a few years later." After that novel's success, Niles offered to republish Hospital Sketches under the Roberts Brothers imprint, and Alcott slightly expanded it. 
Brick Towers was a 324-unit affordable housing development in Newark, New Jersey, originally occupied in 1970.  The buildings were demolished in 2008, despite opposition by the City's Mayor Cory Booker, who was living in the property at the time.  Although the buildings were reported structurally sound, there were persistent problems with poor management and associated criminal activity. The site has been redeveloped. 
This article about a building or structure in New Jersey is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Pogatetz suffered from a hernia, for which he received corrective surgery in Munich on 24 April 2006. On 4 July, he returned to training following successful surgery on his hernia and cheek. 
On 9 September 2014, Pogatetz signed a three-and-a-half year deal with Columbus Crew SC of Major League Soccer. Over two seasons with the Ohio-based club, he made 24 appearances. 
In March 2009, Pogatetz was named captain of Austria by coach Dietmar Constantini. However, a series of injuries kept Pogatetz out of Austria's team for much of 2009 and 2010, with Christian Fuchs replacing him as captain. His last cap came in 2014. 
Current street name refers to Queen Jadwiga of Poland (1373/4 - 1399), who reigned as the first female monarch of the Kingdom of Poland from 1384 until her death in 1399. 
The facade presents typical eclectic features, with pedimented windows capped by corbel tables and dentils on the top. The entrance portal, flanked with pilasters, exhibits a medallion figure in the tympanum pediment. The tenement house is planned to be renovated in 2017 
The building is one of the oldest in the street, dating back to the mid-1870s. It has been commissioned by Christian Mirus, who ran a transport company Haus Mirus. After the first World War (1933), another firm, Hortensje, had its seat there. 
This tenement is pretty old, by street standards, since its first landlord Leopold Hartmann, a painter, is registered on an 1872 document. He had the house re-built up to the current form in 1876. During the 1910s, it was the seat of the Industrial Bank (Polish: Bank Przemyslowy). 
The frontage displays eclectic traits, with strong neo-classic accents. Noticeable elements are the oeil-de-boeuf above the entrance, the delicately adorned cartouches on window sills and the pediments crowning the openings of the first floor. 
The neo-classic elevation draws attention to its portal: the two pilasters carry a crosshead bearing a bearded mascaron, topped by a pediment which tympanum is adorned with a winged figure and floral motifs. 
The neo-classic frontage, though worn out by time, still displays some architectural details: cartouches with festoons on the first floor and ornaments on the top, or adorned window crossheads. 
The eclectic frontage is particularly rich with architectural details. Each slight avant-corps on building sides is crowned by a triangular pediment with an adorned tympanum (bearing a coat of arms). Each opening is ornamented (pediment, mascaron, balustrade, vegetal motifs). The portal displays pilasters, bossage and a triangular tympanum. By its style and material, the house echoes the tenement at Pomorska Street 26, built at the same period.  
The Art Nouveau elevation, refurbished in 2019, displays noticeable elements. Three mascarons figures, adorned with vegetal motifs towers the facade, above the last window line. Above, a dozen of smaller faces highlights the dentil-like frieze. In addition, the front-gable on the left side is garnished with pilasters, floral details, and other Art Nouveau style motifs. It bears the date of completion of the building (1904). 
The brick building complements perfectly the other large mannerism edifice in the close area, the Prussian Eastern Railway Headquarters. Although it lost after the second World war a front-gable, it kept preserved its other architectural details, in particular the avant-corps bearing the grand stone balcony giving onto the street. 
The corner tenement shows early elements of Art Nouveau style, in particular in the remaining motifs of both frontages: a cartouche above the corner entrance displays a man figure, all first level windows boast pediments and crossheads with vegetal motifs or flowered woman heads, in the spirit of Art Nouveau ornamentation. The 2019 overhaul of the building replaced back the statue above the entrance.  
The pool has been built in 1962, at the location of an old harbour on the Brda. It is the oldest swimming facility in activity in the city. In 2016, municipal authorities have decided to tear down the whole complex and built a new facility, including a 50m Olympic-size  with a partially mobile roof and seating for 450 people. 
This building lost all of its architectural decoration after the war and several unfortunate re-constructions. The villa was the first realization of Fritz Weidner in Bydgoszcz. 
Reeves was born on February 14, 1838, in Oswego, New York. In the early 1850s, he joined the Oswego band as an alto horn player, but soon moved to cornet, the instrument for which he would become famous. He occasionally performed with Jules Levy, another famous cornetist of the period. In 1871, he married Sarah Blanding. Blanding had a daughter from a previous marriage, and they were later to have a son, David W. Reeves, Jr. 
Reeves accepted the directorship of Patrick Gilmore's Twenty-Second New York Regiment band after Gilmore's death in September 1892, and led Gilmore's band at the 1893 Chicago World's Columbian Exposition.  Reeves returned to the American Band after a year. 
In 1878, Reeves led a performance of H.M.S. Pinafore, using a boat for the stage, which Arthur Sullivan took note of. Later in the 1890s, he served as a judge for the New York Volunteer Firemen's Association's band competitions. 
Early in 1900, he contracted Bright's disease. He died on March 8, 1900. His funeral service took place at the First Baptist Church in America, where he had frequently led the American Band as part of Brown University's Commencement ceremonies, and included a performance of his Immortalis by the American Band. John Philip Sousa sent 200 roses in his memory. He was buried at Swan Point Cemetery with Masonic honors. 
By the time of his death in 1900, he had composed over 100 works. In 1926, a marble fountain was built as a memorial to Reeves in Roger Williams Park in Providence. 
Panegyrtes apicale is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Martins and Galileo in 2005. 
The Hezekiah Palmer House is historic house at 340-408 Leete's Island Road in Branford, Connecticut.  Probably built in the early 19th century, it is an uncommonly late example in the town of colonial Georgian architecture.  The house was listed on the National Register of Historic Places on December 1, 1988. 
The house has traditionally been given a construction date of 1830, based on the carving of that number on one of its main beams.  Land records suggest that it was built sometime before 1830 by James Palmer, whose son Hezekiah is recorded as its owner in 1852.  Its transitional Colonial/Greek Revival styling and construction methods suggest an earlier date. 
The reservoir is constructed on the site of an abandoned gravel pit, the authority purchased the property in April 1996 for $810,000, which was mostly funded through a 30-year lease to a communication company for a cell phone tower. 
To prepare the former gravel mining site for use as a reservoir existing buildings and debris were removed, including approximately 33,500 tons of steel slag and 7,000 tons of Kaofin, a legally dumped by-product from Marcal Paper corporation. An additional 1,000,000 cubic yards of overburden material were excavated and removed from the site. 
King of Burlesque is a 1936 musical film about a former burlesque producer played by Warner Baxter who moves into a legitimate theatre and does very well, until he marries a socialite. Sammy Lee received an Academy Award nomination for the now dead category of Best Dance Direction at the 8th Academy Awards. Today the film is best known for Fats Waller's rendition of "I've Got My Fingers Crossed". 
Former burlesque producer moves into legitimate theatre and does well until he marries a socialite. After his divorce his former top singer returns from London to help out. 
Vojvodina is also the Serbian word for voivodeship, a type of duchy overseen by a voivode. The Serbian Voivodeship, a precursor to modern Vojvodina, was an Austrian province from 1849 to 1860. 
The official name is the Autonomous Province of Vojvodina. In the province's six official languages this is: 
Before the Roman conquest in the 1st century BC, Indo-European peoples of Illyrian, Thracian and Celtic origin inhabited this area. The first states organized in this area were the Celtic State of the Scordisci (3rd century BC-1st century AD) with capital in Singidunum (Belgrade), and the Dacian Kingdom of Burebista (1st century BC). 
During Roman rule, Sirmium (modern Sremska Mitrovica) was one of the four capital cities of the Roman Empire, and six Roman Emperors were born in this city or in its surroundings. The city was also the capital of several Roman administrative units, including Pannonia Inferior, Pannonia Secunda, the Diocese of Pannonia, and the Praetorian prefecture of Illyricum. 
Following territorial disputes with Byzantine and Bulgarian states, most of Vojvodina became part of the Kingdom of Hungary between the 10th and 12th century and remained under Hungarian administration until the 16th century (Following periods of Ottoman and Habsburg administrations, Hungarian political dominance over most of the region was established again in 1867 and over entire region in 1882, after abolition of the Habsburg Military Frontier).[citation needed] 
Vojvodina remained Austrian Crown land until 1860, when Emperor Franz Joseph decided that it would be  Hungarian Crown land again. After 1867, the Kingdom of Hungary became one of two self-governing parts of Austria-Hungary, and the territory was returned again to Hungarian administration. 
Most Vojvodina ethnic Germans (about 200,000) fled the region in 1944, together with the defeated German army. Most of those who remained in the region (about 150,000) were sent to some of the villages cordoned off as prisons. It is estimated that some 48,447 Germans died in the camps from disease, hunger, malnutrition, mistreatment, and cold. Some 8,049 Germans were killed by partisans during military administration in Vojvodina after October 1944. 
For decades, the province enjoyed only a small level of autonomy within Serbia. Under the 1974 Yugoslav constitution, it gained extensive rights of self-rule, as both Kosovo and Vojvodina were given de facto veto power in the Serbian and Yugoslav parliaments. Changes to their status could not be made without the consent of the two Provincial Assemblies.[citation needed] 
The 1974 Serbian constitution, adopted at the same time, reiterated that "the Socialist Republic of Serbia comprises the Socialist Autonomous Province of Vojvodina and the Socialist Autonomous Province of Kosovo, which originated in the common struggle of nations and nationalities of Yugoslavia in the National Liberation War (the Second World War) and socialist revolution". 
On January 28, 2013, as an answer to the proposal of the Third Serbia political organization from Novi Sad to abolish the autonomy of Vojvodina, the pro-autonomist Vojvodina's Party performed a campaign that involved the posting of "Republic of Vojvodina" posters in Novi Sad. 
The climate of the area is moderate continental, including cold winters and hot and humid summers. The Vojvodina climate is characterized by a vast range of extreme temperatures and very irregular rainfall distribution per month. 
The Assembly of Vojvodina is the provincial legislature composed of 120 proportionally elected members. The current members were elected in the 2016 provincial elections. The Government of Vojvodina is the executive administrative body composed of a president and cabinet ministers. 
Vojvodina is more diverse than the rest of Serbia with more than 25 ethnic groups and six languages which are in the official use by the provincial administration. 
The Radio-Television of Vojvodina produces and broadcasts regional programming on two channels, RTV1 (Serbian language) and RTV2 (minority languages), and three radio frequencies: Radio Novi Sad 1 (Serbian), Radio Novi Sad 2 (Hungarian), Radio Novi Sad 3 (other minority communities). 
The economy of Vojvodina is largely based on developed food industry and fertile agricultural soil. Agriculture is a priority sector in Vojvodina. Traditionally, it has always been a significant part of the local economy and a generator of positive results, due to the abundance of fertile agricultural land which makes up 84% of its territory. The share of agribusiness in the total industrial production is 40%, that is 30% in the total exports of Vojvodina. 
Vojvodina promotes its investment potentials through the Vojvodina Investment Promotion (VIP) agency, which was founded by the Parliament of the Autonomous Province of Vojvodina. 
Revenge is the "comeback" album from the band Iron Fire, released March 31, 2006. The album followed a struggle to get a record deal and maintain a stable line-up. 
Apex Community Park is a public, urban park in Apex, North Carolina. Located on the eastern end of Apex, Apex Community Park is bordered by Laura Duncan Road on the West and Lake Pine Drive on the East. 
The 160 acre park contains numerous soccer fields, a baseball complex with batting cages, as well as volleyball, tennis and basketball courts. One basketball court is fenced for roller hockey.  
100-person and 50-person picnic shelters are available at the back of the park before the lake trail head.  In addition, playgrounds, and hiking trails are also centered around the 50 acre lake. The lake is open to fishing, kayaking, and other non-motor watercraft. 
Niantjila is a small town and commune in the Cercle of Dioila in the Koulikoro Region of southern Mali. 
After 42 years of service as a commissioned officer, Armistead died in New Market, Virginia at the age of 72, and is buried in the Armistead family cemetery in Upperville. 
His brother George Armistead commanded Fort McHenry during the Battle of Baltimore in the War of 1812. The attack became immortalized by onlooker Francis Scott Key who penned "The Star-Spangled Banner" while watching the British bombardment of Armistead's fort. 
His son Lewis Addison Armistead was a Confederate general who died during Pickett's Charge at the Battle of Gettysburg in 1863. 
This article contains public domain text from "Colonel Walker Keith Armistead". Portraits and Profiles of Chief Engineers. Archived from the original on April 4, 2005. Retrieved May 13, 2005. 
This Osaka Prefecture railroad station-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
After the fall of Alexandria the 89th embarked on board Lord Keith's fleet on a secret expedition, the destination of which was supposed to be Brazil; but on reaching Malta peace was found to have been declared, and the regiment returned to Ireland. After attaining his majority in the 89th Le Mesurier retired on half-pay. 
Le Mesurier married in 1804 Martha, daughter of Alderman Peter Pochard of London, a native of Guernsey, and had one son, in holy orders, the author of some devotional works. 
This article related to a location in Belgaum taluk, Belgaum district, Karnataka, India is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Morton composes and fuses a wide variety of musical genres, ranging from dance to hip hop, soul and ambient, among various other genres. His approach to film scoring bridges the worlds of modern electronic production and more traditional melodic orchestral composing. 
Morton graduated from the Berklee College of Music in Boston, where he studied film scoring and production/engineering. Afterwards, he moved to Los Angeles, California to pursue a career in the film and music industries as a staff writer for Universal Music. 
Some of the most notable films and television series for which Morton has been a composer and sound producer: 
This article about a location in the province of Granada is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Besides his occasional conquests, he consistently held Iraq from Tikrit to the Persian Gulf without interruption. His long reign of forty-seven years is chiefly marked by ambitious and corrupt dealings with the Tartar chiefs, and by his hazardous invocation of the Mongols, which so soon brought his own dynasty to an end. But in his day, there was comparative peace at Baghdad; learning flourished; while refuges for the poor, and other works of public interest, were encouraged. 
Al-Nasir was the son of Caliph al-Mustadi and a Turkish umm walad called Zumurrud (Emerald). His reign was unusual for the rise of the futuwwa groups in his reign, connected to Baghdad's long-standing ayyarun. These urban social groups had long existed in Baghdad and elsewhere, and they were often involved in urban conflicts, especially sectarian riots. Al-Nasir made them into an instrument of his government, reorganizing them along Sufi lines and ideology. 
In the early years of his caliphate, his goal was to crush the Seljuq power and replace it with his own. He incited rebellion against the Seljuq Sultan of Persia, Toghrul III. The Khwarezm Shah, Ala ad-Din Tekish, at his instigation, attacked the Seljuq forces, and defeated them in 1194; Toghrul was killed and his head exposed in the caliph's palace. Tekish, recognized now as supreme ruler of the East, bestowed on the caliph certain provinces of Persia that had been held by the Seljuqs. 
The caliph soon found Genghis Khan to be quite threatening. The steppes of Central Asia were set in motion by Genghis Khan, and his hordes put to flight the Khwarizm Shah, who died an exile in an island of the Caspian. 
Al-Nasir spent his last three years paralysed and nearly blind. He suffered from dysentery for twenty days and then died. He was succeeded by his son Al-Zahir in the year 1225 as the thirty-fifth Abbasid Caliph. 
Suasa was an ancient Roman town in what is now the comune of Castelleone di Suasa, Marche, Italy. It is located in the Pian Volpello locality, in the valley of the Cesano River. 
Suasa was founded by the Romans in the early 3rd century BC after the Battle of Sentinum (295 BC), in a territory inhabited by the Senones. The town was crossed by a secondary branch of the Via Flaminia and by the Via Salaria Gallica, which connected it to Forum Sempronii (Fossombrone) and Ostra. In 232 BC, it became a prefecture and, in the 1st century BC, a municipium. 
Suasa started to decline from the 3rd century; in 409, it was sacked by Alarich's Goths during his march against Rome (see Sack of Rome). It was abandoned in the 6th century after the Gothic War, the population moving to nearby settlements. 
The remains have been excavated by the University of Bologna since 1987. The edifices found include: 
The Suasa archaeological park is an archaeological site in Castelleone di Suasa (province of Ancona, Marche, Italy). 
It includes the remains of the ancient town of Suasa, abandoned in the 6th century AD. The site comprises an open-air museum of a Roman house (the Coiedii domus), of great interest because of its size and architectonic complexity. 
The domus was inhabited over a long period of time. Its development peaked in the 2nd century AD. The mosaics discovered in the interior are splendid and are the most important unitary complex of the Marches. Mythological, floral, and geometric scenes can be admired, but above all, a magnificent marble floor created with over fifteen different kinds of stone. 
Walter L. Davis (born July 2, 1979) is an American athlete competing in the triple jump and occasionally in the long jump. He was born in Lafayette, Louisiana 
In the period from July 2012 to 2013, he missed three mandatory drug tests. This resulted in a one-year ban from the sport. 
In 2013, Quaedvlieg et al. introduced a new combination for this species: Sphaerulina musiva (Peck) Quaedvlieg, Verkley & Crous, as they found that the type strains of both the genus Mycosphaerella (linked to the anamorph genus Ramularia via Ramularia endophylla) and the genus Septoria (linked to the anamorph genus Septoria, via Septoria cytisi) clustered separately from the clade containing Sphaerulina musiva. 
S. musiva can be transmitted in two ways.  The most common is through wind borne spores from infected leaves to new host leaves. The second way is through the transplanting of a cutting of an infected poplar tree.  This is when someone takes new shoots off an existing tree and plants them somewhere else. 
If the S. musiva infects as a canker on a poplar tree, it will likely result in branch death.  The presence of the canker weakens the branch itself and often causes it to snap at the site of the canker, releasing the spores. The presence of a canker restricts access to nutrients and water and could result in tree death.[citation needed] 
Leaf spots often appear on fallen leaves, relatively circular, with black margins, it appears to look like there is mold growing on the leaf. The leaves will eventually shrivel and blacken, then fall to the ground where the spores will over winter. 
Antony and the Johnsons is an American music group presenting the work of Anohni and her collaborators. 
Producer Hal Willner heard the EP and played it to Lou Reed, who immediately recruited Hegarty for his project The Raven. Now gaining more attention, Hegarty signed to U.S.-based record label Secretly Canadian, and released another EP, The Lake, with Lou Reed guest-performing on one of the tracks. Secretly Canadian also re-released Hegarty's debut album in the United States to wider distribution in 2004. 
The 2007 film about Bob Dylan, I'm Not There, featured their cover of his song "Knockin' On Heaven's Door" on the soundtrack release. 
After two sold-out concerts at the Sydney Opera House, Antony and the Johnsons ended their recent touring in February 2010 in Tokyo. Anohni, Johanna Constantine and William Basinski performed at the Sogetsu Hall with butoh master Yoshito Ohno, the son of the 103-year-old dancer Kazuo Ohno, whose image graces the cover of The Crying Light. Kazuo Ohno died in June of that year, and Anohni wrote an obituary for the dancer in The Guardian. 
September 2010 saw the release of the Thank You For Your Love EP which includes covers of Dylan's "Pressing On" and Lennon's "Imagine". The Sun listed Thank You For Your Love as single of the week on August 27, 2010. 
In tribute to Kazuo Ohno, Antony and the Johnsons performed on October 30, 2010 at Lincoln Center's Avery Fisher Hall with the Orchestra of St. Luke's and featured the film "Mr. O's Book of the Dead" directed by Chiaki Nagano and starring Kazuo Ohno. 
In January 2011, Anohni was a guest on Winterguest, a program on Dutch Television's VPRO channel and was interviewed by Leon Verdonschot. 
Antony and the Johnsons released a live symphonic album in August 2012 entitled Cut the World; it features a track called "Future Feminism", which consists of a speech in which Anohni disparages patriarchal religions and advocates for a shift towards feminine systems of governance as part of an effort to avert global ecological disaster. 
On February 23, 2015, Anohni announced through her Facebook and official site the name of her new album, HOPELESSNESS, although no release date was provided. The album is being mixed and is co-produced by Hudson Mohawke, Oneohtrix Point Never and herself. It would be released under the moniker ANOHNI. It was described as an "electronic record with some sharp teeth". 
In June 2015, Antony and the Johnsons performed at Dark Mofo in Tasmania, Australia, as a benefit in support of the Martu people of Parnngurr in Western Australia in their fight to prevent a uranium mine from being developed near their community by Canadian multinational Cameco and Mitsubishi. Anohni appeared with Martu representatives at a press conference at the MCA in Sydney and on ABC's Q&A in further service of this cause. 
Y Gwyddonydd ("The Scientist") was a Welsh-language magazine containing articles, reviews, and news items on scientific topics. It was published between 1963 and 1996 by the University of Wales Press. 
The magazine has been digitized by the Welsh Journals Online project at the National Library of Wales. 
See tips for writing articles about magazines. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
Charles Rockwell Saxbe (born November 2, 1946) is an attorney in Ohio and former American politician of the Republican Party. He is the son of former U.S. Attorney General and Senator William B. Saxbe. 
Saxbe was born to William and Ardath Louise "Dolly" Kleinhans Saxbe in Urbana, Ohio.  He was the youngest of three children and grew up in a small house in nearby Mechanicsburg, Ohio, that his father built. 
In 1969, Saxbe earned his bachelor's degree from the Southern Methodist University and then enlisted in the U.S. Marine Corps, where he served as an infantry platoon commander with the First Marine Division during the Vietnam War.  He attained the rank of captain by the time he was honorably discharged. 
After serving his country, Saxbe earned his law degree from the Ohio State University Moritz College of Law in 1975. 
In 1982, he was the Republican nominee for Ohio Attorney General, losing to Anthony J. Celebrezze Jr. by nearly 2 to 1 (2,036,243 to 1,203,797). 
Saxbe is currently 'Partner-in-Charge' of the Columbus office of Taft Stettinius & Hollister LLP, a law firm based in Cincinnati, Ohio.  Previously, he was the co-managing partner of Chester, Willcox & Saxbe, LLP, a law firm based in Columbus, Ohio.  He was also on the Board of Trustees of Central State University in Wilberforce, Ohio. 
On 6 March, Montgomery wrote to General Sir Alan Brooke, the Chief of the Imperial General Staff (the professional head of the British Army): 
He is trying to attack me in daylight with tanks, followed by lorried infantry. I have 500 6pdr atk guns dug in...I have 400 tanks...good infantry...and a great weight of artillery. It is an absolute gift, and the man must be mad.
Allied plans for the attack on the Mareth Line continued virtually undisturbed. On 17 March, the II US Corps began Operation Wop (sic), an attack towards Gafsa, the Eighth Army began the preliminary Operation Walk and Operation Canter and then began Operation Pugilist, the Battle of the Mareth Line on 19 March. 
Oceaniserpentilla haliotis is a Gram-negative and aerobic which has been isolated from the haemolymph serum of the sea snail Haliotis rubra from Tasmania in Australia. Oceaniserpentilla haliotis has the ability to degrade crude oil. It is the only species in the genus Oceaniserpentilla. 
USS S-6 (SS-111) was a second-group (S-3 or "Government") S-class submarine of the United States Navy. Her keel was laid down on 29 January 1918 by the Portsmouth Navy Yard. She was launched on 23 December 1919 sponsored by Ms. Eleanor Westcott; and commissioned on 17 May 1920 with Lieutenant Commander George B. Junkin in command. 
This article incorporates text from the public domain Dictionary of American Naval Fighting Ships. The entry can be found here. 
Joe Rogan Questions Everything was SyFy's most watched reality premiere in more than five months, averaging 1.3 million total viewers. 
In the episode "RoboSapien" Joe Rogan interviews Ray Kurzweil with comedian Duncan Trussell appearing as a co-host. 
The Coroner's Court of the Australian Capital Territory is a court which has exclusive jurisdiction over the remains of a person and the power to make findings in respect of the cause of death of a person or fire in Australian Capital Territory. 
The office of coroner in the territory derives from the legal framework inherited from the United Kingdom. 
Where a serious criminal offence has been disclosed during the course of an inquest, the coroner cannot proceed with it if a person is to be charged with that criminal offence. The coroner stops the inquest and refers the matter to the Director of Public Prosecutions for consideration and investigation. This changes the early colonial practice of coroners directly committing persons suspected of serious crimes directly for trial. 
Supreme Court of the Australian Capital Territory has a supervisory role over the court, and may review, quash or direct inquests. 
In certain situations, the Attorney General may direct the Chief Coroner to conduct cause an inquiry to be held into a disaster in the territory. 
All magistrates are coroners by virtue of their appointment. The Chief Coroner may appoint a special magistrate as a coroner. 
The Chief Magistrate of the Australian Capital Territory is the Chief Coroner for the territory. The Chief Coroner has the function to oversee and co-ordinate coronial services in the territory, ensure that all deaths and suspected deaths concerning which a coroner has jurisdiction to hold an inquest are properly investigated, and ensuring that an inquest is held whenever it is required, and to issue guidelines to coroners to assist them in the exercise or performance of their functions. 
Coroners must investigate the manner and cause of death for persons who die or may have died in certain circumstances. This includes people who: 
Coroners can then either decide to waive a hearing where it is not necessary or decide to hold a public hearing. 
In 2006, INCITE! published an anthology of writings that reflect their politics entitled, Color of Violence: The INCITE! Anthology, published by South End Press.  In 2007, they also published an anthology entitled, The Revolution Will Not Be Funded: Beyond The Non-Profit Industrial Complex, published by South End Press. The Revolution Will Not Be Funded was awarded the Gustavus Myers 2007 Outstanding Book Award. 
Ahmed El Maghrabi, born  1945 in Egypt, is an Egyptian businessman and politician from the National Democratic Party. 
Maghrabi holds a degree in Engineering from Cairo University and another in Chemical Engineering from North Carolina University as well as an MBA from Columbia University. 
In early February 2011 Maghrabi was accused, along with his cousins, of profiteering, wasting public money and seizing state land following a cabinet purge by then President Hosni Mubarak as part of a series of trials following the Egyptian revolution and held in Tora Prison. He was cleared of corruption charges in 2012 (overturning an earlier verdict) and 2013, but remained in custody due to additional charges. His 2013 acquittal was appealed by the prosecution, but upheld in 2015. 
This biographical article related to a football defender from Saudi Arabia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
After Pisarenko was caught with Aleksandr Kurlovich in possession of steroids by the Canadian customs in 1985, he was given a lifetime ban by the Soviet Weight Lifting Federation. 
This biographical article relating to Soviet association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to a Russian association football defender born in the 1940s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Davies returned to his legal practice, and gradually restored his reputation through community service. He died in November 1912. 
This biographical article related to association football in Germany, about a defender born in the 1910s, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Construction was commissioned by 1678 by Giovanni Leoni Montanari, a wealthy merchant in fabrics, who aspired entry into nobility. The architects are unknown, but the Borrella firm from Vicenza, and the Lombard architect Giuseppe Marchi, are implicated in its design. 
The interior decoration recruited the Lombardese Paracca family as stucco workers and painters, the Tyrolese painter Giuseppe Alberti; the French painter Louis Dorigny; and the Bassanese sculptor Angelo Marinali. 
In 1808, the palace was bought by Count Girolamo Egidio di Velo, an amateur collector of Greek and Roman antiques. The main-floor was redecorated with stuccos and frescos in the neoclassical style. By 1908 the palace was property of a Bank. During the late 1970s, the palace underwent restoration. 
The art galleries of the museum contain a select collection of Russian icons and of paintings mainly by Venetian trained artists of the 18th century such as  Francesco Albotto; Canaletto; Carlevarijs; the brothers Francesco and Giacomo Guardi; Pietro Longhi; Bartolomeo Pedon; Giovanni Antonio Pellegrini; the studio of Marco Ricci; Francesco Zuccarelli; and father and son: Giovanni Battista and Gian Domenico Tiepolo. 
The Ministry of Foreign Affairs of Czechoslovakia refers to the foreign affairs ministry which was responsible for representing internationally Czechoslovakia during its existence, from 1918 to 1992. 
The New Year Honours 1964 were appointments in many of the Commonwealth realms of Queen Elizabeth II to various orders and honours to reward and highlight good works by citizens of those countries. They were announced on 1 January 1964 to celebrate the year passed and mark the beginning of 1964.  
Brigadier Charles Chambers Fowell Spry, C.B.E., D.S.O., of Canberra, Australian Capital Territory. For distinguished public service. 
Hachiville (Luxembourgish: Helzen, German: Helzingen) is a village in the commune of Wincrange, in northern Luxembourg.  As of 2005[update], the village has a population of 181. 
Hachiville was a commune in the canton of Clervaux until 1 January 1978, when it was merged with the communes of Asselborn, Boevange, and Oberwampach to form the new commune of Wincrange.  The law creating Wincrange was passed on 31 October 1977. 
The name Hachiville[citation needed] appears for the first time in a charter in the year 1130. It is believed, however, that the site has been inhabited since Celtic times and that it was occupied by the Romans. The village's greatest fame lies in its celebrated hermitage, which is probably located on an ancient Celtic place of worship. 
The hermitage itself has also been honored with a stamp. A watercolor depiction of the restored chapel was featured in a stamp set in 1989. 
This biographical article related to association football in Switzerland, about a forward, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Craig Taylor James (born May 5, 1941) is an American politician and lawyer from Florida. He served two terms in the United States Congress representing Florida's 4th Congressional district from 1989 to 1993. 
James was born in Augusta, Richmond County, Georgia on May 5, 1941. He graduated from DeLand High School in DeLand, Florida in 1959. He graduated from the University of Florida with an Associate of Arts in 1961. He graduated from Stetson University with a Bachelor of Science in 1963 and Juris Doctor in 1967.  
He practiced law in DeLand from 1967 to 1971. From 1971 to 1975 he served as Commissioner of the DeLand Housing Authority.[citation needed] 
From 1989 to 1993, as a Republican he represented the Florida's 4th congressional district in Congress. He did not seek reelection and continued to practice law in DeLand. 
Currently he resides in DeLand, Florida. He is a partner and founding member of James & Zimmerman, P.L. in DeLand. 
Odin was built at Karljohansvern naval shipyard in Horten with yard number 126, and was launched on 24 January 1939. 
After the outbreak of the Second World War, Odin formed part of the 3rd destroyer section in the Kristiansand Defence Sector of the 1st Naval District. 
After the German capture of Kristiansand Odin was handed over to the Kriegsmarine on 11 April and officially entered service as Panther on 20 April. However, before entering the Kriegsmarine she was partially rebuilt and rearmed. During the remainder of the war she operated in Skagerrak and Kattegat as an escort and training ship, in 1940 forming the 7. Torpedobootsflottille together with Gyller, and from January 1942 as a torpedo recovery vessel in Gotenhafen. 
After the end of the Second World War Panther/Odin was recovered in Holmestrand, Norway, May 1945 and returned to the Royal Norwegian Navy. After three more years in Norway as a destroyer Odin was converted to a frigate in 1948. Odin and her sister ships was phased out and sold for scrapping in 1959 
Bloodworth is an English surname derived from Blidworth in Nottinghamshire. Notable people with the surname include: 
Every year a fair is organised in honour of Kara Kasim, an Amir of Mahmud of Ghazni, who, traveling in western India, early in the fourteenth century, was killed by the Samma Rajputs then reigning in Cutch State. The fair, beginning on the first Monday of Chaitra Vad (April -May) and lasting five days, is under the supervision of Pir Shah Murad of Mundra. People offers cash, cocoanuts, cloth, goats, sheep, sweetmeats, and dates to his tomb during the fair. 
The Little Fool is a 1921 American silent drama film directed by Phil Rosen and starring Milton Sills, Frances Wadsworth and Nigel Barrie. 
This article about an extraterrestrial geological feature is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Joyce Borenstein is a Canadian director and animator. Borenstein worked extensively in the independent animation field in the 1970s before joining the National Film Board of Canada in the 1980s, culminating in her best known work: the short animated documentary The Colours of My Father: A Portrait of Sam Borenstein (1992) about her father, painter Sam Borenstein, which was nominated for an Academy Award for best short documentary at the 65th Academy Awards. 
Joyce Borenstein was born in Montreal, Quebec. She is the daughter of Sam and Judith Borenstein, both painters whose respective works feature in her films The Colours of My Father: A Portrait of Sam Borenstein and Mother's Colours (2011). She received her Bachelor of Arts in piano performance at McGill University in 1971, and later received her Masters in Film Animation at the California Institute of the Arts in 1974. 
The Petit Col Ferret (or Col du Petit Ferret) is an Alpine pass between the canton of Valais and the Aosta Valley. 
Jim Liddell was an English footballer who played in the Hong Kong First Division League for Hong Kong Rangers FC as goalkeeper between 1973 and 1976. 
This biographical article related to Hong Kong association football is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Das Sprachenatelier Berlin - Institute for languages, art and culture was founded as both a language school and a studio, a place where intercultural encounters and creative exchange are combined in the context of language learning.
In addition to German language courses and courses in more than forty foreign languages, festivals, film evenings, readings, concerts, exhibitions, workshops, political discussions and seminars are also organised. The institute offers sufficient space for artists and creatives to organise events and reach a broad audience. Numerous performances, plays, film showings, dance and theatre workshops as well as all forms of exhibitions have taken place at the Sprachenatelier in the past. 
Sprachenatelier's spaces are regularly used for political information and discussion forums with experts from many countries. Additionally, every year - besides the regular various language courses, there is always a broad offer of cultural events all students of the Sprachenatelier can join. 
The World is not my Village, an open forum for the discussion of themes such as globalisation, migration and environment, with a focus on people and their realm of experience. 
Kulturmittwoch is weekly, extracurricular cultural programme. Museum visits, neighbourhood walks, lectures or film showings offer an insight into German culture as well as the chance to put German language skills into practice and make new contacts. 
Perittia nephele is a moth in the family Elachistidae. It was described by Lauri Kaila in 2000. It is found in Argentina. 
Paul John Flowers FRSA FRGS (born 5 June 1950) is an English local politician and former Methodist minister. He is a former Labour councillor in Rochdale and Bradford, and was non-executive chairman of the Co-operative Bank. 
Several newspapers reported allegations that he communicated with rent boys using his work email account while he was in charge of the Co-operative Bank, and was convicted of carrying out a sex act in a public toilet more than 30 years ago. 
Flowers was born in Portsmouth and brought up in Eastleigh, going to Barton Peveril School. From 1972 he studied for a Bachelor of Arts degree in theology, graduating from the University of Bristol in 1975. He then obtained a post-graduate diploma at the University of Geneva. Early in his career he worked for four years in banking, gaining part 1 and half of his part 2 Institute of Bankers qualification. 
On 21 November 2013 he was suspended indefinitely by the church. In early summer 2014 he left Bradford to live in Greater Manchester. He ceased to be in 'Full Connexion' (that is, on the list of authorised ministers) with the Methodist Church of Great Britain in January 2017, following the conclusion of a disciplinary process which found him guilty of 'seriously impairing the mission, witness or integrity of the church'. 
Flowers' career progressed through the democratic structures of United Co-operatives, becoming a member of its board following election via United's Yorkshire Regional Committee. In 2008, following United's merger with The Co-operative Group in 2007, he joined the board of the Co-op Group, and was later made its deputy chairman. He resigned from the Group board and all subsidiary positions in June 2013, after his enforced resignation from Co-op Bank that month. 
Flowers testified to the Treasury Select Committee in November 2013 that the Britannia merger and other deals were undertaken under pressure from senior government ministers. 
In March 2018 Flowers was banned from the financial services industry by the Financial Conduct Authority (FCA) for having used his work email for sexually explicit messages and to discuss illegal drugs, and his work mobile phone to call premium rate chat lines. The FCA said he had "demonstrated a lack of fitness and propriety required to work in financial services" and consumers would lose faith in the industry if he was allowed to continue in it. 
In the 1970s Flowers was vice-chairman of Eastleigh Labour Party, and contested Bishop's Waltham in Hampshire county council elections in 1981. 
Flowers unsuccessfully stood for selection in 1985 as the Labour candidate to contest the Coventry South East parliamentary seat, supported by branches of his union as a former bank worker, the General, Municipal, Boilermakers and Allied Trade Union. He described himself as "towards the centre" politically in this campaign. 
In the Rochdale council election of 1988 he gained a seat in the Smallbridge and Wardleworth ward, holding it until 1992. Flowers was vice-chairman of Rochdale Council's social services committee at the time of a Satanic abuse scandal, and was responsible for rejecting allegations of child sex abuse against the late MP Cyril Smith. 
He then moved to Bradford, serving for 10 years on the city council. He resigned his seat in Great Horton in September 2011, because of his "increased responsibilities as Co-op Bank's chairman." In light of the 2013 drugs scandal, Bradford City Council revealed that, in 2011, "Inappropriate but not illegal adult content was found on a council computer handed in by Councillor Flowers for servicing. This was put to him and he resigned immediately." 
In 2010 he was appointed by new Labour Party leader Ed Miliband to the party's finance and industry advisory board. On 6 March 2013 as part of his membership of the group, Labour leader Ed Miliband met Flowers to discuss UK banking reform. 
Flowers has been involved with a large number of charities, including being a trustee of both the Terrence Higgins Trust and, between 1992 and 2004, the Lifeline project, which worked in the field of alcohol and drug abuse. Following the scandal of November 2013, the Lifeline project stated that at the time of his resignation he was under investigation following alleged submission of false expenses claims, with the matter having then been referred to the Charity Commission. 
In the 1980s he was vice-chairman of the West Midlands Citizens Advice Bureau. Flowers has been a member of the Advertising Standards Authority, and was vice chair of the National Association of Citizens Advice Bureau. 
Flowers was immediately suspended by the Methodist Church for three weeks (later extended to indefinite suspension) pending further investigation, and suspended as a member of the Labour Party. Flowers in a statement said: 
This year has been incredibly difficult, with a death in the family and the pressures of my role with the Co-operative Bank. At the lowest point in this terrible period, I did things that were stupid and wrong. I am sorry for this, and I am seeking professional help, and apologise to all I have hurt or failed by my actions
Co-operative Group chairman Len Wardle, who had been part of the committee which had selected Flowers and was scheduled to retire in May 2014, resigned in light of the revelations. He was replaced by Ursula Lidbetter, Co-op Group's deputy chair and chief executive of the Lincolnshire Co-operative Society. 
David Cameron announced in the House of Commons that he would be setting up inquiries to determine how Flowers had come to be appointed chairman of the Co-op Bank. 
Allium carmeli  is a species of flowering plant in the Amaryllidaceae family. It is found in Israel, Palestine, Syria and Lebanon. It is a bulb-forming perennial with pink flowers. 
The Media Dispatch Protocol (MDP) was developed by the Pro-MPEG Media Dispatch Group to provide an open standard for secure, automated, and tapeless delivery of audio, video and associated data files. Such files typically range from low resolution content for the web to HDTV and high-resolution digital intermediate files for cinema production. 
MDP is essentially a middleware protocol that decouples the technical details of how delivery occurs from the business logic that requires delivery. For example, a TV post-production company might have a contract to deliver a programme to a broadcaster.  An MDP agent allows users be able to deal with company and programme names, rather than with filenames and network endpoints. It can also provide a delivery service as part of a service oriented architecture. 
MDP acts as a communication layer between business logic and low-level file transfer mechanisms, providing a way to securely communicate and negotiate transfer-specific metadata about file packages, delivery routing, deadlines, and security information, and to manage and coordinate file transfers in progress, whilst hooking all this information to project, company and job identifiers. 
MDP works by implementing a 'dispatch transaction' layer by which means agents negotiate and agree the details of the individual file transfers required for the delivery, and control, monitor and report on the progress of the transfers. At the heart of the protocol is the 'Manifest' - an XML document that encapsulates the information about the transaction. 
MDP is based on existing open technologies such as XML, HTTP and TLS. The protocol is specified in a layered way to allow the adoption of new technologies (e.g. Web Services protocols such as SOAP and WSDL) as required. 
Since early 2005, multiple implementations based on draft versions of the Media Dispatch Protocol have been in use, both for technical testing, and, since April 2005, for real-world production work. The experience with these implementations, both at the engineering level, and at the practical production level, has been rolled into the 1.0rcX specification.  
Media Dispatch Protocol (MDP) has been standardized by a SMPTE Working Group under the S22 Committee. This work has been published as SMPTE 2032-1-2007 (MDP specification), 2032-2-2007 (MDP/XML/HTTP mapping specification) and 2032-3-2007 (MDP Target pull profile specification). MDP is also supported by SMPTE Engineering Guideline EG 2032-4-2007 covering the use of MDP. 
ABC TV, formerly known as ABC1, is an Australian national public television network. It is owned and operated by the Australian Broadcasting Corporation, and is the flagship ABC Television network. The headquarters of ABC TV channel and the ABC are in Ultimo, an inner-city suburb of Sydney, New South Wales.  
Direct television relays between Sydney, Melbourne and Canberra were established in 1961, and in 1963, using microwave transmission as a temporary measure, television programs from Adelaide were viewed simultaneously across the four eastern capitals. Videotape equipment, allowing the sharing of footage with much greater ease and speed, was installed in each state capital by 1962. 
On 7 March 2005 a new digital channel called ABC2 (now ABC TV Plus) was launched, according to then Director of ABC New Media and Digital Services Lynley Marshall, "like the 'younger sibling' of ABC main channel", running on a very low budget. A large amount of its schedule was dedicated to regional issues, with programmes such as Australia Wide, Landline and Stateline. 
At midday on 8 February 2008 ABC TV was re-branded as ABC1, with the standard-definition redirect channel moved from LCN22 to LCN2. Further cementing the change in identity was the change from the slogan There's more to television to It begins with 1. After concerns in some sections of the media that the 43-year-old Lissajous curve brand was to disappear completely, ABC management reaffirmed that it would remain in use by the corporation. 
On 6 February 2011, ABC1 launched its new branding via idents featuring a range of channel personalities, including the face of the channel Adam Hills, with the new tagline "ThinkEntertainment". A new watermark is also aired with a single "1" above the network's famous Lissajous curve logo. 
On 10 December 2013, ABC stopped broadcasting on analogue TV and is now only available through digital TV or digital set-top box.[citation needed] 
ABC is required by charter to meet certain programming obligations. Although it has a strong focus on news and current affairs, it also presents documentaries and educational programmes, drama, light entertainment comedy and variety, and sports. 
ABC News, broadcast on ABC, is a national news service produced by the News, Analysis & Investigations division of the Australian Broadcasting Corporation. 
Other flagship programmes, which include the weeknightly 7.30 and the weekly Four Corners, Australian Story and Foreign Correspondent, are broadcast in prime-time. Landline, Insiders, Offsiders, Media Watch cover rural, political and business, sport and media affairs respectively. 
The ABC HD multi-channel was launched on 1 January 2008. The service provided a 720p simulcast of ABN Sydney nationwide. The channel was closed on 22 July 2010 and its HD channel space was re-purposed for the ABC News channel. ABC HD was relaunched on 6 December 2016 as a simulcast of ABC, localised to each state, reducing the news channel to SD. 
Most ABC TV programmes are also available on demand via ABC iview, a video-on-demand and catch-up TV service which became available on 24 July 2008.  
In the early years, ABC TV had been using Lissajous curves with its initials, ABC TV, inside it as fillers in-between programmes. A staff competition was conducted in July 1963 to create a new logo for the whole of the ABC. Bill Kennard, who was senior graphic designer at the ABC, came up with the winning design. On 1 May 1964, the logo was officially adopted by the ABC. 
The basic logo has been adapted and modified several times over the years, for its flagship television channel as well as other channels introduced in the 2000s, radio, ABC Online, ABC iview and other corporate products and equipment. 
The tournament used two lists for seeding the women's singles event; one for U.S. players and one for foreign players. Maureen Connolly is the champion; others show in brackets the round in which they were eliminated. 
Seychelles competed in the Olympic Games for the first time at the 1980 Summer Olympics in Moscow, USSR. 
Later that year, Rocha received a call from friend Benjamin Harper, lead guitarist for Yellowcard, and was asked to join Craig's Brother (Tooth and Nail, Takeover Records) on rhythm guitar/vocals for an upcoming tour supporting Yellowcard, The Starting Line and The Matches. The tour lasted two and half weeks going through the northeast US and Canada.  This was Rocha's last involvement in music on a professional level for many years. 
In 2010, Bear Cub played sold-out shows in Pittsburgh, quickly selling thousands of copies of their first two albums, S/T and Always Be Down. Eventually, the band decided to move to Nashville.  Moving the band proved to be a bad judgement as Bear Cub was only able to flourish for a small amount of time before eventually disbanding.  Rocha left Bear Cub in the summer of 2011, during which time the band was writing and recording their third album, Good Morning, Every Morning. 
At the same time Rocha continued developing his ear in the recording studio working with local artists in South Florida and building the instruments and tools that became The Kitchen Recording Studio in Oakland Park, Florida, which is where Rocha is currently Chief Engineer/Producer. 
Rocha is currently working with a multitude of artists in South Florida covering a broad range of genres from Blues to R&B, and Punk Rock to Rap.  He joined Askultura as lead guitarist/backup vocalist and quit the band during their summer 2016 Supernova Tour. 
"In Your Footsteps" is the seventh episode of the fourth season of the American animated television series Adventure Time. The episode was written and storyboarded by Tom Herpich and Skyler Page, from a story by Patrick McHale, Kent Osborne, and Pendleton Ward. It originally aired on Cartoon Network on April 30, 2012. The episode guest stars Eric Bauza as a bear and features Ward voicing the Lich-possessed snail. 
The episode's ending sets up the fourth season finale "The Lich". Other fourth season episodes were supposed to have had similar kinds of hints sprinkled throughout that also set up the season for the finale, although this did not come to pass. The episode received largely positive critical reviews and ranked as the number one telecast in its timeslot among kids aged 2 to 11, and in all boy demographics, according to Nielsen ratings 
While partying with Princess Bubblegum and her subjects in the woods, Finn and Jake meet a friendly bear (voiced by Eric Bauza) who follows them home. The creature begins to copy everything that Finn does; Finn finds the behavior amusing, but Jake finds it creepy. Later that night, Jake discovers the bear, dressed as Finn, copying his mannerisms and sayings; Jake thus concludes that the creature is trying to replace Finn. However, he is unable to prove it to Finn. 
The ending of the episode sets up the fourth season finale "The Lich". Herpich noted that there were originally supposed to have been other episodes peppered throughout the season that would have hinted at the finale, but in the end, only the denouement of this episode suggested what was to come. The Lich-possessed Snail was voiced by Ward. 
"In Your Footsteps" aired on Cartoon Network on May 7, 2012. The episode ranked as the number one telecast in its timeslot among kids aged 2 to 11, and in all boy demographics, according to Nielsen ratings. The episode first saw physical release as part of the complete fourth season DVD in October 2014. 
Mike Lechevaillier of Slate magazine, in a review of the fourth season, called the episode "charming", and applauded the exploration of Jake's character. He compared the episode favorably to the third season installment "No One Can Hear You" in terms of its focus on "Jake's slippery sanity", and he applauded DiMaggio's voice acting, writing that his "delivery of Jake's panic-stricken sessions is a true testament to the actor's degree of successive theatrical refinement. 
For a summary of the major tournaments and events of 2005, including the major championships and the World Golf Championships, see 2005 in golf. 
Changes from the 2004 season included five new tournaments: the Volvo China Open and TCL Classic in China, making a total of five events in the country, the Indonesia Open, the New Zealand Open and the Abama Open de Canarias, as the tour retained a stop in the Canary Islands. The ANZ Championship, Open de Sevilla and The Heritage were lost from the schedule. 
In 2005, the European Tour's money list was known as the "Order of Merit". It was calculated in euro, although around half of the events had prize funds which were fixed in other currencies, mostly either British pounds or U.S. dollars. In these instances the amounts were converted into euro at the exchange rate for the week that the tournament was played. The top 10 golfers in 2005 were: 
The castle in Forchheim (German: Burg in Forchheim), also referred to as a royal palace or Kaiserpfalz, was an important urban castle under the bishops of Bamberg in the town of Forchheim  in the south German state of Bavaria. The castle was built in the late 14th century. After comprehensive archaeological and architectural-historical investigation it has become one of the best researched castles of this period in Central Europe. Today it houses the Archaeological Museum of Upper Franconia. 
Large parts of the main house and the courtyard buildings go back to the 14th century. The eastern part of the main house is joined to the courtyard buildings on the west side by walls and timber-framed passageways. The two upper storeys of the northwest wing have also been executed in a simple, timber-framed style as far as the castle courtyard. 
The addition of a modern, steel and glass staircase and lift tower in the north of the east wing has been highly controversial. This feature was needed to turn the castle into a museum. 
The East Wing of the castle is divided into two parts by a transverse wall running the width of the building. The north part is somewhat larger than the south part. The barrel-roofed cellar goes back to the 14th century. The ceilings of the two halls on the ground floor are borne on sandstone columns.  
On the second floor of the northern end of the wing is also a twin-aisled, flat-ceiling hall with a wooden centre beam. The architectural paintings were done by Jakob Ziegler in the years 1559/60. The south room is likewise a two-aisled hall. The flat ceiling is supported on an octagonal centre frame. The murals, of various themes, were also created by Jakob Ziegler. One of the paintings shows Saints Henry II and Cunigunde with the model of Bamberg Cathedral (drawn in 1599, south wall). 
The third floor was conceived as a storage area and currently serves as a museum depot. The old staircase tower hides a stone circular staircase which opens into the northern part of the east wing. 
The West Wing, the former side wing, acts as offices for the castle museums. No significant historical interior features have survived here. 
"Natalie Don't" is a song by British singer-songwriter Raye released on 10 July 2020 as the third single from her debut mini-album, Euphoric Sad Songs. The track was written by Raye, John Blanda and John Hill and produced by the two latter. An accompanying music video was released alongside the song on 10 July 2020. 
A music video directed by Fiona Jane Burgess was premiered alongside the single's release on 10 July 2020. The video consists of Raye in a pink, vintage bedroom acting out her own guide of how to get over a relationship. 
Mark Savage of BBC News expressed similar praises stating that the track was "a funky, modern successor to [Dolly] Parton's classic, [Jolene]. 
Parotis fallacialis is a moth in the family Crambidae. It was described by Snellen in 1890. It is found in India (Sikkim). 
Richmond Art Center is a nonprofit arts organization based in Richmond, California, founded in 1936. 
In 1936, Richmond-resident Hazel Salmi began teaching classes under the Emergency Education Program (EEP) of the Works Progress Administration (WPA). In 1938, the City of Richmond granted Salmi an old Health Department building to use for classes and exhibitions. Early classes included outdoor sketching, block printing, flower arrangement, color, woodcarving, and leather tooling. 
Richmond Art Center's new facility opened in 1951. Hazel Salmi was director at Richmond Art Center until 1960. 
The 2020 board members are: Patricia Guthrie, President; Sarah Antonich, Vice President; Jacelyn Robinso, Treasurer; Roshni Kavate; Danny Aarons; Donna Brorby; Marguerite Thompson Browne; Philip Linhares; Stephen Nomura; Carlos Privat; Owen Serra; and James Wheeler. 
In 2020, COVID-19 shelter-in-place orders temporarily closed Richmond Art Center's facility to the public and the organization launched online arts instruction. 
Victor Kunonga (born October 25, 1974) is a Zimbabwean award-winning Afro-jazz singer and songwriter. Though having come to light in 2004, Victor quickly rose to fame with his first two albums and was a household name by 2007. 
Victor Kunonga was born in Zimbabwe's Shurugwi but grew up in the rural area of Hwedza. Victor's family later moved to live in the country's second largest city of Bulawayo and later to the capital city Harare, where he discovered his dormant musical talent. 
Victor derives inspiration from the masters of Zimbabwean music namely Oliver Mtukudzi, Thomas Mapfumo, Louis Mhlanga, Chiwoniso Maraire and from general traditional rhythms. Through working with non-governmental organisations, Victor has been vocal in fighting social ills such as gender-based violence and drug abuse. 
His first album released in 2004, became a hit based on the songs "Maidarirei", "Ndanyengetedzwa namai" and "Tigere". 
The album sold very well and music video for "Maidarirei" also did very well on Zimbabwean TV music video charts. "Such is Life: Ndanyengetedzwa" song list: 
On Victor's second album, "Uyo", released in 2006, big names in Afro-Jazz appeared, this includes celebrated drummer, Sam Mataure, female jazz vocalist Prudence Katomeni, bassist Kelly Rusike, keyboardist Manasa Mujawo, Guitarist Zivanai Masango, percussionist Adam Chisvo, Richie Lopez on saxophone. His second offering made an equally big success on Zimbabwean music charts and is still very much popular to date. "Uyo" Song list: 
George K. Ilsley (born 1958) is a Canadian writer. He has published a collection of short stories, Random Acts of Hatred, which focuses on the lives of gay and bisexual men from childhood to early adulthood, and a novel, ManBug. His new memoir is The Home Stretch: A Father, a Son, and All the Things They Never Talk About (2020, Arsenal Pulp Press). 
Originally from the Annapolis Valley in Nova Scotia, he has since been based in Vancouver, British Columbia. Prior to launching his career as a writer, he studied law, but decided not to become a lawyer. His writing has also appeared in the anthologies Queeries, Contra/Diction and First Person Queer, and in the literary magazines The Church-Wellesley Review, Event, Prairie Fire and Plenitude. 
ManBug was a shortlisted finalist for the ReLit Award for Fiction in 2007. Ilsley was awarded an Honour of Distinction citation by the Writers' Trust of Canada's Dayne Ogilvie Grant in 2010, and his 2014 piece "Bingo and Black Ice" won subTerrain magazine's Lush Triumphant Award for creative non-fiction in 2014. 
The first part of the name of the village comes from the River Isle, which separates the parish from Isle Abbotts and the second from the family of William Brewer (Briwere) who were the lords of the manor in the early 13th century. 
The village falls within the Non-metropolitan district of South Somerset, which was formed on 1 April 1974 under the Local Government Act 1972, having previously been part of Langport Rural District. The district council is responsible for local planning and building control, local roads, council housing, environmental health, markets and fairs, refuse collection and recycling, cemeteries and crematoria, leisure services, parks, and tourism. 
Somerset County Council is responsible for running the largest and most expensive local services such as education, social services, libraries, main roads, public transport, policing and  fire services, trading standards, waste disposal and strategic planning. 
It is also part of the Yeovil county constituency represented in the House of Commons of the Parliament of the United Kingdom. It elects one Member of Parliament (MP) by the first past the post system of election. 
The Anglican parish church of All Saints was built in 1861 by Charles Edmund Giles. The original Church of All Saints stood near the Domesday mill, and the current building was funded by the vicar Joseph Wolff, a Jewish Christian missionary of German ancestry who converted to Catholicism, before being ordained in the Anglican church. He later died in the village. 
The Thai authorities have a policy of not officially acknowledging the existence of controversial WikiLeaks cables, and so did not comment on #thaistory, but Thanong Khanthong, managing editor of the generally pro-establishment Nation newspaper, claimed it was part of an international plot to destabilise Thailand. 
Marshall has done extensive research into the mysterious shooting of Ananda Mahidol, King Rama VIII of Thailand, on 9 June 1946. He argues that the evidence overwhelmingly suggests Bhumibol Adulyadej killed his brother, probably accidentally, and this was covered up to enable Bhumibol to become king. 
On 11 November 2014 Thai police chief General Somyot Poompanmuang announced that the book had been banned in Thailand. Violators of the ban were liable to a prison term of up to three years and/or a fine of up to 60,000 baht. "The content insults, defames and threatens Thailand's monarchy," Somyot said in a statement. "The book is a danger to national security and peaceful and orderly society." 
Marshall reported the death of Thai King Bhumibol Adulyadej on 13 October 2016, several hours before the official announcement by the royal palace. He was the first journalist in the world to break the news. 
In 1989, tens of thousands of Georgians gathered before the House of Government on Rustaveli Avenue. An attack by the Soviet Spetsnaz forces killed many protesters in the April 9 tragedy. 
The thoroughfare is served by the Tbilisi Metro and buses. It is one metro stop away from another historical artery of Tbilisi, Agmashenebeli Avenue 
Nannamoria amicula is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Volutidae, the volutes. 
Brian graduated from medical school at Duke University and served in the Army Medical Corps in Vietnam. 
Brian then turned to business and in 1980 established his own company, Biotech Capital, a venture capital firm that invested in companies developing medical technology.  Biotech later shifted its focus to news and information services, acquiring interest in the Financial News Network (FNN) and changing the name Biotech in 1987 to Infotechnology.  In 1988, the company acquired United Press International, one of the two major American news wire services at the time. 
Infotechnology encountered financial difficulties and filed for bankruptcy in 1991, as did FNN and UPI. In 1995, Brian was charged with conspiracy and fraud for inflating the value of FNN and UPI in an attempt to secure loans to shore up the companies.  He was convicted of the conspiracy charges in 1996 and sentenced to four years in prison. 
Brian died on November 2, 2020, at the age of 78 in Easton, Maryland. He was buried at Arlington National Cemetery. 
At Seabegs, the outline of Antonine's Wall, has lasted. Archaeologists from previous generations recorded this and stated that the ditch was deep and waterlogged. 
The forts to this fortlet are Castlecary in the west and Rough Castle in the east. Sir George Macdonald and others theorized that because these neighbouring fort were relatively widespread another structure was likely in the Seabegs area. 
No coinage has been recovered nor any inscriptions. There are two marching camps nearby at Dalnair and Milnquarter. 
Many Roman forts along the wall held garrisons of around 500 men. Larger forts like Castlecary and Birrens had a nominal cohort of 1000 men but probably sheltered women and children as well although the troops were not allowed to marry. There is likely too to have been large communities of civilians around the site. 
Russia competed at the 2019 World Aquatics Championships in Gwangju, South Korea from 12 to 28 July. 
Justin K. Freeman is an American academic, teacher, and former nordic skier who represented the United States during the 2006 Winter Olympics. He attended Bates College in Lewiston, Maine where he majored in physics and mathematics, graduating in 1998. He went on to briefly attend the University of Colorado at Boulder for graduate school before being called to compete for the United States Ski Team for the upcoming nationals and olympics in 2006. 
This biographical article relating to American cross-country skiing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about an autobiographical novel of the 1970s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
SR 656 travels through northeastern Delaware County and southeastern Morrow County.  No part of the route is inclusive within the National Highway System. 
This state highway was designated in 1937 along the alignment that it utilizes to this day between SR 61 and SR 229.  SR 656 has not experienced any major changes to its routing since its inception. 
Effective off loading is a key treatment modality for DFUs, particularly those where there is damage to the nerves in the feet (peripheral neuropathy). Along with infection management and vascular assessment, TCC is vital aspect to effectively managing DFUs. TCC is the most effective and reliable method for off-loading DFUs. 
Neuropathic DFUs are chronic wounds that result from a combination of factors. Some of the main factors that result in DFUs include (Figure 1): 
The healing of DFUs requires many weeks, and patients need to be effectively off loaded during this time. A recent publication on the treatment of DFUs identified that the largest potential improvement in DFU care would come about through adoption of effective off loading techniques. 
Effective off-loading is not simple, especially because of the extensive healing time often required. Most patients need to remain mobile to continue with daily life, therefore enforced restrained bed rest or sedation are neither convenient nor recommended methods to achieve effective off loading. Instead, various non constraining off-loading methods, from bed rest, crutches and wheelchairs, to complex fixed and removable boots are used to allow the patient continued movement. 
Other than bed rest, wheelchairs and crutches, none of which are supported by published clinical evidence as effective methods, off-loading devices (Figure 2) can be functionally classified into two groups: 
A recent Cochrane review of off-loading devices found that non-removable, pressure-reducing casts were the most effective off-loading devices for DFUs. Although another recent review of the efficacy of different off-loading techniques and devices highlighted a paucity of clinical evidence for many. 
Pressure is a major issue for patients with diabetes and an even greater challenge for those who are also obese, because each step taken increases the pressure of bodyweight on each foot by 2 to 2.5 times. It is, therefore, necessary to slow down the rhythm and speed of walking of the patient and reduce the strain rate (defined as force divided by time). 
Immobilization of the ankle joint reduces pressure in the forefoot and plantar regions from the propulsion phase of walking, which occurs during forward motion. Both TCCs and removable cast walkers can immobilize the ankle, but TCC ensures constant use by the patient. 
TCC reduces the stride length, which slows down the foot and reduces the force applied to the foot. TCC has been shown to reduce plantar pressure by 32%, 63%, and 69% on the fifth, fourth, and first metatarsal heads, respectively; 65% on the great toe; and 45% on the heel. TCC can be used to off-load the heel, but a panel of experts agreed that this approach might not be as effective as for off-loading of forefoot ulcers. 
The use of TCC as the most effective off loading method is strongly supported by clinical evidence. Randomized clinical trials provide strong evidence of reduced healing time and greater numbers of healed DFUs for TCC when compared to other methods. 
Lavery et al. (2014) showed that TCC had a wound closure rate of 88.9%, compared to 50% for healing sandal and 40% for shear-reducing walking boot. They also showed that median time to healing for TCC was 5.4 weeks, compared to 8.9 weeks for a healing sandal and 6.7 weeks for sheer reducing walking boot. 
Armstrong et al. (2001) determined that TCC had a healing rate of 88.9%, compared to 65% for a removable cast walker and 58.3% for a half-shoe, and time to healing was least for TCC at 4.8 weeks, compared to 7.2 weeks for the removable cast walker and 8.7 weeks for the half-shoe. This data was reiterated by Lavery almost 14 years later in a newer study (Figure 3). 
Another new system, TrueKast, has a built in saw for ease in removal. This can prevent forced compliance from the patient and is also risky. Many experienced physicians are concerned putting a saw blade in-between a patient's skin and a hardened layer of fiberglass.  Many patients with DFU's have peripheral neuropathy and poses a serious potential hazard. 
BSN Medicals' Cutimed (acquired by Svenska Cellulosa Aktiebolaget in 2016) is a traditional fiberglass total contact cast system utilizing top of the line BSN cast tape. 
M-Medical provides a traditional fiberglass total contact cast system with patented padding protection preventing iatrogenic lesions. One size fits all. 
Overall, clinical evidence strongly supports the use of TCC in the treatment of DFUs, and the high efficacy of TCC comes with low risk of major complications. TCC should therefore continue to be the gold standard for the treatment of DFUs. 
Alis composed a series of englynion discussing the kind of husband which she wished to marry and commenting on her father's second marriage in old age, and a cywydd to reconcile Dafydd Llwyd Llydan and Grigor y Moch. 
John McGeehan is a British research scientist and professor of structural biology. He is director of the Centre for Enzyme Innovation (CEI) at the University of Portsmouth and leads a research team on enzyme engineering. 
In 2018, McGeehan co-led an international team of scientists who characterized and engineered an enzyme with the ability to breakdown crystalline polyethylene terephthalate (PET), the primary material used in the manufacture of single-use plastic bottles, in some clothing, and in carpets. The bacteria that produces this enzyme, Ideonella sakaiensis, was originally discovered and isolated in a recycling plant by a Japanese research group in 2016. 
Plastics such as PET, while incredibly versatile, are resistant to natural breakdown and are now an increasing source of pollution in the environment. The research team aims to develop improved enzymes to breakdown plastics into their original building blocks so they can be reused as part of a circular plastics economy. 
The initial research story was covered widely in the press in 2018 (The Times, The Guardian, and The Economist), television media (BBC, ITV, CNN, CBS, Al Jazeera, and HBO), and by funding organisations, including the BBSRC and UKRI. 
The team has continued to make further improvements to enzymes that can break down plastics through the characterisation of natural bacterial systems followed by laboratory protein engineering. 
McGeehan went to school at Largs Academy in Ayrshire, Scotland, and earned a bachelor's degree in microbiology from the University of Glasgow in 1993, followed by a PhD in virology at the Medical Research Council (MRC) Virology unit, Glasgow. 
McGeehan has interests in enzymes involved in the breakdown and valorization of biomass such as cellulose and lignin, and the discovery and engineering of enzymes for the breakdown of synthetic polymers such as plastics. 
Marsden, together with Alan Weinstein, was one of the world leading authorities in mathematical and theoretical classical mechanics. He has laid much of the foundation for symplectic topology. The Marsden-Weinstein quotient is named after him. 
Jerrold Marsden died of cancer on September 21, 2010. In 2006 a festschrift was published in honor of Marsden's 60th birthday. In 2015 a memorial volume was published in his honor.  
Flugabwehrraketengeschwader 1 (Air Defence Missile Wing 1) or (FlaRakG 1) "Schleswig-Holstein" is a unit of the German Air Force based in Stadum and Husum, Northern Germany. The wing is equipped with the Patriot air defense missile system. 
On 1 January 2011, Air Defence Missile Wing 1 took formal responsibility of the short-range protection system MANTIS. To operate this weapons system, the air force called into service an additional anti-aircraft group at Husum on 1 April 2011. 
Air Defence Missile Wing 1 was given the honorary name "Schleswig-Holstein" in 1989 and is currently part of the Air Forces's 4th Air Division. 
Based on the agreement between Germany and The Netherlands signed in 2013, this unit will be integrated in The Netherlands ground-based Air Defence Organisation as part of the close cooperation between both countries from 2016 onwards. 
Air Defence Missile Wing 1 utilises the Patriot air defense missile weapon system to engage in anti-aircraft warfare against aircraft and ballistic missiles. 
A bazaar or souk, is a permanently enclosed marketplace or street where goods and services are exchanged or sold. 
Since 2012, it has been located within the boundaries of a 'sanctuary zone' in the Upper Spencer Gulf Marine Park. 
This South Australia protected areas related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
On June 24, 2011 Frankel faced Mexican-American John Molina, Jr. in the main event on ESPN's Friday Night Fights. 
This biographical article relating to Czech cross-country skiing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Nongcun Guangbo is a radio station in Heilongjiang province of the People's Republic of China, broadcasting at 1020 AM. 
"Take a Bow" received positive reviews from music critics. Most praised the production as unexpected and different but one felt it overshadowed Lewis' vocals. Upon the release of Spirit, the song debuted at number 97 on the UK Singles Chart due to strong digital download sales. Lewis performed "Take a Bow" at the Rock in Rio festival and on her 2010 concert tour, The Labyrinth. 
Upon the release of Spirit, "Take a Bow" debuted at number 97 on the strength of digital download sales in the chart issue released on 24 November 2007. 
The first recorded dissection of the human body in the Western world took place in ancient Alexandria by Herophilus and Erasistratus.  Though none of their writings have come down to us, other medical writers recorded what they had discovered. 
St Mary's Church is a Grade I listed building, a parish church in the Church of England in Ottery St Mary, Devon. 
The church is part of "Churches Together in Ottery St Mary" which includes the churches of four other denominations in the town. 
The parish church of St Mary's has been referred to as "a miniature Exeter Cathedral". Like the cathedral it is cruciform in plan, with transepts formed by towers 
In 1335 John Grandisson, Bishop of Exeter, bought the manor and advowson from Rouen and on 22 January 1338 established a collegiate foundation with forty members. He rebuilt much of the church, and the present nave, chancel, aisles and Lady chapel date from this time. The nave is of five bays, and the chancel, unusually long in proportion,  is of six, with vestry chapels to  north and south. 
The college was dissolved on 24 December 1545 and this church began serving the parish, under the management of governors. The other buildings of the college were demolished. 
New choir stalls were dedicated in 1908. They were designed by John Duke Coleridge and paid for by Miss Mary Dickinson in memory of her father, the late Rev. Frederick Binley Dickinson. 
The ancient altar screen had three vacant niches filled with sculptured scenes in 1934. The sculptural work was done in Beer stone, by Herbert Read, sculptor of Exeter, funded by Mrs Winstanley in memory of her husband, Harold Winstanley. 
There is a small stone plaque commemorating the poet Samuel Taylor Coleridge in the south churchyard wall.  Ottery St Mary parish registers are held in the Devon Record Office and begin in 1601. 
Sir Ernest Mason Satow, scholar, diplomat and Japanologist, is buried in the churchyard, and a plaque inside the church, originally at the British Legation chapel in Peking, commemorates his life. 
On 26 September 2015, St Mary's was the location of the first ordination service in the Church of England to be led by a woman: Sarah Mullally, Bishop of Crediton, ordained two deacons as priests. 
The church has had organs since at least the 14th century, as they are mentioned in Bishop Grandisson's statues for the foundation of the collegiate church. By the time the college was dissolved in 1545, there were three organs, but whatever organs survived into the 17th century were destroyed in 1645 during the English Civil War. 
Around 1828, Flight and Robson provided a new organ in the west gallery. This was moved to the south tower in 1849. Hele & Co carried out work in 1878 and again in 1901. After further work in 1934, Eustace and Alldridge from Exeter enlarged the organ by incorporating pipework by Willis and William Hill, and the organ was rebuilt again in 1990 by Michael Farley. A specification of the organ can be found on the National Pipe Organ Register. 
As I Lay Dying is a 2013 American drama film directed and co-written by and starring James Franco, based on William Faulkner's 1930 novel of the same name. The film was screened in the Un Certain Regard Section at the 2013 Cannes Film Festival. 
The story is based on the loss of a mother and the struggles the family endure by going the distance to her burial ground in her home town. 
The film was originally scheduled for a theatrical release on September 27, 2013 but Millennium Films scrapped the plans. It was released on October 22, 2013 to iTunes and November 5, 2013 to DVD/VOD platforms. 
The film received mixed reviews from critics, with praise and criticism focused on Franco's methods of presenting Faulkner's complex narrative. It holds a 40% approval rating on review aggregator Rotten Tomatoes, based on 30 reviews with an average rating of 4.7/10. Metacritic gives the film a weighted average score of 50 out of 100, based on 13 reviews, indicating "mixed or average reviews". 
Hylophorbus is a genus of microhylid frogs endemic to New Guinea. Common name Mawatta frogs has been coined for them. 
This article about a property in Gaston County, North Carolina on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Victoria Jane Asher (born January 20, 1986) is an American musician. She was the keytarist of Cobra Starship until their split in November 2015, and is currently recording as a solo artist under the name Vicky-T. 
In 2006, Gabe Saporta, searching for female keyboardists in New York City, discovered her on MySpace. She subsequently took a leave of absence from university to join Cobra Starship, at the age of 18. She eventually graduated from NYU. 
In 2007, she and her Cobra Starship bandmates went on the Fall Out Boy-headlined Honda Civic Tour, along with +44, The Academy Is..., and Paul Wall. She provided vocals in place of Carol Heller on +44's song "Make You Smile". 
Asher's other musical projects include a band called Optimo, which she formed with friends in Los Angeles, and a brief side project with Frank Staniszewski (keyboardist of Big City Rock) called NotInTown. 
Now a solo artist, Asher still writes her own music, blogs, and creates tour footage montages. She self-released her first single, "Protect This Love", in March 2016. Nine months later, her second single, "Push Comes to Shove", a collaboration with Jon Walker, was uploaded onto her YouTube channel, and released on iTunes the next day. 
In 2016, she created the company Muted Color, as a way to release her own music and to create video content. 
Through Muted Color, she released "Clouds" (2017), "Turn It Low" (2017), "Ghost" (2017), "Another Word for Paradise" (2017), "Kryptonite" (2019), "Hollow" (2019), and her four-track EP, Feeling Myself Without You (2019). 
Later in 2018, she teamed up with her boyfriend Trent Culkin to take over Muted Color and make it into a production company and artist collective. 
In 2019, Victoria brought on Helena Hawkes, whom she met while working at Blumhouse Productions. Victoria, Helena, and Trent will be announcing the new and improved Muted Color in 2020. 
A slow growing tree, variously described as "of free and upright growth", "resembling Cornish Elm in form", and "conical and of dense habit". The leaves are "a fine yellow colour, said to last till autumn", though specimens in the north appear to colour less well (see gallery). A photograph of 'Dicksonii' was published in the Royal Horticultural Society's Gardeners' Encyclopedia of Plants and Flowers (1989). 
The horticulturalist Christopher Lloyd used 'Dickson's Golden Elm' in his herbaceous borders at Great Dixter Gardens, Northiam, East Sussex. Though he gave 'Dampieri Aurea' as a synonym, photographs suggest that the cultivar planted was 'Dicksonii'. 
82 were planted (as Ulmus stricta Wheatleyi aurea) on the boulevard to Long Eaton district boundary before 1939 to commemorate the coronation of King George VI. One example was planted at Pyrford Court, Woking, Surrey before 1985. 
Among the few survivors in the UK are a tall, close-grown specimen beside Durham Cathedral (2017), and two in Peasholm Park, Scarborough, North Yorkshire, rediscovered in 1994 during a National Tree Register audit of the trees in Peasholm Glen. Another specimen stands in Bocombe Mill Cottage Garden, near Parkham, Devon. 
The 2020 Italian Grand Prix (officially known as the Formula 1 Gran Premio Heineken d'Italia 2020) was a Formula One motor race that was held on 6 September 2020 at the Autodromo Nazionale di Monza in Monza, Italy. The race was the eighth round in the 2020 Formula One World Championship. 
The drivers and teams were the same as the season entry list with no additional stand-in drivers for the race. Roy Nissany drove for Williams in the first practice session, replacing George Russell. 
Pirelli brought the C2, C3 and C4 tyres for the race weekend, the second, third, and fourth hardest tyre compounds available. 
The first practice session was interrupted briefly when Max Verstappen crashed at the Ascari chicane. The session ended with Valtteri Bottas fastest ahead of Mercedes teammate Lewis Hamilton and Red Bull driver Alexander Albon third fastest. The second practice session ran without major incidents and concluded with Hamilton fastest, followed by Bottas and Lando Norris of McLaren. 
Bottas was again fastest in third practice, followed by Carlos Sainz Jr. of McLaren and his teammate Norris. The session was briefly red flagged after Daniel Ricciardo stopped his Renault R.S.20 due to a mechanical failure. 
As Claire and Frank Williams ceased their involvement with the Williams team after this Grand Prix, tributes[clarification needed] were paid to the pair from around the paddock, including from George Russell and Nicholas Latifi, the Williams drivers, as they crossed the line.[citation needed] 
The ball event in rhythmic gymnastics  at the 2001 World Games in Akita was played from 22 to 23 August. The competition took place at Akita City Gymnasium. 
A total of 24 athletes entered the competition. The best eight athletes from preliminary round advances to the final. 
Johnny Boy is the 2006 debut album by British indie pop duo Johnny Boy. It contains their previously released singles "You Are the Generation That Bought More Shoes and You Get What You Deserve" and "Johnny Boy Theme," which were extremely well received by critics despite limited distribution. 
NME gave the album 5/10, finding nothing lived up to their debut single. Pitchfork agreed, giving it 5.2/10; they also criticised the limited range of singer Lolly. 
Euthria javanica is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusc in the family Buccinidae, the true whelks. 
The Thatcher Magoun, an extreme clipper launched in 1855, was named after Medford's great shipbuilder, Thatcher Magoun, who died the year that she was launched. 
In his book published in 1937, Hall Gleason comments on the appearance of Thatcher Magoun as follows: "Her figurehead was a life-like image of the father of ship building on the Mystic." 
According to Hall Gleason, Thatcher Magoun made five passages from Boston to San Francisco. For this route, the clipper's fastest journey was completed in 113 days, and its slowest in 152 days. Moreover, in 1869, Thatcher Magoun made seven passages from New York to San Francisco, averaging 96 days per voyage. 
On one of its voyages from New York to San Francisco, Thatcher Magoun carried locomotives CP 88, 89, and 95 for the Central Pacific Railroad company. This voyage began July 10, 1868, and lasted 117 days. 
Thatcher Magoun established the first shipyard in Medford, MA on what is known today as Riverside Avenue, opposite the end of Park Street. In 1803, Magoun laid the keel of his first vessel, the Mt. Aetna, the model of which he had made a few years before. He continued building ships at this location until 1836; eventually his yard was to be the only one in Medford with a ship house. 
Magoun amassed significant wealth by building 84 vessels over the course of his career. He specialized in big ships and brigs, which are 250 tons and larger in size, built for Old China Trade. According to the maritime historian Admiral Samuel Eliot Morison, Magoun's reputation was "second to none among American shipbuilders." 
Hedgpeth was an alternative/indie music festival held in Twin Lakes, Wisconsin, on July 28/29, 2006. 
The event is named for one of its organizers, Jeff Hedgpeth.  The festival was held at Shadow Hill Ranch. 
Following the 2006 edition, Hedgpeth's future was uncertain, but organizers were optimistic even after the slightly lower than expected turnout. However, the promoters announced the event would not be continued after it lost an estimated $100,000 due to lack of ticket sales.[citation needed] 
WBZC began broadcasting in January 1995, and in 1996 was named the number one college radio station in America based on listenership, large coverage area in the nation's fourth-largest radio market and unique programming and content, the award was bestowed by the National Association of College Broadcasters in Providence Rhode Island. The station was a platform launching many careers of prominent broadcasters in the industry today. 
With the moving of the Pemberton campus of Burlington County College, the station ceased its regional programming and transmission on January 18, 2018. 
After being sold to Four Rivers Community Broadcasting Corporation in March 2019, WBZC came back on the air with Word FM and Rowan College's part of the radio station becoming a popular online music and information radio station known as RCBC Radio with a downloadable app heard worldwide on TuneIn and Amazon Alexa. Today, WBZC-FM broadcasts 10,000 watts of Christian radio across the Delaware Valley. 
Free newspapers are distributed from newsstands and traditional newsagent's shops at the entrances of metro stations and other public places. 
Special Criminal Investigation, also known as S.C.I. for short or as Chase HQ II: Special Criminal Investigation in some home versions, is a 1989 vehicular combat racing game published by Taito for arcades. It is the sequel to the 1988 original Chase H.Q. 
Instead of the black Porsche 928 of the first game, the player commands a red example of the just-introduced (at the time) Nissan 300ZX Z32 T-Top Turbo. Unlike the first game, the player is able to fire at offending vehicles, with some cabinets containing buttons on the steering wheel, and others having a fire button on the gearshift, along with a button to activate the nitrous boost. 
The game brings back protagonists Tony Gibson and Det. Raymond Broady of the first game, and their second game appearance. Broady has taken over the driver's seat this time, while Gibson, as the passenger, serves as the gunman.  Also, instead of Nancy, Karen is the officer delivering reports of whom the criminal is pursuing, and what they are driving. 
Conversions for Amiga, Atari ST, PC, Commodore 64 and ZX Spectrum were released in 1991 by Ocean Software, developed by Glasgow's ICE Software. A conversion for the PC Engine (TurboGrafx-16) was released in January 1991 exclusively in Japan by Taito. Natsume ported it to the Sega Master System. An Amstrad CPC version was written but never released, and only a small number of cartridges are known to exist. 
In 1996, Taito released an emulation of the arcade original for the Sega Saturn in Japan, bundled together with Chase H.Q. on one disc. 
In Japan, Game Machine listed Special Criminal Investigation on their December 1, 1989 issue as being the second most-successful upright arcade unit of the month. It went on to become Japan's third highest-grossing dedicated arcade game of 1990, below Super Monaco GP and Winning Run Suzuka GP. The arcade game was also a major hit in Europe, particularly the United Kingdom where Taito shipped 1,500 units by January 1990. 
In aviation, lateral navigation (LNAV, usually pronounced el-nav) is azimuth navigation, without vertical navigation (VNAV). Area navigation (RNAV) approach plates include LNAV as a non-precision instrument approach (NPA).  When combined with VNAV, the resulting instrument approach, LNAV/VNAV, is referred to as an Approach with Vertical Guidance (APV). 
This article about a historic property or district in Monroe County, New York, listed on the National Register of Historic Places, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Ebbe Bassey is a Nigerian American actress, who was nominated for Africa Movie Academy Award for Best Actress in a Supporting Role for playing "Maa Dede" in Ties That Bind (2011). 
Bassey was born in United States, but spent her teenage years in Calabar before relocating permanently. She is married to Mark Manczuk. 
Wavves is the debut studio album by the American band Wavves. It was originally released on cassette format before being re-released on LP/CD formats. 
This article about a punk rock album from the 2000s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The first house was built in Glenwood in 1878 on the Bush Ranch, later renamed White Water for the creek that runs through it. When it was a stage stop the town was called Glenwood Springs, and in 1901 the town was formally named Glenwood. New Mexico's first powered airplane flight happened in 1909 near Glenwood. 
Glenwood is home to the Gila National Forest Glenwood Ranger Station and the Glenwood State Trout Hatchery. 
Khairul Kabir Khokon is a Bangladesh Nationalist Party politician and a former Member of Parliament from Narsingdi-1, who currently serves as the party's assistant secretary. 
This article about a Bangladesh Nationalist Party politician is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
At the beginning of the nineteenth century in the cemetery area there was only holly, and there was no other natural nor artificial protection for the tombs scattered in the countryside, where cattle were grazing. The cypresses that adorn the cemetery today were planted later on. In 1824 a moat was erected that surrounded the ancient part of the cemetery. In ancient times crosses or inscriptions were forbidden, as in all non-Catholic cemeteries, at least until 1870. 
For a long time there have been common graves divided by nations: Germany, Greece, Sweden and Romania. 
As of 2011, the custody and management of the cemetery was entrusted to foreign representatives in Italy. 
The great, hundred-year-old cypresses, the green meadow that surrounds part of the tombs, the white pyramid that stands behind the enclosure of Roman walls, together with the cats that walk undisturbed among the tombstones written in all the languages of the world, give to this small cemetery a peculiar aura. As in use in Anglo-Saxon cemeteries, there are no photographs on the tombstones. 
Keats died in Rome of tuberculosis at the age of 25, and is buried in the cemetery. His epitaph, which does not mention him by name, is by his friends Joseph Severn and Charles Armitage Brown, and reads: 
This grave contains all that was mortal, of a young English poet, who on his death bed, in the bitterness of his heart, at the malicious power of his enemies, desired these words to be engraven on his tombstone: Here lies one whose name was writ in water.
Shelley drowned in 1822 in a sailing accident off the Italian Riviera. When his body washed up upon the shore, a copy of Keats's poetry borrowed from Leigh Hunt was discovered in his pocket, doubled back, as though it had been put away in a hurry. He was cremated on the beach near Viareggio by his friends, the poet Lord Byron and the English adventurer Edward John Trelawny. His ashes were sent to the British consulate in Rome, who had them interred in the Protestant Cemetery some months later. 
Shelley's heart supposedly survived cremation and was snatched out of the flames by Trelawny, who subsequently gave it to Shelley's widow, Mary. When Mary Shelley died, the heart was found in her desk wrapped in the manuscript of "Adonais," the elegy Shelley had written the year before upon the death of Keats, in which the poet urges the traveller, "Go thou to Rome ...". 
Shelley's heart was finally buried, encased in silver, in 1889, with the son who survived him, Sir Percy Florence Shelley, but his gravestone in the Protestant Cemetery is inscribed: Cor cordium ("heart of hearts"), followed by a quotation from Shakespeare's The Tempest: 
The construction of the railway between Moscow and Sergiyev Posad was completed in 1862. The passenger traffic was opened on August 18, 1862, and the freight traffic on the Moscow - Sergiev Posad section was opened on October 3, 1862. In 1869, it was extended to Yaroslavl. The railway line between Mytishchi and Fryazevo was open in several installments: In 1895, to Shchyolkovo, in 1929 to Monino, in 1930 to Ivanteyevka, in 1935 to Fryazino, and in 1970 to Fryazevo. 
In 1900, a railway line connecting Beskudnikovo and Losinoostrovskaya was constructed. This was done in order to facilitate the railway traffic between Moscow and Kimry (Savyolovo), since Moscow Savyolovsky railway station was not open yet. After a tram line from central line to Medvedkovo was built, in 1966 a direct connection to Losinoostrovskaya was discontinued, and the whole railway line was demolished in 1987. 
In 1930, a railway line between Mytishchi and Pirogovo was built. It was closed down in 1997 and subsequently demolished. 
Following the standard notations in Russia, a railway station below is called a station if it is a terminus or if it has a cargo terminal, and it is called a platform (railway stop) otherwise. 
The opening night of Artaxerxes (2 February 1762) at the Theatre Royal, Covent Garden proved very successful. The work was revived at the theatre the following year, although this second run was marred by a riot. On 24 February 1763 a mob protesting the abolition of half-price admissions stormed the theatre in the middle of the performance. According to a contemporary account in The Gentleman's Magazine: 
 The mischief done was the greatest ever known on any occasion of the like kind: all the benches of the boxes and pit being entirely tore up, the glasses and chandeliers broken, and the linings of the boxes cut to pieces. The rashness of the rioters was so great, that they cut away the wooden pillars between the boxes, so if the inside of them had not been iron, they would have brought down the galleries upon their heads.
Artaxerxes, the King's younger son, arrives with his guards. Artabanes tells him of his father's death and accuses Artaxerxes's older brother Darius of the murder, "Who but he at dead of night could penetrate The palace? Who could approach the royal bed? Nay, more, his royal ambition..." Artaxerxes commands Artabanes to avenge his father's death by killing Darius. Later in the garden, Artaxerxes expresses his love to Semira, the daughter of Artabanes and sister of Arbaces. 
Artabanes is now faced with seeing his son die or confessing the truth. He confesses to all that he has poisoned the cup, intending to kill Artaxerxes and that he had also assassinated Xerxes. Artabanes is led off in chains. Artaxerxes, out of his love for Semira and his gratitude to Arbaces, condemns their father to eternal exile rather than death. The opera ends with the two pairs of lovers reunited and the jubilation of all. 
A live recording of a 1979 BBC concert performance was once available on LP. However, the first major studio recording to be released on CD is from Hyperion Records. 
The performance of Artaxerxes at the Royal Opera House, Covent Garden in 2009 to celebrate Arne's 300th birthday was followed by release of a studio recording in 2010 by Linn Records. 
Neumarkt am Wallersee is a town in the district of Salzburg-Umgebung in the state of Salzburg in Austria. 
During the Napoleonic Wars, in December 1800, Neumarkt am Wallersee was the scene of a military action between the Austrian Army, fleeing after its major defeat in the Battle of Hohenlinden, and the pursuing French Army. The Austrians fared badly in this as in other engagements of this campaign. 
Dumunichowki is a village in Kamrup rural district, in the state of Assam, India, situated in north bank of river Brahmaputra. 
The village is located near National Highway 15 and connected to nearby towns and cities like Baihata and Guwahati with regular buses and other modes of transportation. 
The educational institution was established by royal decree on December 23, 1640 by Governor-General Sebastian Hurtado de Corcuera. It closed down in 1644. 
This article about a non-fiction television series is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Jones was born in 1955 and educated at Trinity College, Dublin. He was ordained in 1980. After curacies in Seapatrick  and Bangor he held incumbencies at Drumgath, Finaghy, Cairncastle and Athlone before his time as Dean. Since 2012 he has been at St John Malone, Belfast. 
In 1998, Wong was spotted on the street by a talent scout and filmed a lemon tea commercial. Recruiters offered him further opportunities but Wong insisted on finishing his high school first. After graduating from high school, Wong joined broadcasting network TVB in 1999 at age 19. Wong hosted various variety programs and played an extra in various drama series. 
Wong was cast as Chiu Bing in director Fire Lee's debut movie Love In Time (2012) and gained positive applause for his sincere and realistic performance. He received positive reviews for his performance as the central character Sit Ho Ching in Golden Brother. which subsequently won him Best Leading Actor award at the 2014 China Image Film Festival. 
Wong starred in the 2016 drama series Two Steps From Heaven, alongside Priscilla Wong, Edwin Siu, and Louis Cheng. He portrays Sheldon Chun, a public relations director who, in hopes of climbing the social ladder, becomes ruthless. 
In December 2016, Wong announced he will not be renewing his management contract with TVB, ending his 17-year career at the station. His last TVB drama was Heart of Greed 3. 
In October 2008, Bosco signed a record deal with East Asia Music and released his debut EP in December of the same year. 
Wong began dating War of In-laws co-star Myolie Wu in 2005. On July 25, 2012, Wong announced that the two had split. In 2014, Wong began dating model Vanessa Yeung. The two were seen together on a date on February 3. The couple broke up later that year. 
2008 - Debut EP: In Love with Bosco (Release date: Dec 5, 2008) 2010 - EP: Bravo (Release date: June 3, 2010). 
The currently-operating West Chester Railroad is a tourist railroad which runs trains between West Chester and Glen Mills, Pennsylvania, on the Media/West Chester Branch. 
This United States railway company-related article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Italian Communist Youth Federation (Italian: Federazione Giovanile Comunista Italiana, FGCI) was the youth wing of the Partito Comunista Italiano (PCI), and the direct heir of the Federazione Giovanile Comunista d'Italia of the PCd'I. 
On 8 October 1990 Gianni Cuperlo (the secretary of the FGCI) proposed to Ariccia, following the line of Achille Occhetto, that the FGCI be dissolved in order to create the Sinistra Giovanile, a federal organisation with the aim of creating four associations in schools, in territories, in universities, in workplaces, all federated together.  The proposal was passed, with 91 votes in favour, 10 abstentions and 13 against. 
When the Party of Italian Communists (PdCI) was born in 1998 as the result of a split in the PRC, the new party created the Youth Federation of Italian Communists (FGCI) on the model of the dissolved federation. 
Brent Sommerhauser is an American sculptor, glassblower, and artist based in Las Vegas, Nevada. He is known for his large-scale sculptures and his glass art, as well as for sculptural drawings. 
He has been an instructor at the College for Creative Studies, Hastings College, the Kansas City Art Institute, Pilchuck Glass School, and The Ohio State University, and is an assistant professor at the University of Nevada, Las Vegas. 
Sommerhauser attended Butler Community College, Emporia State University, and The Ohio State University. He received a bachelor's degree in psychology and a Master of Fine Arts. 
While studying for his master's degree, Sommerhauser began to analyze interiors of architectural spaces and study how they are used to describe psychic or mental space, drawing upon Emily Dickinson's poetry and Carl Jung's theories. He began entering homes that had been designated for demolition and cutting holes in floors and walls to explore what he saw as a merging of psychology, poetry and stories. 
Sommerhauser is described as an organic artist. His installations include large-scale sculptures that mimic towers and sinkholes, the latter being inspired by Sommerhauser seeing a photograph of a dam's spillway. He also makes use of found materials, such as a discarded door, and flooring materials which have been re-engineered to create organic visual effects. 
Slavyanskaya Square and southbound Varvarka Gates Square form a contiguous city square, but are officially different locations, a fact that may confuse even Muscovites. To add to this confusion, Staraya Square is not a square per se but a city street (closed to regular traffic) that discharges into Varvarka Gates Square. In the past, Staraya (Old) and Novaya (New) Squares frequently interchanged their names, too. 
Buildings with street numbers assigned to Slavyanskaya Square are: Church of All Saints on the southern side of the square and the 1900s office block behind it; all other buildings in the square are assigned to Lubyansky Lane and Varvarka Gates Square. 
The area was urbanized within 15th century; Kitai-gorod wall was erected in the 1530s, on the raised hill. Existing Church of All Saints was built in the 1480s and subsequently rebuilt in the 17th century. 
The boulevard north from the square was formed in two stages; first, the old Apple Market near Novaya Square was replaced with a boulevard across Polytechnical Museum (1880s, with the 1887 Plevna Monument). Next, the southern part of the boulevard was cleaned up with the demolition of Varvarka Gated market. 
The two squares acquired their present shape in 1934, when the State demolished Kitai-gorod tower blocking the exit from Varvarka Street and the fortress wall between Staraya Square and Kitaisky Lane. Remains of the tower are visible in an underground vestibule of Kitay-Gorod subway station. 
Monument to Saints Cyril and Methodius by Vyacheslav Klykov was opened on the northbound boulevard in 1992. The Square is a common starting point for public rallies; in particular, the Russian March of 4 November 2006. 
San Giovanni Battista Decollato (St John the Baptist Beheaded) is a renaissance-style, Roman Catholic rural parish church located in the Borgo della Rocca of town of Montemurlo, province of Prato, region of Tuscany, Italy. 
"Venice Bitch" is a song by American singer and songwriter Lana Del Rey. It was released on September 18, 2018, through Polydor and Interscope Records, as the second single from her sixth studio album, Norman Fucking Rockwell! (2019). The song was written and produced by Del Rey and Jack Antonoff. 
On September 12, 2018, The Fader announced that "Venice Bitch" would be released on September 18 as the second single from Del Rey's forthcoming studio album, following the first single, "Mariners Apartment Complex", released a week earlier. On September 17, Del Rey shared a preview of the track accompanied by a vintage-inspired visual on Instagram, and announced that the song would be premiered on Zane Lowe's Beats 1 show. 
This article on a Roman Catholic diocese in Colombia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Savelyevskaya is located 58 km northwest of Kaduy (the district's administrative centre) by road. Yakshinskaya is the nearest rural locality. 
The museum was initiated and established by Raphie Etgar who serves as its Artistic Director, and has been supported for some decades by the Holtzbrink Family Foundation. through the Jerusalem Foundation. 
The turbulent history of the building serves as silent testimony to the political changes that Jerusalem and the whole country of Israel/Palestine underwent; from its function as a private residence of a Palestinian Arab family during the British Mandate years, through its usage as an Israeli army outpost, and currently as a socio-political museum committed to create a dialogue and build bridges of understanding in this very place.[citation needed] 
In the year 1981 the military outpost was renovated and renamed as the "Tourjman Post Museum" commemorating the reunification of the city. The museum mounted exhibits of the guns, mortars and other weapons used in its defense. 
In the year 1999 the building underwent change and a new permanent exhibition, calling for tolerance and mutual understating between people in the region, was displayed. On the day of its dedication, it was opened ostensibly as a site for 'peace, tolerance,... dialogue, understanding and coexistence'.[citation needed] 
Since 2005, the building serves as a home to the Museum on the Seam - a socio-political contemporary art museum dedicated to dialogue and mutual understanding.[citation needed] 
In 2000 Museum on the Seam produces, as an initiative by Raphie Etgar, the exhibition COEXISTANCE: an international project that incorporates many leading poster designers from around the globe. The project was displayed in over 35 cities in different continents and called for mutual understanding between fellow nations and religions. Its global Journey was endorsed and supported by world leaders and thinkers. 
This biographical article related to association football in Finland, about a midfielder, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Tsodilo Hills are a UNESCO World Heritage Site (WHS), consisting of rock art, rock shelters, depressions, and caves. It gained its WHS listing in 2001 because of its unique religious and spiritual significance to local peoples, as well as its unique record of human settlement over many millennia. UNESCO estimates there are over 4500 rock paintings at the site. The site consists of a few main hills known as the Child Hill, Female Hill, and Male Hill. 
There is a managed campsite between the two largest hills, with showers and toilets. It is near the most famous of the San paintings at the site, the Laurens van der Post panel[clarification needed], after the South-African writer who first described the paintings in his 1958 book 'The Lost World of the Kalahari'. There is a small museum and an airstrip near the campsite. 
Rhino Cave is located at the North end of the Female Hill and has two main walls where paintings are located. The white rhino painting (for which the cave is named) is located on the north wall, and is split by another painting of a red giraffe. Excavations of the cave floor turned up many lithic materials. This cave lacks ostrich egg shell, bone artifacts, pottery or iron, but there were a few mongongo shell fragments found in Later Stone Age layers.
Charcoal found during excavations has been dated to the African Iron Age, the Later Stone Age (LSA), and the Middle Stone Age (MSA). Mostly stone artifacts from the LSA were made from local materials such as quartz and jasper. MSA artifacts from the cave are mostly prepared projectile points. The points are typically found in various stages of production, some abandoned and some finished. 
The paintings of Rhino Cave are mostly located on the North wall, and have been painted in red or red-orange pigment, excepting the rhino which was painted in white. Around the rhino and the giraffe are various paintings, mostly in red, of geometrics. On the opposite wall, the cave is host to grooves and depressions that have been ground into the rock. They may have been created using hammer stones or grindstones from the LSA period, which have been found at Tsodilo. 
The Tsodilo Hills have a myriad of red rock art; it can be found all over the site. In Rhino Cave, some of the red paintings seem to be older than the white rhino. Red paintings here, and around Tsodilo, are attributed to the San people. 
 These hills are of great cultural and spiritual significance to the San peoples of the Kalahari.  They believe the hills are a resting place for the spirits of the deceased  and that these spirits will cause misfortune and bad luck if anyone hunts or causes death near the hills. Tsodilo is also an object of debate regarding how the San once lived.
 Many local peoples around the Tsodilo Hills have stories of times past that deal with the many painted caves and rock shelters at the site. Oral traditions often tell of the Zhu people, a local San group, using rock shelters for protection from the elements or as ritual areas.
One tale claims that hunters would come into the rock shelters to contact ancestors if a hunt was unsuccessful. They would then ask for a good hunt the next time they went out. In thanks, when the hunt was successful, the people would return to the shelter and cook for their ancestors. In some of these alleged campsites, there is little to no evidence of fire remains. 
The local San people believe Tsodilo is the birthplace of all life, art there made by the descendants of the first people. Tsodilo's geography, trails and grooves in the earth are known as the trails and footprints of the first animals, making their way to the first watering hole ). A natural water spring at Tsodilo, near the Female Hill, is used as both a water collection site and a ritual site. It is seen as sacred, and used by countless peoples to cleanse, heal, and protect. 
They also discuss the burned Middle Stone Age points, saying that there is nothing unusual in using nonlocal materials. They dismiss the claim that no ordinary tools were found at the site, noting that the many scrapers that are found are ordinary tools and that there is evidence of tool making at the site. Discussing the 'secret chamber', they point to the lack of evidence for San shamans using chambers in caves or for this one to have been used in such a way. 
DZRR (pronounced as DZ-double-R; 103.1 FM), broadcasting as MOR 103.1 For Life!, was a radio station owned and operated by the ABS-CBN Corporation. Its studio was located at the ABS-CBN Broadcast Center, #59 First Road, Quezon Hill Proper, Baguio. Its transmitter was located atop Mt. Sto. Tomas, Tuba, Benguet. 
DZRR was first launched on August 1, 1989 as "Radio Romance" making ABS-CBN's first FM station outside Metro Manila, simulcasting its Manila feed. 
On May 5, 2020, the station, along with the other My Only Radio stations, went off the air due to the cease and desist order of the National Telecommunications Commission as the network's legislative franchise to operate expired the day before. It currently operates as an online platform. 
This article about a radio station in the Philippines is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a railroad station in Punjab, Pakistan is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Whispers Under Ground is the third novel in the Rivers of London series by English author Ben Aaronovitch, published 2012 by Gollancz. 
Constables Peter Grant and Lesley May, and Detective Chief Inspector Thomas Nightingale form the magical branch of the Metropolitan Police.  Grant is called in for a murder investigation at the Baker Street Underground station: the victim, American art student James Gallagher, was fatally stabbed with a potsherd. 
Grant visits James's art professor, and attends an exhibition of work by Irish sculptor Ryan Carroll. Peter realises some of the pieces incorporate pottery identical to the potsherd murder weapon and a bowl found at James's flat. 
Following this lead, Grant and Lesley discover a warehouse where similar pottery is taken and stored.  It owned by The Beale Corporation, which was historically the maker of 'unbreakable' pottery.  Its founders were instrumental in excavating the tunnels that later became the heart of the London Underground railway. 
Grant and a team investigate in the railway tunnels, but they are attacked by pallid large-eyed individuals.  They pursue them, eventually reaching an Underground platform, where ones of the individuals uses magic to tear the platform apart, burying Grant in the process. 
While Grant is recovering in hospital, Lesley tells him she has confirmed Beale, Gallagher and Carroll are all descendants of the founders of the Unbreakable Empire Pottery corporation.  James' roommate Zach also visits and accidentally mentions that he knows a pallid large-eyed man.  When questioned he reveals that a group known as the Quiet People has been living underground and making pottery for the Beale corporation since the mid-Victorian Era. 
Grant and Lesley investigate this group.  As they talk to the Quiet People it emerges James Gallagher was courting the daughter of the chieftain of the Quiet People, which made Ryan Carroll jealous.  When confronted, Carroll confesses, adding that he was also jealous of Gallagher's skill in pottery. 
The 1941 All-Pro Team consisted of American football players chosen by various selectors for the All-Pro team of the National Football League (NFL) for the 1941 NFL season. Teams were selected by, among others, the so-called "official" All-Pro team selected by a committee of professional football writers for the NFL (NFL), the sports writers of the Associated Press (AP), the United Press (UP), Collyer's Eye (CE), the New York Daily News (NYDN), and the Chicago Herald American. 
Players displayed in bold were consensus first-team selections. Five players were named to the first team by all six selectors: Green Bay Packers halfback Cecil Isbell; Chicago Bears halfback George McAfee; Green Bay Packers end Don Hutson; Chicago Bears guard Dan Fortmann; and Chicago Bears center Bulldog Turner. 
This article about an Eastern Anatolia Region of Turkey location is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Paul Felix Hoffman, FRSC, OC (born March 21, 1941) is a Canadian geologist and  Sturgis Hooper Professor Emeritus of Geology at Harvard University.  He specializes in the Precambrian era and is widely known for his research on Snowball Earth glaciation in the Neoproterozoic era particularly through his research on sedimentary rocks of Namibia. 
Born in Toronto, Ontario, he received a B.Sc. from McMaster University in 1964, a M.Sc. from Johns Hopkins University in 1965, and was awarded a Ph.D. by Johns Hopkins University in 1970, where his doctoral advisor was Francis J. Pettijohn. 
Paul Hoffman formerly worked for the Geological Survey of Canada and was subsequently the Sturgis Hooper Professor of Geology at Harvard University.  He currently resides in Victoria, British Columbia where he has an appointment within the University of Victoria School of Earth and Ocean Science. 
He is also the brother of Abby Hoffman, a Pan American Games gold medalist and Olympian in track and field. Both have received the Order of Canada for accomplishments in different fields. 
The 1970 Florida State Seminoles football team represented Florida State University in the 1970 NCAA University Division football season. 
The Western Sydney Wanderers started the season with Jean-Paul de Marigny as their head coach after he was appointed in July permanently, following an interim session after the sacking of Markus Babbel. Three months after his appointment, Wanderers announced de Marigny's sacking with no explanation. On 15 October 2020, the Wanderers announced the signing of Carl Robinson from Newcastle Jets as de Marigny's replacement. 
Note: Flags indicate national team as defined under FIFA eligibility rules. Players may hold more than one non-FIFA nationality. 
The company's growth allowed it to develop larger facilities in 1928 occupying a city block in Buenos Aires' southside Barracas section. This facility began making vulcanized rubber sole shoes in the 1930s under the supervision of engineer Luis Pastorino. 
The longtime CEO of Alpargatas, Eduardo Oxenford, was appointed to head federal receivership of the Argentine Industrial Union after the March 1976 coup. He was named Minister of Industry by the administration of General Roberto Viola in 1981, quitting however within months over policies that adversely affected industry. 
Alpargatas began making PVC-soled footwear in 1983, and in 1987, it secured the country's sole license to manufacture Nike shoes. The growing incidence of imports in the local apparel and footwear market during the 1990s prompted the company to open its first factory outlet stores in 1995, and in 1998, it established Dialog, a logistics company, for its transport and warehousing needs. 
On March 19, 2013, Alpargatas S.A. acquired 4,33% of Alpargatas SAIC for US$ 4,7 million therefore the former Brazilian subsidiary controlled 100% of Alpargatas Argentina. 
Alpargatas gained notoriety when in 1931 local artist Florencio Molina Campos started to illustrate company's calendars with his gaucho-life paintings. The artist was paid with A$ 6,000 for 12 original paintings. Molina Campos continue his collaboration with Alpargatas until 1936. Commercial relations between the artist and the company renewed for a new production of calendars from 1940 to 1945. It is estimated that a total of about 18 million calendars were printed. 
Sabine Field is a 3,000 capacity stadium in Northfield, Vermont on the campus of the NCAA Division III-affiliated Norwich University. Opened in 1921, it serves as home to the school's football and track teams. The field is named for the son of Dr. George K. Sabine, a member of Norwich's Class of 1868, who provided funds to purchase the athletic field's land 
Since 1958, Sabine Field area has also been home to a WWII-era M4 Sherman tank named "Sabine Sally". Placed in honor of "the Norwich Men who served in the Armored Forces in World War II" and dedicated by Norwich alumnus and Medal of Honor recipient Captain James M. Burt. 
Each fall on the university's Alumni Weekend, Sabine Field hosts the Alumni March On.  At this ceremony, all returning alumni parade by class on to the field with the current year's Corp of Cadets. 
The gate to Sabine Field is a part of Vermont ghost story lore.  In the tale, the gate to field is said to be guarded by an unseen cadet whose haunting footsteps can be heard. 
Jones was awarded an honorary doctorate by the State University of New York in 1972 and received the Distinguished Citizen Award from the Brooklyn Museum of Art in 1979. She exhibited regularly across North America in the 1940s and 1950s as well as overseas in France, Holland, Belgium, Switzerland, Greece, and Japan. Her work can be found in many museums, including the High Museum of Art in Atlanta, Georgia and the Morris Museum of Art in Augusta, Georgia. 
An Evening with Joe Henderson is a live album by American jazz saxophonist Joe Henderson recorded in Italy in 1987 and released on the Red label. 
The AllMusic review by Scott Yanow states "Although Joe Henderson's pianoless trio recordings for Blue Note in 1985 received a fair amount of publicity, this similar date for the Italian Red label has been almost completely overlooked". 
Three additional tracks from the concert were made available for purchase as digital downloads in 2009 under the title More From An Evening With Joe Henderson. They are as follows: 
Major General Leonard Holland (1916-1999) was an American military officer from Rhode Island.  He served as the Adjutant General of Rhode Island for 22 years from 1961 to 1983, longer than anyone else. 
He enlisted in the United States Army on April 16, 1941, eight months before the Japanese attack on Pearl Harbor.  During World War II he served in the Pacific Theater and received the Combat Infantryman Badge, Bronze Star Medal and the Purple Heart. 
He was commissioned a second lieutenant in the Infantry branch on August 6, 1942.  He rose through the ranks and was promoted to major on February 12, 1946, shortly before being discharged from active duty. 
After the war, he became an officer in the Officers Reserve Corps (i.e. Army Reserve).  He graduated from the Infantry Officers Advanced Course in 1959. 
Late in 1960 he was selected by Rhode Island Governor elect John A. Notte to become Adjutant General of Rhode Island in command of the Rhode Island National Guard.  Holland was promoted to colonel on January 2, 1961 and to major general on March 16, 1961, shortly before his forty fifth birthday.  Although Notte was defeated for re-election, Holland went on to serve under four more governors before he retired. 
In February 1978 Rhode Island was buried in over three feet of snow in the Blizzard of 1978.  This led to the Rhode Island National Guard being mobilized to deal with emergency situations and return the state to a more normal condition.  General Holland oversaw the operations of over 3,000 Guardsmen which rendered invaluable assistance in the weeks following the blizzard. 
General Holland retired from the Army in August 1983 and was awarded the Distinguished Service Medal and the rarely awarded Rhode Island Cross, Rhode Island's highest military decoration.  He was succeeded by Major General John W. Kiely, a veteran of World War II, Korea and Vietnam. 
He died on August 16, 1999 after suffering a stroke.  He is buried in Lincoln Park Cemetery in Warwick, Rhode Island. 
After General Holland's retirement, the Rhode Island General Assembly passed a law that Adjutants General of Rhode Island would be limited to two five year terms in office. 
This biographical article relating to Argentine athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
David Lewis Warsh (born May 25, 1944) is an American journalist and author who has generally covered topics in economics and finance. Since 2002, he has written and published Economic Principals, a weekly series of essays about economics and economists. 
Warsh was born in New York City, the son of Leo George and Annis Meade Warsh. He graduated from Lyons Township High School in LaGrange, Illinois in 1962, then from Harvard College in 1972 (66-72). 
In March 2002, Warsh left the Globe to write online at Economic Principals, his own reader-supported website.. The focus of the website and his writing is "technical economics through the device of weekly profiles of various movers and shakers" as well as various short items. In 2012, the website had some 20,000 readers. 
He is home-based in Somerville, Massachusetts and is a summer resident of Portage Point near Onekama, Michigan. 
The first Speedplay pedal, the X, was patented in July 1989 by Richard Byrne. The company was founded in July, 1991,  in San Diego, California. In September, 2019 Wahoo Fitness announced that it acquired Speedplay  pedal company to bring innovation and simplicity to the bike pedal product line. 
Speedplay Advanced Road Pedal System is characterized by double-sided entry, rotational free float and 3-axis adjustability to allow a rider to step on either side to engage the cleat, and keep the foot free to rotate from side to side about the center of the pedal. The float and micro-adjustability is reported to be easier on the knee joints to increase comfort and optimize fit on the bike. 
In March, 2021 Wahoo Fitness launched a redesigned Speedplay pedal range, which sealed the bearings to streamline setup and maintenance of the pedals. Simultaneously, Wahoo Fitness announced the POWRLINK ZERO power meter pedal set to be released in summer 2021.  
Brothertunes is a pop music group from Bern, Switzerland. The founding members consist of Rich Fonje (vocals) and Philly Hansen (guitarist). 
Brothertunes' first radio single "Sincerely Yours" from their first officially released studio album Come Close entered the Swiss charts directly into the Top 50. In April 2006, Brothertunes was voted the Swiss Top Act of the Month by Swiss national Radio DRS 3. 
Shortly after their initial radio success, the German music magazine "Musikmarkt" highlighted Fonje and Hansen and their album Come Close and declared the duo a top act and promising talent whose talents would be recognized beyond Swiss borders. Further success followed in October 2006, when Brothertunes were voted by listeners of Radio Swiss Pop (FM 103.8) as the "Swiss Newcomers of the Year," which was the first time that such an award was presented by Radio Swiss Pop. 
In 2008, Brothertunes released their second album A Million Things To Say. The album was produced by Grammy Award winner Van Hunt, who produced the first radio single, "Starship," which was the first of the three album single releases and became a Top 20 radio hit in Switzerland. The album was mixed by Hans-Martin Buff, who worked for over four years at the Paisley Park Studios and as personal engineer for Prince. 
Acanthops falcata, common name South American dead leaf mantis or boxer mantis, is a species of praying mantis in the subfamily Acanthopinae of the family Acanthopidae and is one of many praying mantises from various genera that resembles a dead leaf. 
As the common name describes, A. falcata resembles shriveled or dead leaves. It is not to be confused with Acanthops falcataria, a different species in the same genus that is often referred to with the same common name. 
"Why" is a single by British music producer and remixer D Mob with singer-songwriter Cathy Dennis. It was the fourth single released from Dennis's 1992 album, Into the Skyline, a full year after her previous single from the album. In the UK, it reached number 23, making it the most successful single from the album. 
Dennis performed the song on the season three episode of Beverly Hills, 90210, "A Night to Remember", in 1993, and appeared alongside Jason Priestley in the closing credits. 
Schweizerischer Werkbund, (translated as Swiss Werkbund) is a Swiss association of artists, architects, designers, and industrialists established in 1913, inspired by the mission of the Deutscher Werkbund. 
The Werkbund was founded on 17 May 1913 by different actors of the arts, architecture, advertisement, industry and politics at the Kunstgewerbemuseum in Zurich. This meeting was called by Alfred Altherr. 
The Werkbund hosted meetings, lectures, and exhibitions. The Werkbund created a film to publicize the very first Swiss housing exhibition held within Belgium. The exhibition was known as WOBA.  They also published a monthly journal titled, Das Werk. 
The instigation of the die Gut Forme campaign after World War II was the responsibility of the Werkbund. The campaign sought to proliferate the aims and ideals of the functionalism movement, and continued from sometime during 1949 to its closure sometime during 1969. 
In 1970 the building underwent extensive renovations which saw a one-storey building in the north-west quadrant being built and yard constructions being dismantled. In 1972 the consulate-general of France occupied the building and has been located in it since. 
The consulate-general is attached to the Embassy of France in Moscow and services the Northwest consular district, which includes Saint Petersburg, Leningrad Oblast, Republic of Karelia, Murmansk Oblast, Arkhangelsk Oblast, Pskov Oblast, Kaliningrad Oblast, Vologda Oblast and Novgorod Oblast. The consulate-general offers consular assistance to citizens of France, whilst promoting trade and cultural ties between the French people and businesses and their counterparts in Saint Petersburg. 
Amber "Holly" Boykins (born April 4, 1969) is an American politician. She represented a portion of North St. Louis in the Missouri House of Representatives. She is a Democrat 
Boykins is a St. Louis native. She graduated from Cardinal Ritter College Preparatory High School in 1987 and from Columbia College in 1991. She is currently pursuing both an MBA and a JD. 
Boykins was elected State Representative in 1998 in a closely contested Democratic primary election  and was elected without opposition in the general election . She was re-elected in 2000, 2002, and 2004. 
Due to term limits Boykins was unable to seek re-election in 2006. She announced her candidacy for the 4th District State Senate seat being vacated by Pat Dougherty. Other announced candidates were fellow State Representative Yaphett El-Amin, former State Representative Derio Gambaro, former St. Louis Alderman Kenny Jones, and political science professor Jeff Smith. The primary election was held on August 8, 2006, and was won by Jeff Smith, who was unopposed in the general election. 
Deep Memorial Public School, situated at A-Block, Ramprastha, Ghaziabad, Uttar Pradesh, India and affiliated to the Central Board of Secondary Education (CBSE), was established in 1988. The school is dedicated to the memory of Ch. Deep Chand Ji. It was formally inaugurated by Sh. Moti Lal Vohra, ex-governor of Uttar Pradesh. The school has boarding facilities and accepts students from all over India. 
The motto of the school is "Work is Worship." A separate Junior branch was set up at D-Block, Ramprastha, Ghaziabad and was formally inaugurated by Governor of Uttar Pradesh Vishnu Kant Shastri.[citation needed] 
Students join one of four houses, named Himadri, Shivalik, Aravali,  and Vindhya house after mountain ranges. Competitive events ranging from sports to quizzing are held throughout the year to decide for the best house of the academic year. It also takes children to trips across India every year. 
This article about a school in Uttar Pradesh, India is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Oaths of Strasbourg were a military pact made on 14 February 842 by Charles the Bald and Louis the German against their older brother Lothair I, the designated heir of Louis the Pious, the successor of Charlemagne. One year later the Treaty of Verdun would be signed, with major consequences for Western Europe's geopolitical landscape. 
Louis the German swore his oath in Romance so that the soldiers of Charles the Bald could understand him. Likewise, the latter recited his in Germanic so that Louis' soldiers would understand. 
The Romance section of the Oaths is of special importance to historical linguistics, as it is the oldest extant document in France that was written deliberately and consistently in a form of Romance. 
The Oaths were not preserved in their original form; they were instead copied by the historian Nithard, another grandson of Charlemagne, in a work titled De Dissensionibus Filiorum Ludovici Pii "On the Quarrels of Louis the Pious' Sons". This was a firsthand account, as Nithard had campaigned alongside his cousin Charles the Bald. It was however biased, reflecting the perspective of the allies and casting Lothair as an aggressor and villain. 
Although the Oaths are of little political importance, given that they were superseded by the more comprehensive Treaty of Verdun, they are of significant importance to the field of linguistics. As the scholar Philippe Walter wrote: 
"This is the oldest extant French text. It is political in nature, not literary, and is important in that it marks the written debut of the 'vulgar' tongue." 
Nithard's text has been passed down to us via two manuscripts that are today kept at the National Library of France. 
The other manuscript, which is kept in the same library under the call number Latin 14663, is a copy of the former that was made in the fifteen century. 
Pro Deo amur et pro christian poblo et nostro commun salvament, d'ist di en avant, in quant Deus savir et podir me dunat, si salvarai eo, cist meon fradre Karlo, et in aiudha, et in cadhuna cosa, si cum om per dreit son fradra salvar dift, in o quid il mi altresi fazet, et ab Ludher nul plaid nunquam prindrai, qui meon vol cist meon fradre Karle in damno sit. 
For the love of God and Christiandom and our joint salvation, from this day onward, to the best of my knowledge and abilities granted by God, I shall protect my brother Charles by any means possible, as one ought to protect one's brother, insofar as he does the same for me, and I shall never willingly enter into a pact with Lothair against the interests of my brother Charles
Si Lodhuvigs sagrament, que son fradre Karlo iurat conservat, et Karlus meos sendra de suo part non los tanit, si io returnar non l'int pois, ne io ne neuls, cui eo returnar int pois, in nulla aiudha contra Lodhuvig nun li iv er. 
This is a close translation of Louis' oath, except that an equivalent to et in aiudha et in cadhuna cosa appears to be missing. The soldiers of Louis the German replied: 
Oba Karl then eid, then er sinemo bruodher Ludhuuuige gesuor, geleistit, indi Ludhuuuig min herro, then er imo gesuor, forbrihchit, ob ih inan es iruuenden ne mag, noh ih noh thero nohhein, then ih es iruuenden mag, uuidhar Karle imo ce follusti ne uuirdit. 
Several scholars consider the Romance portion of the Oaths to have been translated from an unattested Latin original, while others maintain its originality. 
Nevertheless, various other scholars have suggested that the Oaths were written in an early form of Picard, Lyonnais, Lorraine, or Poitevin. 
The following is a reconstructed narrow transcription of the pronunciation of Louis' oath and that of Charles' soldiers: 
John Gilligan (born 28 March 1952) is a convicted Irish gangster. He was given a 28-year prison sentence for the trafficking of commercial quantities of cannabis resin. On appeal, this sentence was reduced to 20 years, and in October 2013, he was released after serving 17 years. 
Gilligan's assets remained frozen by the Criminal Assets Bureau (CAB). On 30 January 2006, the High Court cleared the way for the CAB to proceed with an application to have the equestrian centre and other property that belonged to the Gilligan family handed over to the state. In January 2008, making a court appearance in an attempt to stop the state from selling off his assets, Gilligan accused John Traynor of having ordered the murder of Veronica Guerin. 
In November 2012, the courts cleared the final barriers allowing the CAB to sell off the equestrian centre and Gilligan's house at Weston Green, Lucan. In July 2014, after a lengthy challenge, a Supreme Court ruling brought the CAB one step closer to selling off the house adjoining the equestrian centre, retained by Gilligan's wife, as well as additional properties in Blanchardstown and Lucan. 
As part of attempts to repress organised crime, including Gilligan's drug trafficking activities, Ireland introduced new civil forfeiture legislation in the wake of the murder of Guerin, the Proceeds of Crime Act, 1996. Gilligan repeatedly challenged its constitutionality in the Supreme Court of Ireland and elsewhere. 
On 23 October 2020, Gilligan and two other men, one believed to be his son, were arrested in Spain. Spanish police seized quantities of drugs and weapons. He was released on bail in December 2020. 
"Western"-style horse hobbles are tied around the pasterns or cannon bones of the horse's front legs. They comprise three basic types: 
Western hobbles are normally used to secure a horse when no tie device, tree, or other object is available for that purpose, e.g.,  when if traveling across open lands a rider has to dismount for various reasons. Hobbles also allow a horse to graze and move short and slow distances, yet prevent the horse from running off too far. This is handy at night if the rider has to get some sleep; using a hobble ensures that in the morning he can find his horse not too far away. 
Hobble training a horse is a form of "sacking out" and desensitizing a horse to accept restraints on its legs. This helps a horse accept pressure on its legs in case it ever becomes entangled in barbed wire or fencing. A hobble trained horse is less likely to pull, struggle, and cut its legs in a panic, since it has been taught to give to pressure in its legs. 
Hobbles date at least as far back as Ancient Egypt. Two Egyptian hieroglyphs are believed to depict hobbles. 
Adelphia College was a Swedish-American college in Seattle, Washington, run by the Swedish Baptist Church. The institution opened in 1905, but went bankrupt in 1918 or 1919.  
In 1919, the main building and campus were sold to the Jesuit Seattle College (the later Seattle University); the campus has since 1930 been used by a related Jesuit institution, the Seattle Preparatory School. 
The remaining archives of the college are kept in the Swenson Center at Augustana College (Illinois). 
This article about a university or college in the state of Washington is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to Icelandic badminton is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Allison married when she was 21 years old, and three years later they bought a home in East St Kilda for about $11,000. They later divorced. She now lives in Port Melbourne with her long-term partner. 
Allison is an atheist who spoke first for the affirmative in a 2008 Australian Radio National debate "Would We Be Better Off Without Religion?". 
She was awarded the Australian Humanist of the Year award in 2008 for her work in education, environment and women's rights. 
In the 1990 federal election Allison stood as a Greens candidate in the division of Throsby, resulting in 1.7% of the vote. In 1994 Allison contested the state by-election for the Victorian Legislative Assembly district of Williamstown after the resignation of Joan Kirner, the former Premier of Victoria. Standing as the Democrat candidate, Allison gained 39% of the two-candidate preferred vote, with the seat won by Labor candidate Steve Bracks. 
Allison won pre-selection on the Democrats ticket, was elected to the Australian Senate in 1996, and re-elected for a second term in the 2001 federal election. 
During the 2007 election campaign, Allison announced a national preference deal with the Greens to increase the chance of a progressive party taking the balance of power in the Senate. Allison joined Bob Brown and Kate Lundy in a joint political advertisement sponsored by GetUp! urging voters to prevent the Senate from becoming a rubber stamp for the government of the day. 
Allison received the support of community and interest groups such as the Asylum Seeker Resource Centre, for her support for refugees and asylum seekers; the Friends of the ABC, for promoting public broadcasting; and endorsements by prominent women and feminists such as Barbara Spalding and Anne Summers. 
The Democrats failed to retain their seats in the Senate, with Allison losing her seat to the Labor Party candidate David Feeney. Allison's term expired on 30 June 2008, leaving the Australian Democrats with no federal representation for the first time since its founding in 1977. 
Allison is a board member of eight organisations including Berry Street, Vision Australia, Alzheimer's Australia and her local nursing home. In 2012 Lyn Allison was inducted into the Victorian Honour Roll of Women for being a member of the Australian Senate from 1996 to 2008. 
On 5 October, Allison became the 12th President of the Australian Democrats - resuming an active role within the party. 
Senator Allison leads fellow Democrat senators into national federal election campaign launch in Melbourne, 2007 
Senator Allison with Laura Chipp and Young Australian Democrats candidates during election campaign in Melbourne 2007 
The island has been identified by BirdLife International as an Important Bird Area because it supports a high proportion of the nesting population of flesh-footed shearwaters (with up to 300,000 breeding pairs) and has supported relatively high numbers of breeding fairy terns.  Other birds recorded breeding on the island are little shearwaters, sooty oystercatchers and silver gulls. 
This article about a location in Western Australia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The American Night is a volume of poetry written by Jim Morrison, front-man for the 1960s psychedelic rock group, The Doors, and published posthumously in 1991, 20 years after his death (to the month) by Random House under the trade name imprint Villard Publishing. The book is structured into 10 sections. The title is eponymous with a poem that appears on the album American Prayer, itself a collection of spoken word and musical vignettes released in 1978. 
The book consists of his theories on night which the publisher describes as containing "nightmarish images, bold associative leaps, and [a] volcanic power of emotion" and being "the unmistakable artifacts of a great, wild voice and heart." 
The American Night is a follow-up and second volume to Wilderness: The Lost Writings of Jim Morrison (first published in 1988). 
Morrison's work is often compared to that of French poet Arthur Rimbaud, specifically from his Illuminations collection.  Morrison once wrote in a letter to the translator of Rimbaud's collection, "Thanks for doing the Rimbaud translation. I read French but not too easily and I needed your translation. I am a rock singer and your book travels with me wherever I go." 
Even before graduating from law school she ran for her first public office.  At age 23, she was elected municipal court judge in the Milwaukee suburb of St. Francis in the 1966 spring election.  After graduating from law school, she was hired as an assistant district attorney for Milwaukee County, which was her primary employment until her election to the Wisconsin State Assembly in 1972. 
Tesmer appeared on the popular television gameshow What's My Line? in 1966, with Betty White and Allen Ludden as guest panelists. 
Born in New York to parents of Greek and Chinese descent, Porfiris began the violin at age five as a Suzuki Method violin student. At age nine she started playing with the conductorless chamber orchestra group Tucson Junior Strings. 
In 1988 as a member of the Schleswig-Holstein Musik Festival Orchester she accompanied Leonard Bernstein on his first concert tour back to the Soviet Union since 1959. 
She earned two degrees from the Juilliard School and attended the Salzburg Mozarteum.  Her viola studies were with William Lincer and Paul Doktor, and chamber music studies with Norbert Brainin of the Amadeus Quartet, Harvey Shapiro, and members of the Juilliard Quartet. 
She has served on the jury for the Washington International Competition for Strings and was a selection committee member for the United States Fulbright Scholar Program. 
She performs regularly as a soloist and chamber musician. She is the violist in the Miller-Porfiris Duo with her husband, violinist Anton Miller. 
Rita Porfiris has commissioned and performed the world premiere or U.S. premiere of many solo and chamber works for the viola. Composers she has premiered and/or commissioned include Errollyn Wallen, Max Lifchitz, Frank Wallace, Peter Aviss, Ken Steen, Mario Diaz Gavier, David Ashley White, Robert Avalon, and others. 
This biographical article related to Swedish artistic gymnastics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The ruins were subsequently demolished, and a new courthouse with a neoclassical design began to be built on the site on 5 May 1965. It was inaugurated on 9 January 1971. The site of the portico is scheduled at grade 3, according to a 2006 decision, as some remains of the auberge may remain below ground. 
Psychological Studies is a quarterly peer-reviewed academic journal published by Springer Science+Business Media. It is the official journal of the Indian National Academy of Psychology. The editor-in-chief is Damodar Suar (IIT Kharagpur). The special issue editor is Girishwar Misra (University of Delhi), who served as the editor-in-chief for 15 years through the end of 2015. 
The journal is abstracted and indexed in the Indian Citation Index, Scopus, PsycINFO, and ProQuest databases. 
This article about an academic journal on psychology is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
See tips for writing articles about academic journals. Further suggestions might be found on the article's talk page.
Garver began his professional career at age 18 in 1944 with the Newark Moundsmen, St. Louis' affiliate to the Ohio State League.  Garver pitched in 32 games for the team, going 21-8 with an ERA of 1.21, ultimately leading the Moundsmen to the Ohio State League's first championship since the league was put on hiatus during World War II.  He led the team in ERA, games started, strikeouts, WHIP, and H/9.   
In 1945, Garver was briefly promoted to the Browns' Single-A affiliate, the Elmira Pioneers of the Eastern League, before being promoted again to the Double-A Toledo Mud Hens of the American Association.  In Toledo, he served as both a starting pitcher and a reliever, starting in 15 games while making relief appearances in 16.  He went 5-8 with an ERA of 4.64 and a WHIP of 1.712. 
Garver was sent to the San Antonio Missions, another Double-A team in the St. Louis Browns organization, in 1946 and he would stay there until the end of the 1947 season.  During his two years in San Antonio, Garver went 25-22 with an ERA of 3.43. 
Following the 1951 season, Browns owner Bill Veeck made Garver the highest paid member of the team with a salary of $25,000. Baseball Hall of Fame member Ted Williams said of Garver, "He could throw anything up there and get me out." In actuality, though, Williams' batting average off Garver was .419, with a .767 slugging percentage. 
During the 1952 season, the Browns fired manager Rogers Hornsby, and the grateful players presented their owner with a trophy for getting rid of the hated manager. According to Garver, his teammates bought the trophy without his knowledge, but as their player representative, he was the one to present it to Veeck. 
In 1954, Garver was leading the AL in ERA in mid-May, having posted an 0.49 mark in his first five games. 
As a hitter, Garver had a career .218 batting average (180-for-827) with 87 runs, 7 home runs, 72 RBI and drawing 76 bases on balls. 
Garver's primary pitch was a sinking fastball. During the 1947 season, he figured out how to throw a slider while playing catch with another player before a game. By putting pressure on his next-to-index finger, he could make the ball change directions as it came to the plate. "That pitch took me to the big leagues, and it kept me there," he credited its importance. he would try to add to his array of pitches during spring training, using the time for experimentation. 
His injury in 1952 changed the way he pitched. "I was never as good after that," Garver said, but he was able to stay in the major leagues for several years by adjusting his approach. Garver would change speeds on his ball, and he would throw from different angels: overhand, underhand, and sidearm. 
In 1996, the U.S. Postal Service issued a commemorative postmark in his honor in his hometown of Ney, Ohio, to mark the 45th anniversary of his 20-win season. On September 30, 1951, he was sent a plaque by the Commissioner of Baseball to commemorate the 20th victory, September 30, 1951. 
In a conversation with Joe DiMaggio, Ted Williams mentioned he had "trouble" with Garver. "He could throw anything up there and get me out," Williams recalled. 
The name, as is the case with other Arabic names, is not only confined to Muslims. Notable examples of Christian individuals named Habib include Habib the Deacon,  Gabriel Habib and the Philosopher Habib. 
Yaou was a commune until March 2012, when it became one of 1126 communes nationwide that were abolished. In 2014, the population of the sub-prefecture of Yaou was 19,004. 
Satanachia is described in the Grand Grimoire as a commander-in-chief of Satan's army, who controls either forty-five or fifty-four legions of demons, including Pruflas, Aamon, Barbatos, and Astaroth.  According to the Grand Grimoire, he has the power to subjugate all women and girls, and to do with them whatever he wishes. 
Upon learning of the French defeat at Polotsk, Victor, the commander of the French IX corps which Napoleon had kept in reserve at Smolensk, marched northeast with 22,000 troops to restore the Dwina Line. At Chashniki, on the Ulla River, he united with elements of the II Corps, which was retreating from Polotsk. The combined II and IX corps put 36,000 troops at Victor's disposal. 
Wittgenstein, after leaving 9,000 soldiers to garrison territory captured as a result of his victory at Polotsk, marched south to Chashniki with 30,000 troops to deal with Victor. 
The combat at Chashniki was conducted chiefly by Wittgenstein's advance guard, 11,000 troops led by General Yashvil, and the II Corps on the French side. 
Although the Russian victory at Chashniki was indecisive, its outcome was highly unfavorable to Napoleon for several reasons.  
Also, as a result of his victories at Polotsk and Chashniki, Wittgenstein dispatched a force under General Harpe to capture the massive French supply depot at Vitebsk. On 7 November, after a short combat, the French garrison at Vitebsk surrendered to Harpe, and huge caches of foodstuffs and war material fell into Russian hands. 
Upon learning of the Russian victory at Chashniki, Napoleon ordered Victor to immediately attack Wittgenstein again and recapture Polotsk.  This led to yet another French defeat, the Battle of Smoliani, on 14 November 1812. 
Unison is a studio album by musicians George Mraz and Zoe Rahman, released on 15 July 2013 by Cube-Metier. 
Music producer Paul Vlcek sought Zoe Rahman out to play with George Mraz from amongst the most talented British jazz pianists. 
Steve Arloff of MusicWeb International said of Unison, "...this superb disc of beautiful chamber jazz because it truly represents the meeting of minds of two superlative musicians who, would you believe, met for the first time only on the afternoon of this, the third in a series of concerts held for charity." 
Tim Blue (born July 10, 1984) is an American professional basketball player, who lastly played for Antibes Sharks of the French LNB Pro A. Blue usually plays as power forward or small forward. In his professional career, he has played in the Netherlands, Germany, Finland and France. 
Flud had been tagged as "the first true social news reader" where users could create a personal profile, follow others who share their interests, and become influencers to their followers by sharing content (known as Fluding). 
For Fluding via the web, a bookmarklet was also available. A full web application had been under development.[citation needed] 
Flud started as a secret sauce project in the summer of 2010 between Bobby Ghoshal and Matthew Ausonio, cofounders of Made By Rabbit, Inc., a startup out of San Diego, California. Flud 1.0 for the iPad hit the iOS App Store in August 2010 and was made available for the iPhone in the following months. 
Flud received $1 million in seed funding in April 2011 and became available on Android mobile devices in August 2011. 
In December 2011, Flud 2.0 hit the App Store as a new type of social news reader, allowing users to create their own news personalities and become a trusted source on topical interests. Major changes included the addition of social features, an updated user interface design, and Tumblr support. Flud 2.0 launched on Windows Phone and Android devices in March 2012. 
On August 8, 2013, the Flud service was discontinued. Users had until that date to download all their data. 
This article about a Registered Historic Place in Caroline County Maryland is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Van Uylenburgh took over the business of Cornelis van der Voort and became an art dealer, employing painters in his own studio. In 1631 Rembrandt moved into van Uylenburgh's house (adjacent to Rembrandt's later home, now the Rembrandt House Museum) to work in Van Uylenburgh's studio. Rembrandt became chief painter of the studio and in 1634 married Van Uylenburgh's first cousin Saskia van Uylenburgh. 
In 1647 Van Uylenburgh had to move to a new location on Dam square, because Nicolaes Eliaszoon Pickenoy sold the house. When his house on Dam square was appropriated to build a new city hall (now the Royal Palace), Van Uylenburgh relocated to Westermarkt square. 
His son Gerrit van Uylenburgh took over the family business after Van Uylenburgh's death and burial in the Westerkerk church in 1661. Gerrit went bankrupt in 1675  following accusations that he had sold forged art to Frederick William, Elector of Brandenburg. 
In 2006 the Rembrandt House Museum presented an exhibition around Hendrick van Uylenburgh and his son Gerrit. The exhibition was also shown at the Dulwich Picture Gallery in London. 
A Pythagorean cup (also known as a Pythagoras cup, Greedy Cup, Cup of Justice, Tantalus cup or i koupa tis dikaiosynis) is a practical joke device in a form of a drinking cup, credited to Pythagoras of Samos.[citation needed] When it is filled beyond a certain point, a siphoning effect causes the cup to drain its entire contents through the base. The cup can be used to learn about greed. 
The 1988 All-SEC football team consists of American football players selected to the All-Southeastern Conference (SEC) chosen by various selectors for the 1988 college football season. 
During the winter break, he left Jagodina and returned to Libya and played for his former club Al-Ittihad Tripoli. 
HMS Cooke (K471) was a British Captain-class frigate of the Royal Navy in commission during World War II. Originally constructed as the United States Navy Evarts-class destroyer escort USS Dempsey (DE-267), she served in the Royal Navy from 1943 to 1946. 
The ship was laid down as the U.S. Navy destroyer escort USS Dempsey (DE-267), the first ship of the name, by the Boston Navy Yard in Boston, Massachusetts, on 11 March 1943 and launched on 22 April 1943, sponsored by Mrs. J. A. Dempsey, mother of the late Lieutenant, junior grade Richard John Dempsey (1919-1942), for whom the ship was named. Dempsey was transferred to the United Kingdom under Lend-Lease upon completion on 23 August 1943. 
CMA CGM Bougainville is container ship, built in 2015 by Samsung Heavy Industries for CMA CGM on French Asia Line (FAL). The vessel was the largest container carrier operating under the flag of France. The vessel is the largest container ship in the world at the time of her launch in August 2015, having maximum capacity for 18,000 TEU with 1,254 reefer plugs. 
The container ship CMA CGM Bougainville is driven by modern low-speed engine MAN B&W 11S90ME-C9.2, which has total output power of 64,000 kW. 
"A Decade Under the Influence" is a song by American rock band Taking Back Sunday. The song was released as the lead single from the band's second studio album Where You Want to Be. "A Decade Under the Influence" would become the band's breakout single, peaking at no. 16 on the Billboard Alternative Songs chart and no. 70 on the UK Singles Chart. 
The song started out as riff written by rhythm guitarist Eddie Reyes. Vocalist Adam Lazzara wrote the lyrics after he had broken up with a long-time girlfriend; his ex-girlfriend had purchased tickets for the pair to attend a Coldplay concert and, despite the two having broken up, still went to the show together. Lazzara called the car ride a very awkward experience. The song itself is about someone who realizes he understands less about the world than he had originally thought. 
The Eighteenth Connecticut House of Representatives district elects one member of the Connecticut House of Representatives. Its current representative is Jillian Gilchrest. The district consists of part of the town of West Hartford.  
The book is a series of letters to her six children, either grown, or nearly so. The subjects that she approaches through the medium of letters include: growing pains and adolescent anxieties about love, sex and friendship; religion and God; the challenge of being a responsible parent, death, remembrance and family traditions, the place of career, sex and of values in the lives of her children. 
The species name refers to the coloration of the forewings and is derived from Latin silaceus (meaning ochre). 
Lynfield College is a secondary education provider in Lynfield, Auckland, New Zealand. It celebrated its 50th anniversary in 2008. 
The school practices NCEA for assessments and examinations, and has high achievement rates compared to the national average. 
The land that Lynfield College now occupies used to be a poultry farm. This farm provided table fowls and eggs for the Auckland Area. The original name for the farm was Linfield. Alfred Bankhart established Lynfield on land gifted to him by Sir John Logan Campbell. Gilletta Road in Lynfield was named after Bankheart's wife's maiden name. Another Owner of the Property was Mr Irvine. He diversified from farming poultry to founding the giant baking and pastry firm Irvines Bakery. 
The LBO (or leveraged buyout) valuation model estimates the current value of a business to a "financial buyer", based on the business's forecast financial performance. An already-completed five-year financial forecast and two assumptions are all that is necessary to create a first draft of a comprehensive LBO valuation of the business. 
From a processing standpoint, the model makes a copy of the already completed five-year forecast and uses that copy (and any changes one makes to it) for projecting future operating results. As such, the original forecast is preserved. 
The model analyzes the value of a business from the point of view of a "financial buyer" who owns no other businesses in your industry and, therefore, expects all of its investment return to result solely from the future operations of the business. The LBO valuation model assumes that the buyer has investigated a business and operating plan and believes the business will achieve the financial results one has forecast. 
From a timing standpoint, the LBO valuation model assumes that the financial buyer intends to purchase the business at the beginning of year two of a five-year forecast and intends to own the business for the ensuing four years, and then sell the business. 
In order to generalize the analysis across a potentially infinite range of "deal" attributes, the model assumes the financial buyer is buying only the assets of the business and assuming none of its liabilities. Therefore, the seller of the business needs to pay off all of the liabilities of the business (and in all likelihood, the income tax owed as a result of the gain realized on the sale of the assets) from purchase price paid to the seller by the financial buyer. 
"Crystallize" is a song by Australian recording artist Kylie Minogue. It was written by Minogue, Dev Hynes and Scott Hoffman. The song was originally recorded for Minogue's 2014 album, Kiss Me Once, but did not make the final cut. 
In the United Kingdom, "Crystallize" debuted and peaked at number 60 selling 3,278 copies, but fell out of the top 100 the following week. The song managed to chart within the top 40 in Flanders and Wallonia. In Spain, the song charted inside the top 50 at number 44. In Ireland and France, the song was less successful, charting at number 88 and 139 respectively. 
About 2000 Hungarian Jewish women were held in this subcamp, and were given the task of clearing the area of the Gelsenberg Benzin AG of rubble in the summer 1944. 
Approximately 150 of them were killed during heavy bombing attacks on the hydrogenation plant in September 1944. A few badly injured survivors were taken to Gelsenkirchen hospitals. 
After the dissolution of the camp in the middle of September 1944, the remaining Hungarian Jewish women in the camp were sent to the subcamp Soemmerda in Thuringia and the other women were shifted to Essen into another subcamp of the KZ Buchenwald 
The Gelsenzentrum, a center for urban and contemporary history in Gelsenkirchen, contains documents concerning the history of the subcamp Gelsenberglager. An essay, Das Gelsenberg Lager (PDF), and a list with the names of the victims is accessible on the web page of GELSENZENTRUM 
Parliamentary elections were held in Kosovo on 12 December 2010, following a vote of no-confidence in the government that brought forward the election. Those were the first elections after the country declared independence. 
This was to be the first election since Kosovo's unilateral declaration of independence, and the International Court of Justice's advisory opinion on the legality of the declaration. 
In the Assembly (Kuvendi/Skupstina), 100 members are elected through an open-list proportional representation system to serve 4-year terms and 20 members are reserved to represent Kosovo's national minorities to serve 4-year terms. 
In the proportional tier, there is a 30 percent female quota under which every third candidate must be female. Electors may vote for up to five individual candidates within the list they choose. For the 20 reserved seats, 10 seats are reserved for Serbs, 4 seats for the Roma, Ashkali and Egyptians, 3 seats for the Bosniaks, Montenegrins, Croats, Hungarians, Toskan, 2 seats for the Turks, and seat for the Gorans. 
At a party congress on 7 November, Pristina mayor Isa Mustafa was elected as the new leader of LDK, beating incumbent Fatmir Sejdiu with 235 to 125 votes. 
Following a 21 November municipal election that was found to have had mistakes, the CEC,and the largest monitoring mission, Democracy in Action, admitted having made the mistakes in vote counting in Orahovac with second place being given to the wrong party. This raised concerns for the parliamentary election. 
Voting in the north would occur in temporary polling stations; while turnout was predicted to be low, Serbs in other areas of Kosovo were expected to have a big turnout. 
The Election Complaint and Appeals Panel received 171 complaints from political entities over various violations, such as stuffing ballot boxes, multiple voting and defective verification ultraviolet lamps. 
Chief State Prosecutor Ismet Kabashi called upon prosecutors from seven municipalities to collect evidence of fraud. Municipal officials were after a trial sentenced to 6 months of prison.[citation needed] 
The coalition agreements, according to the foreign media, foresee that: The PDK will get a deputy prime minister and ten ministries, AKR would get a deputy prime minister and three ministries, the Serb minority party SLS would get the post of another deputy prime minister and three ministries, the Ibrahim Rugova List would get another deputy prime minister and a ministry and the other non-Serbian minorities (working together as the parliamentary group "6 plus") would also get a ministry. 
The coalition agreement was finally signed on 20 February 2011 and the distribution of ministries was: 
He is still worshipped as the supreme creator god in Watsdin, and is believed to reside in every living being, and to manifest in mankind as consciousness and worthy action. 
St. John's Regional Medical Center is a hospital located in Oxnard, California in the United States, and is operated by Dignity Health, along with its sister hospital, St. John's Hospital Camarillo in Camarillo. The hospital was founded in 1912. 
Darren Lee serves as president and CEO of both St. John's Pleasant Valley and St. John's Regional Medical Center. 
In 1827 in Dublin, Ireland, Catherine McAuley, a wealthy Irish heiress, began caring for poor women and children. She wanted her service to the poor to endure, so she founded the Sisters of Mercy in 1831. The organization expanded to the United States in 1843, and by 1854, the Sisters of Mercy had settled in San Francisco, California. 
On April 25, 1915, Bishop Thomas J. Conaty blessed and dedicated the permanent hospital structure consisting of 25 patient beds, which was built right next to the temporary structure. Showing dignity and justice for the entire community, Rev. Laubacher declared that "the doors of this building are thrown open to the sick and suffering, regardless of creed or color." 
In 1927, the hospital's staff and physicians were recognized for excellence in patient care when the American College of Surgeons, the first hospital accreditation agency, granted St. John's standardization approval. 
Decades later in 1952, as a booming post-war population in Oxnard made it necessary to build a larger hospital, a two-story building with 75 patient beds was opened and dedicated by Cardinal James Francis McIntyre. This hospital was located on F Street in Oxnard. During the next 35 years, as community need grew, St. John's continued to expand the facility with the addition of two floors and ancillary areas. 
In 1958, a broadcasting console was constructed at the hospital under the direction of John F. Conroy, chief engineer, with components donated by Peter J. Even. The console enabled patients to watch television programs from their beds and it enabled nurses to pipe music to remote stations throughout the hospital. This console was the first of its kind in the area. 
In 1993, St. John's Regional Medical Center in Oxnard merged with its sister hospital St. John's Hospital Camarillo (originally known as Pleasant Valley Hospital) in Camarillo, creating the largest acute healthcare organization in Ventura County. 
In 1996, St. John's Cancer Center of Ventura County opened to offer free support programs and services for cancer patients and their families. 
In 2005, the hospital dedicated the Mary Gabriel and Mary Michael Comfort Care Suites, Family Retreat, and Kitchen. The suites provide a peaceful environment in a home-like setting for palliative care patients and their families. In 2009, St. John's Palliative Care Program was honored with the prestigious Circle of Life Recognition. 
In 2010, the hospital added a 128-slice computed tomography (CT) scanner to its diagnostic imaging services. 
In 2003, St. John's Regional Medical Center and St. John's Pleasant Valley Hospital's community newsletter, which at the time was called Living Well, was presented with the prestigious Bronze award by HMR Publications Group, Inc. at the annual Healthcare Advertising Awards in the Newsletter category. Living Well was produced by St. John's Public Relations and Communications Department and published by Diablo Custom Publishing (DCP). 
In 2006, in a report released by the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development (OSHPD), St. John's Regional Medical Center earned a rating of Better in the first mandatory "California Report on Coronary Artery Bypass Graft (CABG) Surgery 2003 Hospital Data." St. John's was one of only four hospitals in California, and the only hospital in Ventura County, to earn this designation. 
In July 2009, St. John's Regional Medical Center and St. John's Pleasant Valley Hospital received a Circle of Life Award Citations of Honor from the American Hospital Association. 
Tapeina paulista is a species of beetle in the family Cerambycidae. It was described by Marinoni in 1972. It is known from Brazil. 
The Provincial Government of East Pakistan governed the East Pakistan (now Bangladesh) province and was centered in its provincial capital Dhaka. The head of the province was the Governor, who was nominated by the President of Pakistan. While the head of the province of East Pakistan was the Chief Minister who was elected by the East Pakistan Assembly. 
The East Pakistani government was dominated by the Awami League. It was succeeded by the Government of Bangladesh following the province's secession in 1971. 
After absorption into the Dominion of Pakistan, the province of East Pakistan (former East Bengal) was administered by a ceremonial Governor and an indirectly elected Chief Minister. During the year from May 1954 to August 1955, executive powers were exercised by the Governor and there was no Chief Minister. 
Lopatki is located 12 km north of Ramon (the district's administrative centre) by road. Borki is the nearest rural locality. 
David Albert Yetman (born 1941) is an American academic expert on Sonora, Mexico and an Emmy award-winning media presenter on the world's deserts. He is a research social scientist at the University of Arizona. 
Yetman was born in New Jersey, USA. His father was a minister for the Methodist Church. Following the onset of acute asthma, his family moved with him to the dry climate of southern Arizona when he was a teenager. They arrived in Duncan, Arizona in 1954 and then moved to Prescott in 1955 where he went to Prescott High School. 
His TV career as host of The Desert Speaks began in 2000, a series lasting 9 years. His PBS series In the Americas with David Yetman began in 2011 and deals with quirky and interesting corners of the Western Hemisphere. As of 2020, eight seasons of ten episodes each have aired. 
He is the son of Jomo Kenyatta, Kenya's first president and his fourth wife Mama Ngina Kenyatta. He has been married to Margaret Gakuo Kenyatta since 1991. They have three children: his two sons Jomo and Muhoho, and his daughter Ngina.  
Uhuru was re-elected for a second and final term in the August 2017 general elections, winning 54% of the popular vote. The win was formally declared on national television by the Chairperson of the Independent Electoral and Boundaries Commission (IEBC), Mr. Wafula Chebukati. 
However, Uhuru's election was challenged in the Supreme Court of Kenya by his main competitor, Raila Odinga. On 1 September 2017, the court declared the election invalid and ordered a new presidential election to take place within 60 days from the day of the ruling. A new presidential election was held on 26 October, which he won, with 39.03% electoral voter participation. 
His family hails from the Kikuyu, a Bantu ethnic group. His given name "Uhuru" is from the Swahili term for "freedom", and was given to him in anticipation of Kenya's upcoming independence. Uhuru attended St Mary's School in Nairobi. Between 1979 and 1980, he also briefly worked as a teller at the Kenya Commercial Bank. 
After attending St. Mary's school, Uhuru went on to study economics, political science and government at Amherst College in the United States. Upon his graduation, Uhuru returned to Kenya, and started a company Wilham Kenya Limited, through which he sourced and exported agricultural produce. 
Subsequently, Uhuru Kenyatta was Minister of Finance from 2009 to 2012, while remaining Deputy Prime Minister. Accused by the International Criminal Court (ICC) of committing crimes against humanity in relation to the violent aftermath of the 2007 election, he resigned as Minister of Finance on 26 January 2012. He was elected as President of Kenya in the March 2013 presidential election, defeating Raila Odinga with a slim majority in a single round of voting. 
In the 1997 general election, Uhuru Kenyatta contested for the Gatundu South Constituency parliamentary seat, once held by his father, but lost to Moses Mwihia, a Nairobi architect. 
In 1999, Moi appointed Uhuru to chair the Kenya Tourism Board, a government parastatal. In 2001, he was nominated as a Member of Parliament, and he joined the Cabinet as Minister for Local Government. He would also later be elected First Vice Chairman of KANU. 
Uhuru finished second to Mwai Kibaki in the General Elections, with 31% of the vote. He conceded defeat and took up an active leadership role as Leader of the Opposition. 
In January 2005, Uhuru Kenyatta defeated Nicholas Biwott for chairmanship of KANU, taking 2,980 votes among party delegates against Biwott's 622 votes. 
Uhuru led his party KANU in the referendum campaigns against the draft constitution in 2005, having teamed up with the Liberal Democratic Party, a rebel faction in the Kibaki government, to form the Orange Democratic Movement. The result of this was a vote against the adoption of the draft constitution by a noticeable margin, which was a great political embarrassment to Emilio Mwai Kibaki. 
In November 2006, Kenyatta was displaced as KANU leader by the late Nicholas Biwott. On 28 December 2006, the High Court of Kenya reinstated Uhuru Kenyatta as KANU chairman. However, further court proceedings followed. On 28 June 2007, the High Court confirmed Kenyatta as party leader, ruling that there was insufficient evidence for Biwott's argument that Kenyatta had joined another party. 
On 13 September 2007, Uhuru Kenyatta withdrew from the December 2007 presidential election in favour of Kibaki for re-election. He said that he did not want to run unless he could be sure of winning. 
Kenyatta and the rest of the Cabinet were sworn in on 17 April. Uhuru Kenyatta was later moved from Local Government and appointed Minister for Finance on 23 January 2009. During his tenure, he spearheaded a number of reform measures that changed how treasury and government by extension transact business, such as the Integrated Financial Management Information System (IFMIS) and a fund for the inclusion of the informal sector in the mainstream economy. 
Uhuru ran for president in the elections held on 4 March 2013 and garnered 6,173,433 votes (50.03%) out of the 12,338,667 votes cast. As this was above the 50% plus 1 vote threshold, he won the election in the first round thus evading a run-off between the top two candidates. He was, therefore, declared the fourth President of the Republic of Kenya by the Independent Electoral and Boundaries Commission (IEBC). 
On 9 March 2018 Uhuru Kenyatta agreed on a truce between the opposition leader, Raila Odinga. This action marked the country's watershed moment that redrew its political architecture. On 27 November 2019, Uhuru Kenyatta launched the Building Bridges Initiatives (BBI) in Bomas of Kenya. This is one of the outcomes as a result of the truce with the opposition leader Raila Odinga as its implementations will foresee some amendments in the Kenyan Constitution. 
On 31 October 2013, the ICC postponed Kenyatta's trial for crimes against humanity by three months until 5 February 2014 after the defense had requested more time. 
On 20 May 2012, Uhuru Kenyatta attended the elaborately assembled and much-publicized launch of The National Alliance party in a modern high-tech dome at the Kenyatta International Conference Centre. His presence at the TNA launch was a strong indication that he would contest for the party's presidential nomination ticket in his quest for the presidency in the 2013 General Elections. 
The Justice and Constitutional Affairs Minister Eugene Wamalwa and Eldoret North Constituency MP William Ruto led more than 70 MPs in attending the function. The Speaker of the East African Legislative Assembly, Abdi Ramadhan, Cabinet Ministers Mohamed Yusuf Haji, Jamleck Irungu Kamau, Dr. Naomi Shaaban, Samuel Poghisio, Professor Sam Ongeri and Dr. Mohammed Kuti and MPs Charles Cheruiyot Keter, Aden Bare Duale and Mohamed Maalim Mohamud also attended the event. 
TNA won civic and parliamentary seats in 7 different counties while its closest challengers, ODM won seats in 4 counties. The National Alliance Party remained a strong contender for the following year's general elections, having received major defections from other big political parties of Kenya. The successful election of TNA's main candidates (Uhuru Kenyatta and William Ruto) continued to enhance TNA's viability. 
Uhuru Kenyatta's party, The National Alliance (TNA) joined William Ruto's United Republican Party (URP), Najib Balala's Republican Congress Party (RCP) and Charity Ngilu's National Rainbow Coalition party to form the Jubilee Alliance coalition. Various opinion polls prior to the election placed Uhuru as one of the main contenders, and his Jubilee Alliance as among the most popular. The other formidable coalition was the Coalition For Reform and Democracy (CORD), led by Raila Odinga. 
As per the IEBC's official results, Uhuru got 6,173,433 of the 12,221,053 valid votes cast ahead of the second placed Raila Odinga who garnered 5,340,546 (43.7%). Uhuru's result was 50.51% of the vote and was above the 50% plus 1 vote threshold set out in the 2010 constitution, thus making him the president-elect. 
There was some discontent with the official results, as would be expected in such a hotly contested election, especially in Raila Odinga's strongholds. The inordinate delay in releasing the results and the technical failure of some safeguards and election equipment deployed by the IEBC did not help the perception that the election had been less than free and fair. 
Two groups disputed these results and filed petitions challenging various aspects of it at the Supreme Court of Kenya to contest the result. The groups were the Coalition For Reform and Democracy, CORD, led by Raila Odinga, and the Africa Centre for Open Governance (AFRICOG). Uhuru Kenyatta and his running mate were respondents in these cases and were represented by Fred Ngatia and Katwa Kigen respectively. 
 The Supreme court judges unanimously upheld the election of Uhuru Kenyatta as Kenya's fourth president after rejecting Raila Odinga's petition in a verdict delivered on Saturday 30 March 2013. Chief Justice Willy Mutunga in his ruling said the elections were indeed conducted in compliance with the Constitution and the law. 
 After the Supreme Court dismissed the petitions the swearing in ceremony was held on 9 April 2013 at the Moi International Sports Centre, Kasarani, Nairobi, in accordance to Article 141 (2) (b) of the constitution which stipulates that in case the Supreme Court upholds the victory of the president-elect, the swearing in will take place on "the first Tuesday following the seventh day following the date on which the court renders a decision declaring the election to be valid". 
During his inaugural speech, Uhuru promised economic transformation through Vision 2030, unity among all Kenyans, free maternal care and that he will serve all Kenyans. He also promised to improve the standards of education in Kenya. During the Madaraka day Celebrations, a national holiday celebrated to the country's independence on 1 June, President Uhuru Kenyatta announced free maternal care in all public health facilities, a move that was welcomed by many Kenyans. 
On 1 September 2017, the Supreme Court of Kenya nullified the re-election of Uhuru Kenyatta after the Independent Electoral and Boundaries Commission (IEBC) had announced him the winner on 8 August 2017. As a result of that, there was a need for the election to be held once again. It was scheduled for 26 October 2017. After the reelection, Uhuru Kenyatta emerged the winner once again. 
His major challenges include the high cost of living, rising public debt, a high public wage bill and allegations of corruption among people close to his government. The 2017 general election and its violence is also a challenge that threatened not only his presidency but also the future of the East African Nation 
On 28 June 2018, Kenyatta declared a major crackdown on corruption and stated that no one was immune from corruption charges in Kenya. Kenyatta also stated his own brother Muhoho, a director in a company that had been accused in parliament of importing contraband sugar, should be charged if there is clear evidence against him. 
On 28 May 2020, a breakthrough in Kenyatta's pledge to combat corruption in Kenya occurred when 40 civil servants and 14 private sector officials, including National Youth Service (NYS) Director General Richard Ndubai, were arrested on charges related to the National Youth Service scandal. 
President Kenyatta has led and negotiated peace agreements in the South Sudan and in the Democratic Republic of Congo. At the East African level, he has developed a close relationship with the Ugandan President Yoweri Museveni and Rwanda President Paul Kagame, creating the Coalition of the Willing, a caucus within the EAC that has signed on to more joint development and economic agreements than the other EAC partners, including a joint tourist visa. 
He attended the funeral of Nelson Mandela and was received warmly by the crowds. He also attended the funeral of President Michael Sata of Zambia in November 2014. However, it had been perceived that his administration's relations with Botswana were strained due to Botswana's support of the ICC process. He has since visited Botswana to remove this perception and Botswana voted in favor of the AU's ICC Resolution. 
The Cabinet fell on 19 July 1972 just a year into its term and was replaced by the caretaker Cabinet Biesheuvel II with Biesheuvel continuing as Prime Minister. For the election of 1972 Biesheuvel served once again as Lijsttrekker but the following cabinet formation resulted in a coalition lead by Labour Leader Joop den Uyl. Biesheuvel left office following the installation of the Cabinet Den Uyl on 11 May 1973 and announced his retirement and stepped down as Leader on 15 May 1973. 
Between 1956 and 1963 he represented the Anti-Revolutionary Party in the House of Representatives (the lower house of parliament). From 1957 to 1961 he held a seat on the Consultative Assembly of the Council of Europe and from 1961 to 1963 in the European Parliament. 
In the successive administrations headed by Marijnen, Cals and Zijlstra between 24 July 1963 and 5 April 1967 he was Deputy Prime Minister with additional responsibility for matters concerning Suriname and the Netherlands Antilles, and Minister of Agriculture and Fisheries. 
In 1967 he returned to the House of Representatives and became leader of the parliamentary Anti-Revolutionary Party. During the same period he also chaired the Shipbuilding Board and the Committee on Government Information Reform. 
On 22 November 1945, Biesheuvel married his longtime partner, Wilhelmina Jacoba "Mies" Meuring (born 7 August 1919). They had two daughters and one son. Mies Meuring died on 17 January 1989 at the age of 69. Barend Biesheuvel died in a hospital in Haarlem from cardiovascular disease on 29 April 2001 at the age of 81. Biesheuvel and his wife were buried at the main cemetery in Bloemendaal. 
The Progressive Aerodyne SeaRey is an American two-seat, single-engine, amphibious flying boat designed and manufactured by Progressive Aerodyne originally in Orlando, Florida, and now in Tavares, Florida. It was first flown in November 1992 and is sold as a kit aircraft for amateur construction as well as a light-sport aircraft. 
The latest variant of the Searey is the LSA (also available as LSX) for the US light-sport aircraft category, introduced in 2010. 
In the United States the SeaRey may be registered either as a light sport aircraft or as an amateur-built experimental. 
The Canadian Aviation Regulations allow the SeaRey to be registered either as an amateur built, basic ultralight or as an advanced ultralight aeroplane. The SeaRey 115 is only eligible as an AULA if the carbon fiber hull is used, due to category empty weight limitations. 
There is only one model of the SeaRey but different hull designs of increasing strength have developed over the years, designated as "A," "B" and "C" hulls. The latest "C" hull is available in either carbon fiber or fiberglass. 
The windshield and the sliding canopies on either side are made of Lexan. The canopies are track-mounted, can be opened in flight and can also be locked closed on the ground. 
The SeaRey's landing gear consists of two main retractable wheels and a tailwheel in conventional landing gear configuration. Originally the landing gear was retracted for water operations by means of a mechanical Johnson-bar lever that raises or lowers all three wheels simultaneously. More recent retraction options include: manual, hydraulic or electric. The electric actuator is the newest and most popular, but the manual is the lightest. 
In 2012, author Richard Bach flew the SeaRey he named Puff, from Florida to his home near Seattle. That trip was chronicled in his book, Travels With Puff: A Gentle Game of Life and Death. In Puff, Bach suffered near-fatal injuries in a landing accident on San Juan Island, Washington in late 2012. He later wrote about the accident, and both his and Puff's recovery, in the book, Illusions II: The Adventures of a Reluctant Student. 
In 2015, over the course of seven months, pilot Michael Smith flew around the world in a SeaRey, setting a record as the first person to fly a solo circumnavigation of the globe in a single-engine flying boat. Smith chronicled his journey in the book, "Voyage of the Southern Sun." 
Members of the CAS/CSE family of proteins have two domains. An N-terminal Cse1 domain, which contains HEAT repeats, and a C-terminal domain. 
Maple Grove Farm (544 Long Creek Road) in Dover, Tennessee, was added to the National Register of Historic Places on January 31, 2019. 
This article about a property in Stewart County, Tennessee on the National Register of Historic Places is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to a Japanese baseball infielder is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The IEEE Herman Halperin Electric Transmission and Distribution Award is a Technical Field Award of the IEEE that is presented for outstanding contributions to electric transmission and distribution. The award may be presented annually to an individual or a team of up to three people. It was instituted by the IEEE Board of Directors in 1986. 
Gaskain was educated at Haileybury. He joined the Metropolitan Police in 1936. He qualified as a barrister in 1944. He was Assistant Chief Constable of Norfolk Police from 1942 to 1952; Chief Constable of the Cumberland and Westmorland force from 1952 to 1959; and Chief Constable of Gloucestershire from 1960 to 1962. He joined Her Majesty's Inspectorate of Constabulary in 1962. 
This biography article about law enforcement in the United Kingdom is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Neofriseria sceptrophora is a moth of the family Gelechiidae. It is found in Afghanistan and Turkey. 
He participated in the 2004 Summer Olympics. There he was stopped in the second round of the featherweight (57 kg) division by North Korea's eventual runner-up Kim Song-Guk. 
Kupatadze won bronze medals in the same division at the 2002 European Amateur Boxing Championships and the 2004 European Amateur Boxing Championships. 
This biographical article related to a boxer from the country of Georgia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In radiology, Garland's triad (also known as the 1-2-3 sign) is the concurrence of reasonably symmetrical bilateral hilar lymphadenopathy and right paratracheal lymphadenopathy seen on a chest radiograph. These features are suggestive of thoracic sarcoidosis. 
The area is well vegetated with mulga and salt bush as well as grass that grows in abundance and which was often cut to make hay. In 1910 25 tons of hay was cut and stacked for homestead stock. 
The country was pioneered by T. O'Grady, his brother Robert O'Grady and two other men. O'Grady constructed a rudimentary hut and shearing shed a few miles from the current homestead. The party came down with a fever in their first year and a shepherd ended up taking the sick man to Geraldton in a cart for treatment. One of the men died during the journey. Upon returning the O'Gradys built the current homestead. 
The station came into the hands of James Aitkin and Mr. Birrell prior to 1879. Birrell died afterwards leaving his share to be put up for auction, which in turn was acquired by Aitkin. Aitkin had moved over from Victoria in 1879 with enough capital to get Milly Milly well established. 
In 1886 the station sheared over 20,000 sheep and was managed by Archie Campbell, who had been there since 1883. 
The Murchison district was hit by drought in 1891 but Milly Milly, along with Boolardy and Murgoo Station, was believed to be the best off. 
Murder occurred at Milly Milly in 1893, when an Aboriginal woman was killed as she walked to Nookawarra Station with a worker from the station, Peter John Keeshan, where Keeshan was catching the mail coach. Keeshan was accused of the killing and went to trial but was found not guilty. 
Flooding occurred at Milly Milly and other stations along the Murchison River, including Mileura, following heavy rains in March and April 1900. Buildings were washed away and much fencing was lost along with stock being drowned. 
The station was briefly owned by Archibald M'Kellar of Geraldton, who had inherited it from his brother-in-law, James Aitken. M'Kellar, who was described as being "of eccentric disposition" died in 1904 and left a will leaving his estate to a cousin in Scotland and to hospitals in Perth, Fremantle and Geraldton, but neglected to specify the share each would receive. 
It was acquired shortly afterwards by the Mulcahy brothers, Daniel and Michael, who were well known hoteliers in Perth, Fremantle and Kalgoorlie in 1905. The brothers left the property under the management of Fred Caeser, who had been manager at Milly Milly since about 1899. 
A second murder occurred at the station in November 1912; the cook, Jimmy Carlo, was arrested after the station accountant, Percy Tompkiss, was poisoned. Tompkiss' body was found to contain traces of arsenic, used in sheep dip, which it was thought he consumed in a bottle of whiskey. Carlo was committed to stand trial for murder in October 1913. At trial Carlos was acquitted on lack of evidence. 
In 1917 Michael Mulcahy died leaving his brother Daniel to carry on their pastoral and hotel interests. Daniel died in June 1925 at his home in Fremantle at age 58. His wife and 10 children were at Milly Milly at that time and received the news via Byro Station. 
In 1925 the trustees of the late Daniel Mulcahy purchased the thoroughbred stallion Star Comedy, the third sire bought for the station over the last few years. The first was Mait Mark, who died shortly after arriving and the second, Hostage, was euthanased after breaking a leg. Star Comedy was a foal of Comedy King, a Melbourne Cup winner. 
Rain from the remains of Cyclone Emma in 2006 caused flooding along much of the Murchison River including Milly Milly, where the homestead resembled a small island of dry land among the floodwaters that submerged much of the property. 
The station had a poor season with drought striking in 2010. The station manager, Simon Broad, had been feeding stock with lupins and hay as a result of lack of feed on the ground. Calves had to be separated from their mothers and penned near the homestead where they were fed milk replacement pills. 
The lessee in 2012 was the Milly Milly Pastoral company. The station is operating under the Crown Lease number CL139-1967 and has the Land Act number LA3114/625. 
She concluded her school career, passing her school final exams ("Abitur") ad the IGS:FF (school) in Braunschweig and went on to study drama in Munich at the Bayerische Theaterakademie August Everding.   That led to her degree in acting, which she received in 2010. Since then she has appeared in a range of film, television and theatre production, sung in blues and soul bands, and featured in cabaret productions. 
Her film debut came in 2009 with her appearance in the "action comedy" Vicky the Viking as the wife of Tjure (played by Nic Romm). She took the same role two years later in the sequel, Vicky and the Treasure of the Gods. 
Margaret Renkl (born October 1961) is an American writer and New York Times opinion columnist living in Nashville, Tennessee. Renkl is the author of Late Migrations: A Natural History of Love and Loss. Her weekly opinion columns focus on nature, politics, and culture.  
Renkl was born in Andalusia, Alabama, and moved with her family to Birmingham, Alabama as a child. Renkl spent much of her childhood out-of-doors, with frequent visits to her maternal grandparents, who remained in Lower Alabama.  
 Renkl is influenced by her upbringing and life in the American south. In an opinion essay, What is a Southern Writer?, Renkl grapples with its meaning, both in her work and for the canon as a whole, writing: 
Hangtown fry is a type of omelette made famous during the California Gold Rush in the 1850s. The most common version includes bacon and oysters combined with eggs, and fried together. 
Another creation myth is the one told by the waiters at Sam's Grill in Tiburon, just north of San Francisco. At the county jail in Placerville, a condemned man was asked what he would like to eat for his last meal. He thought quickly and ordered an oyster omelet, knowing that the oysters would have to be brought from the water, over a hundred miles away by steamship and over rough roads, delaying his execution for a day.[citation needed] 
The dish was popularized by Tadich Grill in San Francisco, where it has apparently been on the menu for 160 years. Later variations on the dish include the addition of onions, bell peppers, or various spices, and deep frying the oysters before adding them to the omelette. 
According to the El Dorado County Museum, "No dish epitomizes California and its Gold Rush more than Hangtown Fry. It was created at a location central to the Gold Rush at the same time the great state was being born. And, like the miners who worked the river banks and hillsides, and the population that followed, it is a unique blend of many things, both those produced locally and those that have arrived from elsewhere." 
Food writer and chef Mark Bittman created his own version of Hangtown Fry in one of his Minimalist cooking videos for The New York Times. 
Wiaki, a.k.a. Minidien, is a nearly extinct Torricelli language of Papua New Guinea. The language is spoken in moderation by those residing in the older generations.   
He is the youngest singer to win two debut awards at Global Indian Music Awards (GiMA) and the best playback singer award at BIG Star Entertainment Award in 2015. 
Armaan Malik was born in Mumbai on 22 July 1995. His father, Daboo Malik is a music composer in Indian Music Industry while his mother, Jyothi Malik belongs to a Telugu-speaking family from Visakhapatnam. 
He started singing at the age of 4. He went to Sa Re Ga Ma Pa L'il Champs in 2006 without the title Malik. However, he didn't win the show. Later Armaan learnt Hindustani classical music for 10 years and went to learn western music from Berklee College of Music, Boston. 
In 2015, he sang "Main Hoon Hero Tera" for Hero, "Kwahishein" for Calendar Girls and "Tumhe Aapna Banane Ka" for Hate Story 3 under elder brother Amaal Mallik's composition. The latter one he sang with Neeti Mohan. He also sang another song for Hate Story 3 titled "Wajah Tum Ho" under Baman's composition. He also sang a single "Main Rahoon Ya Na Rahoon" under Amaal's composition. He was awarded Filmfare R. D. Burman Award for New Music Talent in that year. 
In 2020, he sang one song for Hindi soundtrack of Darbar, Gunjan Saxena: The Kargil Girl and Khuda Haafiz. In 2021, He lent his voice for one track of Saina, Koi Jaane Na, 99 Songs, Bell Bottom, Thalaivii and Bhoot Police. 
In September 2021, Armaan teamed up with Daboo Malik, Amaal Mallik and Kunaal Vermaa for his new single "Barsaat". 
In Effect Mode is the debut album by Al B. Sure!. It was released on May 3, 1988 on Uptown Records with distribution handled by Warner Bros. Records. It was one of two albums by Sure! that was released under Uptown that were not issued under its parent company MCA Records. 
Sure! got his initial start when he performed at the 1987 Sony Innovators Award, an annual talent showcase that awarded people who showed promising talent.  Music producer Quincy Jones handpicked Sure! as the first winner of the contest. Warner Bros. Vice President of black music Benny Medina offered Sure! a recording contract to record his debut. 
Sure! got his start in the music industry singing background vocals on Heavy D. & The Boyz' 1987 debut Living Large. He appeared on the song "Dedication" as well as the singles "Don't You Know"  and "Moneyearnin' Mount Vernon" due to being childhood friends with group member Edward "Eddie F" Ferrell. That friendship lead to him meeting Andre Harrell, who brought Sure! into the fold at his newly established imprint Uptown Records. 
Sure! initially wanted to make his debut as a rapper, but later decided to focus on R&B after listening to the music his cousin Kyle West was making.  As a result, he enlisted West as the co-producer for his debut album. Sure! and West wrote virtually all the songs together, save for their cover of Lori Lieberman's "Killing Me Softly" - which was popularized by singer Roberta Flack - and "If I'm Not Your Lover". 
West recalls recording In Effect Mode as lacking direction because neither he nor Sure! had any idea what they were doing. Because of Sure!'s last minute change from rapping to singing, he had to learn how to write songs and melodies in a short period of time. Within the span of six months, he made the transition from being a rapper to being a singer. 
The Guardian said the show was an expensive soap opera, but found the show to be fun. A critic with the Financial Times questioned the accuracy of the show, especially its portrait of women. The Irish Times found that everything in the show is  "absurd, generic or risible". The Telegraph was kinder to the show, as it found the show to be a "silly but gripping period drama". 
A post office called Kaseyville was established in 1867, and remained in operation until 1908. Singleton L. Kasey, an early postmaster, gave the community his last name. 
This Macon County, Missouri state location article is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Fred Castro is the current head coach of the Eastern Michigan University women's basketball team, a position he assumed after the end of the 2016 season. Prior to that, he spent three years as the offensive coordinator of the University of Washington women's team, under head coach Mike Neighbors. 
This biographical article relating to a United States basketball coach is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The Descent from the Cross is a c.1618 oil on canvas painting by Peter Paul Rubens and his studio. The broad free brushstrokes of the old man's body and robes point to Rubens' pupil Anthony van Dyck. It is now in the Hermitage Museum in St Petersburg. 
Parliamentary elections were held in the Byelorussian Soviet Socialist Republic in 1990 to elect the twelfth Supreme Council. A total of 1,427 candidates contested the 310 seats, while a further 50 members were appointed by organizations of veterans and invalids. 
Conasprella coriolisi is a species of sea snail, a marine gastropod mollusk in the family Conidae, the cone snails and their allies. 
Like all species within the genus Conasprella, these snails are predatory and venomous. They are capable of "stinging" humans, therefore live ones should be handled carefully or not at all. 
This marine species occurs off New Caledonia, Vanuatu and in the Coral Sea at depths between 150 m and 550 m. 
Here are the winners and nominees of the Black Reel Award for Best Original or Adapted Song. The award goes to the artist and the writers of the song. 
James Cecil Walter Pereira (10 September 1856 - 9 June 1915) was the 4th Solicitor General of Ceylon. He was appointed on 1906, succeeding Ponnambalam Ramanathan, and held the office until 1912. He was succeeded by James Van Langenberg. 
Pereira was a prominent member of the Ceylon National Association and was a founder of the Orient Club, the first Ceylonese only social club in the country. 
Stephen "Steve" Arterburn from Ranger, Texas is the founder and chairman of New Life Ministries and host of the syndicated Christian counseling talk show New Life Live!  available on XM and Sirius Satellite radio and on NRB Network. Arterburn is also the host of New Life TV, a web-based Christian ministry. Arterburn is the founder of the Women of Faith conferences. He also serves as a teaching pastor in Carmel, Indiana. 
Arterburn is a public speaker and has been featured in national media venues such as Oprah, Inside Edition, Good Morning America, CNN Live, The New York Times, USA Today, US News & World Report, ABC World News Tonight, and in GQ and Rolling Stone magazines.[citation needed] Arterburn has spoken at major events for the National Center for Fathering, American Association of Christian Counselors, Promise Keepers Canada, Life Well Conferences in Australia and The Salvation Army.[citation needed] 
Arterburn is an author of over two dozen Christian-themed self-help books. Along with Dr. Dave Stoop, he edited and produced the Life Recovery Bible, and Take Your Life Back.[citation needed] 
The first known published synthesis of troparil and the related compound WIN 35428 is by Clarke and co-workers during the 1970s. Apparently, it was their intention to separate the stimulant actions of cocaine from its toxicity and dependence liability. Troparil is the only regular phenyltropane having a NET affinity that exceeds the DAT affinity.[citation needed] 
Troparil is used in scientific research into the dopamine reuptake transporter. 3H-radiolabelled forms of troparil have been used in humans and animals to map the distribution of dopamine transporters in the brain. It is also used for animal research into stimulant drugs as an alternative to cocaine which produces similar effects, but avoids the stringent licensing requirements for the use of cocaine itself. 
The legal status of troparil is unclear, but it may be considered a controlled substance analog of cocaine in the United States on the grounds of its related chemical structure. The legal status of troparil and many other cocaine analogs in Canada, is dependent on if ecgonine, coca, or cocaine were derivatives of the compound, according to the wording on the entry of coca in Schedule 1 of the Controlled Drugs and Substances Act. 
Smith played for the Harrisburg Giants in 1924. In eight recorded games, he posted nine hits in 39 plate appearances. 
St Clare's College is an independent Roman Catholic single-sex secondary day school for girls, located in Waverley, in the Eastern Suburbs of Sydney, New South Wales, Australia. 
Established in 1884 by the Poor Clare Sisters, St Clare's has a non-selective enrolment policy and currently caters for approximately 500 girls from Year 7 to Year 12. 
The college is located within the Archdiocese of Sydney, and is affiliated with the Catholic Girls Secondary Schools Sporting Association (CGSSSA) and is a member of the Association of Heads of Independent Girls' Schools (AHIGS). 
St Clare's College is unique in that it remains established on its original site and continues under the governance of Sydney Catholic schools. 
As with most Australian schools, St Clare's utilises a house system. The school has four houses, through which students compete in a range of sporting and non-sporting activities. They are: 
The Heavy Soul Sessions is the thirteenth studio album by Djam Karet, released on October 17, 2010 by HC Productions. 
Nanjundapuram is a residential neighbourhood of the city of Coimbatore in Tamil Nadu, India. It is one of the well developed neighborhoods in the city and has been part of Coimbatore Corporation since 1981.The name "Nanjundapuram" is derived from the Nanjundeshwarar Temple located on the banks of Noyyal river. 
A two-lane Nanjundapuram flyover is constructed over the two railway lines passing from Coimbatore Junction to Podanur Junction and from Podanur Junction to Irugur Junction. The flyover was planned to reduce traffic congestion in Ramanathapuram Road. 
Nanjundapuram is a prominent residential locality in Coimbatore with a prominent immigrant population. The various schools in the locality are: 
Coimbatore Metro feasibility study is completed and one of the route planned from Ukkadam to Coimbatore Integrated Bus Terminus is planned. There are considerations to make the corridor pass through Nanjundapuram, since the availability of space is better. 
The locality of Nanjundapuram is a part of Singanallur (state assembly constituency) and Coimbatore (Lok Sabha constituency). 
Pselnophorus vilis is a moth of the family Pterophoridae. It known from Japan (Hokkaido, Honshu, Kyushu, Tanega-shima, Yaku-shima), Amur, Korea and China. 
The larvae feed on Ligularia fisheri, Ligularia tussilaginea and Petasites japonicus. When feeding on Ligularia tussilaginea, the larva usually eats the leaf from the upper surface and the lower epidermis is left untouched. Rarely, the larva eats the leaf from the under surface. The pupa is usually attached to the upper surface of a leaf. When feeding on Ligularia fisheri, the larva eats the leaf from the upper or under surface and eats large patches, here the epidermis is not left. 
This article on a moth of the family Pterophoridae is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Dinokana is a town in Ngaka Modiri Molema District Municipality in the North West province of South Africa. 
The area became the main town of the Bahurutshe in 1849, when Kgosi Moiloa I settled it with about 1,500 people, who had been displaced following the Difaqane war. Moiloa was accompanied by the Reverend Walter Inglis of the London Missionary Society. 
In 1875, a succession dispute in the aftermath of Moiloa's death led to the displacement of many BaHurutshe, and nearly half of the population moved to Gopane. 
In the 1980s, while the town was part of Bophuthatswana, a number of agricultural schemes were started close to Dinokana, and the town of Lehurutshe was built about 10 km away to resettle some of the villagers. Dinokana haa primary schools and high schools. 
Eric Kwame Heymann was a Ghanaian journalist and politician. He was the first Editor-in-chief of the Accra Evening News. He also served as the Chairman of the Association of Ghana Journalists and Writers. From 1965 to 1966, he was the member of parliament for the Buem constituency. 
Heymann was born at Dzelukope near Keta on 29 March 1928 to Edmund Kofi Heymann of the Government Transport Department and Mrs. Dina Afiwa Heymann who hailed from Keta. 
As well as the heated outdoor Olympic-size swimming pool, the centre has a smaller children's pool, outdoor sunbathing space, a gym, spin studio and a cafe. It is managed by Better on behalf of Greenwich London Borough Council. 
The Lido first opened in 1939. It became derelict in the 2000s, but was refurbished and reopened in 2013. 
Genealogical records began around the 17th century showing that Timberland was a medieval village, possibly a small market town. The parish church is dedicated to St Andrew, and its parish records date back even further, to 1563. 
Set within a patchwork of fields in the wetlands of the Lincolnshire Fens, the village is just south of the River Witham and near to the village of Martin. The illustrated signpost with the town name has a plaque above showing the nearby Car Dyke waterway which was once navigable but later drained by small canals to make the surrounding land suitable for farm use. 
Thorpe Tilney Hall is to the south-west. It was used as a setting for the BBC's 1980 Pride and Prejudice as Longbourn Hall. 
The village hall is the centre of village activities. There is a primary and middle school for local children nearby in the village of Martin. The partly Norman Anglican church of St Andrew's seats around 200 people. In the village is a Wesleyan  Methodist chapel, and a public house, The Penny Farthing Inn. The surrounding area has small guest houses and other public houses. 
Price was an artist and retired art teacher. Price received her bachelor's degree in art and education from Hastings College. She also received her master's degrees, in sculpture and fibers, from Kansas State University and Southern Illinois University Carbondale. Price was also the director of the Urban Art Project of 2008, Great Falls, Montana.  
VFTS started as a workshop at Vilnius car repair factory and later transformed into Vilnius factory of vehicles - company which specialized in a preparation of rally/race versions of Lada vehicles and engines. Best known for the Lada 2105 rally vehicle version prepared under Group B rules. The company was founded and managed by famous Lithuanian rally driver Stasys Brundza. 
The preparation of rally cars started in the 1970 in Vilnius, Lithuania (then part of the Soviet Union) in one of halls of Vilnius car repair factory. First model produced in Vilnius factory was Lada 1300 with the engine enlarged up to 1600cc and tuned to 130-150 HP. 
The car's mudguards are angularly broadened which gives the car's characteristic appearance. This modification was not merely about design it was necessary because of the car's widened wheels. Spoilers are also used. 
Lada VFTS is a rear-wheel drive car. However, during its development many things were changed. The brake system remained the same that was used on production vehicles from the Soviet factory. Disk brakes are used on the front axle while drum brakes are used on the rear. 
Possamai is originally regarded as an Italian surname. In Italian it means Possa (rests) mai (never), of which resulted "Never rests". 
Jijel Ferhat Abbas Airport (IATA: GJL, ICAO: DAAV), also known as Ferhat Abbas Airport, is an airport near Jijel, Algeria. Its name comes from the first president of Algerian National Assembly, Ferhat Abbas. 
Climax ESB has been listed as a top American beer by Stuff Magazine and Michael Jackson's Ultimate Beer. Hoffmann Cream Ale and IPA have also been given accolades by Jackson. In the Star Ledger's Malt Madness competition, Hoffmann Helles won the Lagers/Pilsners Category and Hoffmann Hefeweizen was in the Final 4 for Wheats/Whites. 
Ryszard Pawlowski is the founder and co-owner of the Patagonia Mountain Agency. He has been climbing since 1970 and is an alpinism instructor and guide. He has climbed the mountains of North and South America, the Himalayas, Alps, Caucasus, Pamirs and Tian Shan. 
He has summitted Mount Everest five times - 13 May 1994, 12 May 1995, 18 May 1999, 20 May 2012 and 25 May 2014.  
When TV Azteca acquired rights of La Voz from Televisa, they announced that they would produce the senior version, for people 60 years and over. Mexico became the first country in Latin America to produce the senior version. 
McBride's tenure as owner was viewed favorably, partly because of the Browns' on-field success but also because he gave Paul Brown a free hand to coach and sign players. One of the new ownership group's first acts was to assure Cleveland fans that Brown would retain complete control over the football side of the operation. 
McBride continued to direct his taxi and real estate businesses after he sold the Browns, but he kept out of the public eye. He died of a heart attack at the Cleveland Clinic and was buried in Cleveland's Holy Cross Cemetery. He was married to the former Mary Jane Kane. They had three children: Arthur B., Jr., Edward and Jane. 
The Little Wanganui River is a river of the West Coast Region of New Zealand's South Island. It flows generally west from the slopes of Mount Allen, reaching the Karamea Bight close to the small settlement of Little Wanganui. It is home to a large number of trout. 
"Place name detail: Little Wanganui River". New Zealand Gazetteer. New Zealand Geographic Board. Retrieved 12 July 2009. 
This article about a river in the West Coast, New Zealand is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Silvio Manfred Dante is a fictional character on the HBO TV series The Sopranos, played by Steven Van Zandt. He is the consigliere and right-hand man to Tony Soprano in the DiMeo crime family. John Magaro portrays a young Silvio Dante in the 2021 prequel film, The Many Saints of Newark. 
After his return to the more comfortable role of consigliere, Silvio again counseled Tony about contentious issues. When Vito Spatafore was outed to the organization, Silvio convinced Tony of the need to restrain his desire to "give him a pass" because of the effect it would have on the other captains' view of his leadership. When Tony responded with distasteful jokes about Bobby's serious injury, a look from Silvio was enough to tell him he was being unfair. 
When Phil Leotardo and his men killed Vito (without permission from Tony), Tony told Silvio that it was not about Vito, it was about him. Silvio initially told Tony that they should go after one of Phil's men but Tony was trying to avoid a war and instead decided to blow up Phil's wire room in Sheepshead Bay. 
In the episode "Stage 5" Silvio was out at lunch with Gerry Torciano, the man Phil Leotardo wanted to take over as boss of the Lupertazzi family, when one of Doc Santoro's assassins killed Torciano. This outraged Tony, as Silvio could have been hurt during the altercation. 
Paulie later tells Tony that Silvio survived the assassination attempt but is in a coma; the doctors say that he is unlikely to regain consciousness. In the final episode, an emotional Tony visits the still comatose Silvio, whose fate is not mentioned further. 
After her playing career, Rockwell moved into coaching at Pittsburgh before moving to various other universities. 
Rockwell first became an assistant coach for Penn State Nittany Lions women's volleyball team in 2006, a position she held for 2 seasons before joining Texas from 2009 to 2013 as an assistant coach. She then returned to Penn State as the Associate Head Coach 2015 season through the 2017 season. She retired from collegiate coaching in 2018. 
Rockwell began broadcasting in 2018 and announces at college and international games. She has broadcast games on ESPN, the Longhorn Network, Fox Sports, and the Big Ten Network. 
This biographical article relating to volleyball in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Under this regulation, all herbal medicinal products are required to obtain an authorisation to market within the EU. Those products marketed before this legislation came into force can continue to market their product until 30 April 2011, under the transitional measures defined in the Traditional Herbal Medicinal Products Directive. Once this time limit has expired, all herbal medicinal products must have prior authorisation before they can be marketed in the EU. 
For those herbal medicinal products that were not on the market before 30 April 2004, an authorisation must be obtained prior to marketing. 
The only herbal medicines that are exempted from the provisions of the Traditional Herbal Medicinal Products Directive are those unlicensed remedies that are made up for a patient following a consultation with a herbalist. 
Herbal medicines must be now manufactured under Good Manufacturing Practice (GMP) to ensure the quality of the finished product and also demonstrate safety. 
The Traditional Herbal Medicines Product Directive does allow medicinal claims to be made on the label of the final product, although restrictions do apply on the final wording. 
This biographical article related to a Japanese association football midfielder born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Irene Curzon had an intimate insight into the life of the Duke of Windsor, his friendship and marriage to Wallis Simpson and the life of the House of Windsor, through her sister, Alexandra and her brother-in-law Major Edward Dudley Metcalfe, best friend of Edward VIII. She saw the rise of British fascism through her sister Lady Cynthia Mosley and her other brother-in-law Sir Oswald Mosley, with whom she had a brief fling prior to their marriage. 
Irene's father was the successful diplomat-politician George Curzon.  After he was appointed Viceroy of India in 1898, she went out with her mother and sisters to live in New Delhi.  Shortly after they returned to England, Lord Curzon resigned, in 1905, at the end of a long period of Conservative government.  Created Earl of Kedleston and Baron Ravensdale in 1911, the titles were in reversion to daughters as well as heirs male. 
Despite her active social life, she maintained a strong dedication towards welfare work.  She was appointed the chair of Highways Clubs Inc.  In 1936 which provided music, handicrafts and physical training to young disadvantaged people.  She was also appointed vice-president of the National Association of the Girls Clubs and Mixed Clubs.  And then she was the obvious candidate to be the president of the London Union of Youth Clubs. 
This page lists notable US and UK albums, singles and compilations which feature music written by Andrew Lloyd Webber, alongside their release dates. 
Lloyd Webber's Really Useful Records which, for a number of years, had an exclusive partnership with Polydor, released a number of compilations: 
Quine, on the other hand, in "Two Dogmas of Empiricism", presents a much stronger version of underdetermination in science.  His theoretical group embraces all of human knowledge, including mathematics and logic. He contemplated the entirety of human knowledge as being one unit of empirical significance.   Hence all our knowledge, for Quine, would be epistemologically no different from ancient Greek gods, which were posited in order to account for experience. 
Nick Trask (born 6 February 1978) is a former Australian rules footballer who played with the Brisbane Lions in the Australian Football League (AFL). 
Trask played for the Eastern Ranges in the TAC Cup and also at Vermont, before being drafted to the AFL. 
Selected with pick 28 in the 1995 AFL draft, Trask played four games midway through the season and was then recalled for Brisbane's qualifying final at Waverley Park. 
Petasina filicina is a species of air-breathing land snail, a terrestrial pulmonate gastropod mollusk in the family Hygromiidae, the hairy snails and their allies. 
Koptev is a Winner of the Golden Space Medal FAI (2000), a State Councillor of the Russian Federation, 1st class and he has been awarded the Order of Merit for the Fatherland, 2nd and 3rd classes. 
Neel developed the "thrifty gene hypothesis" that paleolithic humans, facing long periods of hunger punctuated by brief periods of food surplus, would have adapted genetically by processing fats and carbohydrates more efficiently during feast periods, to be physiologically resilient during periods of famine. Neel believed that this genetic adaptation might have created a predisposition to type 2 diabetes mellitus. This theory was later discredited by research conducted by Neel himself. 
Dr. Neel attended the College of Wooster with a degree in biology in 1935 and went on to receive his Ph.D. at the University of Rochester. 
Neel was deeply involved with a number of prominent organizations through the course of his career, including, but not limited to: American Academy of Arts and Sciences, American Philosophical Society, Atomic Bomb Casualty Commission, National Research Council, Pan-American Health Organization, Radiation Effects Research Foundation, University of Michigan, and World Health Organization. 
He testified several times before committees and sub-committees of the United States Congress as an expert witness regarding the long-term effects of radiation on human populations. 
The professional papers of James V. Neel are held in the archives of the Library of the American Philosophical Society in Philadelphia, PA.  
James Kenneth Peterson (born November 21, 1978) is a former American football defensive end. He was drafted by the Green Bay Packers in the third round of the 2003 NFL Draft. He played college football at Ohio State. 
Peterson played high school football at McKinley High School in Canton, Ohio, where he was a teammate of former Broncos head coach Josh McDaniels' brother Ben McDaniels. While there he helped his team win the Ohio Division I title in 1997. During his senior year, he was honored as an All-American after posting 101 tackles and 15 sacks. Peterson was also a star basketball player achieving all-city selection as a senior. 
Peterson played college football at Ohio State. During his senior season, he was honored with second-team All-Big Ten Conference and helped his team win the BCS National Championship Game. He finished his college career with 84 tackles, 12 sacks, one interception, and three forced fumbles. 
Peterson was drafted by the Green Bay Packers in the third round of the 2003 NFL Draft. He spent three seasons in Green Bay recording three sacks. He was released by the Packers on September 2, 2006. 
On October 11, 2006, Peterson signed with the Denver Broncos. He was suspended for the first four games of the 2007 season for violating the NFL's steroid policy. During 2007 the Broncos released him twice but decided to re-sign him each time. On March 4, 2009, Peterson re-signed with the Broncos on a three-year contract. He was cut once again on March 10, 2010. 
This article about an organization based in Sweden is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Grevillea uncinulata is a shrub of the genus Grevillea native to an area in the Wheatbelt and Goldfields-Esperance regions of Western Australia. 
Ewald's Hebrew Grammar inaugurated a new era in biblical philology. Subsequent works in that department were avowedly based on his, and Hitzig referred to him as "the second founder of the science of the Hebrew language." He made important contributions  as an exegete, biblical critic and grammarian. In particular, his Geschichte des Volkes Israel, the result of thirty years' labour, was important  in that branch of research. 
Taking up the idea of a divine education of the human race, and firmly believing that Providence assigned a special task to each of the leading nations of antiquity, Ewald felt no difficulty about Israel's place in universal history, or about the problem which that race had been called upon to solve. The history of Israel, according to him, was the history how humanity acquired one true religion, beginning with the exodus and culminating in the appearing of Jesus. 
The Council enacted a number of canons that were henceforth included in the church's canon law, which punished Catholics with excommunication if they subscribed to various heresies named at the Council. These canons remained in legal force for centuries; the modern code of canon law replaced them. 
She won one singles and one doubles title on the WTA Tour, as well as 12 singles and 20 doubles titles on the ITF Women's Circuit in her career. On 10 October 2011, she reached her best singles ranking of world No. 37. On 10 April 2014, she peaked at No. 42 in the doubles rankings. 
In 2001, she reached four finals on ITF level and won all, with three of them coming from Durban, South Africa a local tournament, and one in the United States. 
In 2002, she reached three ITF finals winning one in Mackay, Australia and losing in the other two in Liechtenstein and Switzerland. 
In 2003, she played her first tour-level event in the Mondial Australian Women's Hardcourts and won her first main-draw tour-level match after getting through the qualifying draw over Samantha Stosur but lost to Tathiana Garbin in the next round. She then had a 19 match losing streak in the qualifying draws of tour-level and ITF events and main draw of ITF events. 
In 2005, Scheepers once again started playing in the qualifying draw of tour-level events but she didn't produce results as she only reached one semifinals and one quarterfinals in ITF events. 
2006 was not a better year for Scheepers despite returning to the ITF circuit as she only reached two semifinals and one quarterfinal. 
In 2007, Scheepers won her first ITF titles in three years as she won two titles in Lagos, Nigeria and Allentown, Pennsylvania, United States. 
2009 was a breakthrough year for the South African player as she made her Grand Slam main-draw debut getting through the qualifying draw in the Australian Open and French Open. She also made four main-draw wins and won a title in Irapuato, Mexico. 
In July 2012, she reached the second round of Mercury Insurance Open, Carlsbad losing to Varvara Lepchenko. 
At the 2013 Wimbledon Championships, she teamed with Shuko Aoyama to advance to the semifinals in women's doubles. 
In 2015, after the Family Cup in Charleston, she retired from the WTA Tour and later started coaching American tennis player Alison Riske. 
Scheepers married Roger Anderson, her former coach, on 10 November 2012, in the KwaZulu-Natal Midlands. 
"I Could Be" is a first solo single by American singer Sinitta. The song was released in 1983 and didn't appear on any of Sinitta's albums. The song was written and produced by James George Hargreaves and A. Ajai-Ajagbe. It was remixed by Haakon Brenner. No video was made for this song. 
Brennan and Collins both ran in the 1994 gubernatorial election, and each won their respective party's nomination, but lost the general election to independent Angus King, who would be elected in Maine's other Senate seat in 2012 and become a Senator in 2013. 
Jamboo Savari is a 2014 Kannada criminal comedy film starring Prajwal Devaraj and Nikki Galrani in the lead role. The film is directed by K. C. Venugopal and produced by Hari Prasad Rao under HPR Entertainment Pvt Limited banner. The music for the film is composed by S. Premkumar. It was released on 13 June 2014. 
The film is a remake of successful Telugu film Swamy Ra Ra which starred Nikhil Siddharth and Swati Reddy. 
This article about a Class I railroad  in the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
 Sampoorna is a school management system project implemented by the Education Department of Government of Kerala to automate the system and process of over 15,000 schools in the state. Sampoorna is implemented by IT@School Project using the free and opensource school erp Fedena 
Metopoceras canroberti is a moth of the family Noctuidae. It is found in Morocco, Yemen, Algeria and eastern Africa. 
In 1863, he married Virginia Barlocci, herself a painter and ceramist, widow of the painter Bernardino Riccardi, and by September of the same year he was appointed academic of merit in the Accademia di San Luca. 
In 1865, he completed frescoes for the church of Santa Maria in Aquiro, during its restoration by G. Morichini between 1861 and 1866. Here he painted three octagons with angels in the ceiling, with evangelists and angels on the pendents. He also painted the four Doctors of the Church on pillars of the nave and the Eternal Father on a gold background in the dome. 
In 1878, he won a contest to paint the main Hall of the Finance Ministry, where he depicted an allegory of the Unity of Italy with Illustrious Men of Past and Present. He lost a competition to Maccari to paint the So-called Yellow Hall of the Senate; Maccari went on to paint his masterpiece Cicero Denounces Catiline. 
From 1888 to 1890 he was president of the Accademia di San Luca. The last official task of the artist was to participate in 1896 in the juried competition, "Per una memoria sulla tecnica dei dipinti", launched by the Ministry of Education public, replacing Francesco Jacovacci. He was reduced to inactivity in 1898, the same year of the death of his wife, and died in Rome on February 21, 1901. 
The municipalities of Bellingwedde and Vlagtwedde have merged into the new municipality of Westerwolde on 1 January 2018. The municipality continues to use both municipal halls in Sellingen and Wedde. 
On 22 November 2017, municipal elections were held to elect the members of the municipal council of Westerwolde. The result is shown in the table below. The municipal council will have 19 seats, because the population size was just under 25,000 in 2017. 
In basketball, an official (usually called a referee) enforces the rules and maintains order in the game. The title of official also applies to the scorers and timekeepers, as well as other personnel that have an active task in maintaining the game. Basketball is regarded as among the most difficult sports to officiate due to the  speed of play, complexity of rules, the case-specific interpretations of rules, and the instantaneous decision required. 
There is one lead referee and one or two umpires, depending on whether there is a two- or three-person crew. In the NBA, the lead official is called the crew chief with one referee and one umpire. In FIBA-sanctioned play, two-man crews consist of a referee and an umpire, and three-man crews contain a referee and two umpires.  
Regardless, both classes of officials have equal rights to control almost all aspects of the game. In most cases, the lead official (in FIBA, the referee) performs the jump ball to begin the contest, though NFHS and NCAA have allowed the referee to designate which official (referee or umpire) shall perform the jump ball. 
In American high school and college basketball, officials wear black-and-white-striped shirts with black side panels, black pants, and black shoes. Some state high school associations allow officials to wear grey shirts with black pin-stripes instead of black-and-white-striped shirts.  
All officials wear a whistle that is used to stop play as a result of a foul or a violation on the court. Hand signals are used to indicate the nature of the infraction or to administer the game. 
In higher levels of college and professional basketball, officials wear a timing device on the belt-line called PTS (Precision Timing System). The device is used by on-court officials to start and stop the game clock in a timely manner, rather than waiting for the scoreboard operator (timekeeper) to do so. 
There are two standard methods for officiating a basketball game, either "two-person" or "three-person" mechanics depending on how many officials are available to work the game. 
Despite the misconception that basketball is a non-contact sport, officials often let a large amount of marginal or incidental contact pass uncalled. An official must always be aware of not just what is happening around the ball, but the roughness of play going on around the whole court, adding to the job of the official. 
Further complicating the job of an official is the proximity to the crowds. Unlike football or baseball, the crowd is nearly always located within a few feet of the official, as are coaches and other players on the bench. To combat this, officials are able to remove a fan from the arena with an ejection. 
When a violation occurs, game action is immediately stopped. These include traveling, illegal dribbles, out-of-bounds, and other violations. The official is required to blow the whistle and immediately stop play and award the ball over to the opposing team which allows for fair play in the game. Along with those, you can have contact fouls in game that if called will result in the opponent getting two shots from the free throw line. 
Fresno Slough is a distributary of the Kings River that connects the North Fork Kings River to the San Joaquin River in San Joaquin Valley, Kings County, California. 
Until 1879 when irrigation diversions prevented it, Fresno Slough was also an outlet of the overflow waters of Tulare Lake into the San Joaquin River in flood years, when its level topped the 210 foot elevation. 
Mendota Dam located at the confluence of the San Joaquin River and Fresno Slough delivers water to the south from Mendota Pool during the irrigation season, and delivers water to Mendota Pool and the San Joaquin River from the Kings River when the Kings River is flooding.  Mendota Dam and Mendota Pool have been used for irrigation diversions since the late 1800s. 
In the sense of a deformity, it is the pathological curving of the spine, where parts of the spinal column lose some or all of their lordotic profile. This causes a bowing of the back, seen as a slouching posture. Kyphosis is distinguished from scoliosis, a condition in which the spine has a sideways curve. 
Kyphosis can be graded in severity by the Cobb angle. Also, sagittal balance can be measured. The sagittal balance is the horizontal distance between the center of C7 and the superior-posterior border of the endplate of S1 on a lateral radiograph. 
The Milwaukee brace is one particular body brace that is often used to treat kyphosis in the US. Modern CAD/CAM braces are used in Europe to treat different types of kyphosis. These are much easier to wear and have better in-brace corrections than reported for the Milwaukee brace. Since there are different curve patterns (thoracic, thoracolumbar, and lumbar), different types of brace are in use, with different advantages and disadvantages. 
Modern brace for the treatment of a thoracic kyphosis. The brace is constructed using a CAD/CAM device. 
Modern brace for the treatment of lumbar or thoracolumbar kyphosis. The brace is constructed using a CAD/CAM device. Restoration of the lumbar lordosis is the main aim. 
In Germany, a standard treatment for both Scheuermann's disease and lumbar kyphosis is the Schroth method, a system of physical therapy for scoliosis and related spinal deformities. It involves lying supine, placing a pillow under the scapular region and posteriorly stretching the cervical spine. In China, many people use spinal care mattresses to correct kyphosis while sleeping.[citation needed] 
Surgical treatment can be used in severe cases. In patients with progressive kyphotic deformity due to vertebral collapse, a procedure called a kyphoplasty may arrest the deformity and relieve the pain. Kyphoplasty is a minimally invasive procedure, requiring only a small opening in the skin. The main goal is to return the damaged vertebra as close as possible to its original height. 
This article about a railway station in the Indian state of Haryana is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The collision and fire claimed the lives of 26 of the Empress's crew members, and one crew member on the Captain. The remaining crew from both ships were taken to Tobago for medical treatment, while the Empress's captain was transported to a hospital in Texas, having inhaled fire. 
The operating point is a specific point within the operation characteristic of a technical device. This point will be engaged because of the properties of the system and the outside influences and parameters.  In electronic engineering establishing an operating point is called biasing. 
The operating point of a system is the intersection point of the torque-speed curve of drive and machine. Both devices are linked with a shaft so the speed is always identical. The drive creates the torque which rotates both devices. The machine creates the counter-torque, e.g. by being a moved device which needs permanent energy or a wheel turning against the static friction of the track. 
At the operating point, the driving torque and the counter-torque are balanced, so the speed does not change anymore. 
A change in speed out of this stable operating point is only possible with a new control intervention. This can be changing the load of the machine or the power of the drive which both changes the torque because it is a change in the characteristic curves. The drive-machine system then runs to a new operating point with a different speed and a different balance of torques. 
Should the drive torque be higher than the counter torque at any time then the system does not have an operating point. The result will be that the speed increases up to the idle speed or even until destruction. Should the counter torque be higher at any times the speed will decrease until the system stops. 
In an electronic amplifier, an operating point is a combination of current and voltage at "no signal" conditions; application of a signal to the stage - changes voltage and current in the stage. The operating point in an amplifier is set by the intersection of the load line with the non-linear characteristics of the device.  By adjusting the bias on the stage, an operating point can be selected that maximizes the signal output of the stage and minimizes distortion. 
There are three SCUT campuses, both located in Guangzhou: Wushan Campus (or North Campus), University Town Campus (or South Campus, HEMC Campus) and Guangzhou International Campus (GZIC). The headquarters of the university are on the Wushan Campus. 
Of SCUT's 32 schools, 17 are located on the Wushan Campus, 11 on the University Town Campus, and 4 on the GZIC. 
This campus was formerly part of the National Sun Yat-sen University campus, and many buildings remain from that time. 
Malankara Syrian Orthodox Seminary is a theological seminary for the Jacobite Syrian Christian Church at Mulanthuruthy, Ernakulam in India. Opened in 1990, the seminary buildings are clustered on Udayagiri hill in the village of Vettickal. 
This article on an Oriental Orthodox place of worship in India is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article related to members of the muscomomoph flies superfamily Lauxanioidea is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Mary Maples was born on April 6, 1931, in Sturgeon Bay, Wisconsin to Eva Moore Maples and Frederic Maples who owned a clothing store.  She was the second of four children and the only daughter.  While in Wisconsin she attended a two-room school house.  Her father joined the Army during World War II where he remained as an officer after the war, retiring as a Colonel As a result the family was stationed in multiple bases around the United States and China. 
Pennyhill (also known as Penny Hill) is an unincorporated community in New Castle County, Delaware, United States. Pennyhill is located north of U.S. Route 13 Business and west of Delaware Route 3 northeast of Wilmington. Delaware State Police Troop 1 is located in Pennyhill. 
Pennyhill is more commonly known as Ridgewood, consisting of Ridgewood Circle and the adjacent Lynn streets. 
Nowadays, Yi surname ranks 106th among other family surnames in mainland China with members up to more than 1.7 million, making 0.12% of total Chinese population.[citation needed] A 2013 study found that it was the 114th most-common name, shared by 1.75 million people, or 0.130% of the population, with the largest province being Hunan. 
The Tipsport Hockey Cup is the national ice hockey cup competition in the Czech Republic. It was first played as the Zepter Hockey Cup in 2000. 
The town is the administrative centre of the eponymous Tryavna Municipality. As of December 2009, it has a population of 9,831 inhabitants. 
The unique Museum of Asian and African Art is housed in the old public bath, on the riverside. Tryavna is proud with its great samples of the woodcarving, icon painting and original architecture. 
Today the town is a preferred tourist spot, featuring modern hotels, private lodgings and villas, restaurants and taverns. 
There is also an Art school where successors of the old icon painters and woodcarvers master these crafts. 
The Voneshta voda village resort, famous for its healing mineral springs, is located 20 kilometres (12 miles) away from Tryavna. The Bulgarka Nature Park is located in the Starina Planina, south on the city. 
The town is well connected with the whole country thanks to its excellent road network and railway station. 
Besides Bulgarian National Revival figures, another native is former Bulgarian NBA player Georgi Glouchkov. 
Since 2011 Tryavna is a member of the Douzelage, a unique town twinning association of 27 towns across the European Union. 
Government College, Rhenock offers the Bachelor of Arts honours and general in the following subjects: 
1) Sociology 2) Environmental science 3) Economics 4) Political science 5) Education 6) Geography 7) History 8) Nepali 9) English 
Government College, Rhenock also offers spoken English course to the students to help them to improve their English language skills. 
In the Bachelor of Arts course, which is spread over three years, English is offered as compulsory subject in the 1st semester, MIL is offered as compulsory subject in 2nd semester, environmental studies is offered as compulsory subject in 3rd semester, Eastern Himalayan Studies- 1 and 2 respectively as compulsory subjects in the 4th and 5th semester. 
For B.A (honors) and Science admission, candidates must have secured 50% of marks in the subject opted at honors degree and 50% of marks in aggregate in their higher secondary examination. For the general course, candidates must have cleared their class 12 examination from either WBCHS/CBSE/ISC/SSC. Admissions of students to these courses are done purely on merit basis based on the scores of qualifying examination. 
Cymothoe lucasii, the fiery yellow glider, is a butterfly in the family Nymphalidae. It is found in Nigeria, Cameroon, Equatorial Guinea, Gabon, the Republic of the Congo, the Central African Republic and the Democratic Republic of the Congo. The habitat consists of forests. 
John O'Connell (born November 13, 1959) is an American television director. He has worked in Dramatic and Music multi-camera television production for over 20 years. 
Oskar Saville is the former lead singer of Chicago-based Rubygrass, and is also a solo artist. She served as lead vocalist for 10,000 Maniacs from 2002 to 2007, and is now a "transformational energy coach" and psychic. She believes, "You were born with two things: belly button and your awesomeness."  
The origins of the festival were in the 1950s, spawned from the relationship between the artists resident in Darlington and the local voluntary community fire brigade. 
It has been claimed to be one of the longest lasting community festivals in Perth, Western Australia. 
The festival includes an art exhibition in the local historic Darlington Hall and a fair on the adjacent cricket oval.  The art exhibition has been the showcase of many new artists over the decades - from Darlington and elsewhere. 
Many posters, promotional items and catalogues reflect the nature of the community, as well as showcasing some more notable artists and their legacies. 
Committee membership evolves with the community changes, however one of the longest serving members was Sally Herzfeld. In 2020 a history was published, by the Darlington History Group and written by Trea Wiltshire, editor of the Darlington Review. 
The 2020 text concentrated on notable public figures, artists and writers associated with Darlington over time including: 
This biographical article relating to Hungarian rowing is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In 2004, with support from the Swiss Foundation for Technical Cooperation and a patient capital loan from the International Finance Corporation, Honey Care expanded its operations beyond the borders of Kenya and successfully replicated its model in Tanzania.  It has been working since 2013 in South Sudan. 
From its inception, Honey Care Africa had an explicit triple bottom-line agenda, with an emphasis on generating economic, social, and environmental value simultaneously through its activities. 
In many ways, Honey Care was set up as an experiment in trying to challenge and redefine the traditional role of the private sector in development and to radically reconfigure the dynamics between the private sector, the development sector, and rural communities. This led to the evolution of Honey Care's "Tripartite Model," which seeks to develop a synergistic "win-win-win" partnership between these three key actors by drawing on the core competencies of each. 
Honey Care Africa and its founders have received numerous international awards for their work, including: 
Honey Care Africa has been featured on numerous occasions in the press and media including in the BBC, the Chicago Tribune, The Globe and Mail, Financial Times, CNBC Europe, CBC, UN Radio, Daily Nation, and East African Standard. It has been discussed in a number of academic journals, including the Stanford Social Innovation Review and the MIT Sloan Management Review, and has been featured in several books and other published academic works. 
The degree is often conferred as a way of honouring a distinguished visitor's contributions to a specific field or to society in general. 
The practice dates back to the Middle Ages, when for various reasons a university might be persuaded, or otherwise see fit, to grant exemption from some or all of the usual statutory requirements for the award of a degree. The earliest honorary degree on record was awarded to Lionel Woodville in the late 1470s by the University of Oxford. He later became Bishop of Salisbury. 
In the late 16th century, the granting of honorary degrees became quite common, especially on the occasion of royal visits to Oxford or Cambridge. On the visit of James I to Oxford in 1605, for example, forty-three members of his retinue (fifteen of whom were earls or barons) received the degree of Master of Arts, and the Register of Convocation explicitly states that these were full degrees, carrying the usual privileges (such as voting rights in Convocation and Congregation). 
There were also some special cases: for example the critic John Ruskin suffered some kind of physical or mental breakdown in 1840 and dropped out of the University of Oxford. He returned to Oxford in 1842, and sat a single exam, and was awarded an honorary fourth-class degree. 
Some universities, seeking to differentiate between substantive and honorary doctorates, have a degree (often DUniv, or Doctor of the University) which is used for these purposes, with the other higher doctorates reserved for formally examined academic scholarship. 
The Archbishop of Canterbury has the authority to award degrees. These "Lambeth degrees" are sometimes, erroneously, thought to be honorary; however the archbishops have for many centuries had the legal authority (originally as the representatives of the Pope, later confirmed by a 1533 Act of Henry VIII), to award degrees and regularly do so to people who have either passed an examination or are deemed to have satisfied the appropriate requirements. 
The recipient of an honorary degree may add the degree title postnominally, but it should[citation needed] always be made clear that the degree is honorary by adding "honorary" or "honoris causa" or "h.c." in parentheses after the degree title. In some countries, a person who holds an honorary doctorate may use the title "Doctor" prenominally, abbreviated "Dr.h.c." or "Dr.(h.c.)". Sometimes, they use "Hon" before the degree letters, for example, "Hon DMus". 
Most[citation needed] American universities award the degrees of LLD (Doctor of Laws), LittD (Doctor of Letters), LHD (Doctor of Humane Letters), ScD (Doctor of Science), PedD (Doctor of Pedagogy) and DD (Doctor of Divinity) only as honorary degrees. American universities do not have the system of "higher doctorates" used in the UK and some other universities around the world. 
These ad eundem or jure officii degrees are earned degrees, not honorary, because they recognize formal learning. 
Similarly, a jure dignitatis degree is awarded to someone who has demonstrated eminence and scholarship by being appointed to a particular office. Thus, for example, a DD (Doctor of Divinity) might be conferred upon a bishop on the occasion of his consecration, or a judge created LLD (Legum Doctor) or DCL (Doctor of Civil Law) upon his or her appointment to the judicial bench. These, also, are properly considered substantive rather than honorary degrees. 
The Stanford Alumni Association occasionally awards the Degree of Uncommon Man/Woman to individuals who have given "rare and exceptional service" to the university. Though UCLA has imposed a moratorium on awarding honorary degrees, it honors notable people with the UCLA Medal instead. St. John's College has not granted honorary degrees since 1936, but its alumni association occasionally offers honorary membership to retiring faculty, staff, and other close associates of the college. 
In 1985, as a deliberate snub, the University of Oxford voted to refuse Margaret Thatcher an honorary degree in protest against her cuts in funding for higher education. This award had previously been given to all prime ministers who had been educated at Oxford. 
Few people object when an honorary degree is awarded in a field for which the honorand is noted. McGill University's decision to grant musician Joni Mitchell an honorary Doctor of Music in 2004 was unopposed, although it was timed to coincide with a symposium about Mitchell's career. 
In 2005 at the University of Western Ontario, Henry Morgentaler, a gynecologist involved in a legal case decriminalizing abortion in Canada (R. v. Morgentaler), was made an honorary Doctor of Laws. Over 12,000 signatures were acquired asking the UWO to reverse its decision to honor Morgentaler. Several protest rallies were held, including one on the day the honorary degree was bestowed (a counter petition to support Morgentaler's degree gained 10,000 signatures). 
In April 2009, Arizona State University's President Michael M. Crow refused to give an honorary degree to US President Barack Obama for his lack of adequate qualifying achievements thus far. Also, controversy was ignited about Notre Dame awarding Obama an honorary degree, as the institution is Roman Catholic and Obama holds pro-choice views on abortion and supports embryonic stem cell research. 
In February 2012, Rosmah Mansor, the wife of the Prime Minister of Malaysia, Najib Razak was controversially awarded an honorary doctorate by the Curtin University for "services to childhood education". The university honored Rosmah for founding and driving the Permata early childhood centres in Malaysia although some alumni and students contended that the government-funded centres are "an abuse of taxpayers' money." 
Over 50 honorary degrees awarded to Bill Cosby have been rescinded due to allegations and lawsuits of sexual assault.[citation needed] 
By convention, recipients of honorary doctorates do not use the title "Dr" in general correspondence, although in formal correspondence from the university issuing the honorary degree it is normal to address the recipient by the title, at least in the United States. However, this social convention is not always scrupulously observed. Notable people who have used the honorary prefix include: 
Sherine O. Obare is the Dean of the Joint School of Nanoscience and Nanoengineering at the University of North Carolina at Greensboro and North Carolina Agricultural and Technical State University. She works on nanomaterials for sensing and drug delivery. 
Obare was appointed Associate Dean at Western Michigan University in 2015. She was responsible for research, education, diversity and global engagement across the university. She believes that early authentic research is essential for underrepresented groups to gain rational view of the world. From 2017 Obare served as Associate Vice President for Research at Western Michigan University. 
Obare is an associate editor for the Journal of Nanomaterials. She moved to the University of North Carolina at Greensboro as Dean of the Joint School of Nanoscience and Nanoengineering. Obare chairs the American Chemical Society Award for Incorporation of Sustainability into the Curriculum. 
The women's 200 metres event at the 2014 World Junior Championships in Athletics was held in Eugene, Oregon, USA, at Hayward Field on 24 and 25 July. 
This article about a specific bridge or group of bridges in China is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Adelina Chilica is an Angolan politician for the MPLA and a member of the National Assembly of Angola. 
This article about a National Action Party politician born in the 1960s who served in the Chamber of Deputies is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Presidential elections were held in Bolivia on 4 May 1913, electing a new President of the Republic. 
Burji La (or Burji Pass) is a natural pass in the Karakoram mountains between Skardu and Deosai National Park in Gilgit Baltistan, Pakistan. Its elevation is 5000 meters. It is famous especially for its beautiful panoramic view of many mountain peaks, including that of K2, Nanga Parbat, Masherbrum, Chogolisa, Laila Peak, Golden Peak, Gasherbrum I, Gasherbrum II, Gasherbrum IV and a part of Broad Peak mountain. 
In February 1947 alone, police arrested thousands of rape case protesters. The government of the Republic of China's action alienated students and intellectuals and pushed them closer to the communists, who played a leading role in the protests. 
William Gaither Pierson died in 2001 and is buried at Temple Sinai Cemetery in Sumter, South Carolina. 
The Holstein Cup is a Group 3 flat horse race in Germany open to thoroughbreds aged three years or older. It is run at Hamburg-Horn over a distance of 2,000 metres (about 10 furlongs), and it is scheduled to take place each year in July. 
The race was first run in 2013, as the Hamburg Trophy, a name previously used for the 1200m race at the same meeting, now known as the Flieger Trophy. It was later run as the Holstein Cup before the current title was adopted in 2018. 
Tikela Kemone (born 1950) is a Cameroonian politician. He was Deputy Minister of Finance and Secretary of State for Finance during the 1980s; currently he is a Technical Adviser at the Presidency of the Republic, heading the Internal Affairs Department. 
An insufficient level of rainfall in 1990 led Kemone to warn of potential food shortages that could affect 600,000 people in Far North Province. He remained in the government until 1992 and was subsequently an Adviser at the Presidency. He served as Technical Adviser heading the Presidency's Special Affairs Department for a time and currently heads the Internal Affairs Department. 
The 2003 Paradise Jam Tournament was a men's and women's preseason college basketball tournament that took place in Saint Thomas at the Sports and Fitness Center. Boston College won the men's division while Virginia Tech won the women's St. Thomas Division championship game and Southwest Missouri State won the women's St. John Division. 
Six teams participated in the men's tournament. The teams were arranged into two divisions of three teams each. The three teams in each division played a round-robin over the first three days, with each team having one day off. The teams were seeded, and all six teams played on the final day, with a Championship Game, a game for third place and a game for fifth place. 
In the second round, Hampton faced La Salle. Hampton lead at halftime, and extended the lead to ten points, but the Explorers cut the lead, and it took four free throws by the Pirates in the final 21 seconds to preserve the win. 
In 2003, eight teams competed in the tournament organized into two divisions. The teams in the St. Thomas division played a traditional playoff option, with a pair of games on the 28th; on the 29th the winners played each other and the losers played each other. The teams in the St. John's division played a round-robin, with one game each on the 27th, 28th and 29 November. 
Carrie Mason of Virginia Tech was awarded the MVP for the St. Thomas division. The other five all-stars were Tiania Burns (Mississippi  State), Jenny DeMuth (Indiana), Lisa Kriener (Iowa State), Ieva Kublina (Virginia Tech), and Tan White (Mississippi  State). 
Kari Koch of Southwest Missouri State was named the MVP of the division. The other all-stars included Kate Bulger (West Virginia), Lesley Dickinson (James Madison), Jenni Lingor (SMS), Alex Stewart (Georgia Tech), and Fallon Stokes (Georgia Tech). 
On his release Davies resumed his career in acting almost immediately, starring in an ex-prisoner of war show, Back Home, which was hosted at the Stoll Theatre, London. In 1959, he played the role of the Colonel in Alun Owen's The Rough and Ready Lot when it received its stage debut on 1 June 1959 in a production by the 59 Theatre Company at the Lyric Opera House, Hammersmith, as well as in the television adaptation which was broadcast that September. 
He was the subject of This Is Your Life in October 1962 when he was surprised by Eamonn Andrews in central London. 
Davies also played supporting roles in many films, appearing briefly as George Smiley in The Spy Who Came In from the Cold (1965). He also appeared in several horror films in the late 1960s, including Witchfinder General (1968) and Dracula Has Risen from the Grave (1968), as well as such international films as Waterloo (1970) and Zeppelin (1971). 
He died of cancer in London in 1976, leaving a wife, Jessica, and two sons, Timothy and Hoagan. Davies is buried at Pistyll Cemetery, near Nefyn, Gwynedd, Wales. 
The World Peace Congress was instituted in Salt Lake City, Utah, in 2007. The first Congress was held in Salt Lake City, the United States from August 24 to 26, 2007. Participants, including social activists, scholars, artists, politicians, and lay people, gathered together to discuss ways for the realization of world peace and drafted the Congress 2007 Resolutions as the basis for the future quest for peace. 
The Second Congress was held in Bangalore, India from February 27 to March 1, 2009. It sought to build upon the Resolutions of Congress 2007 and, in particular, to devise peace-oriented grassroots projects worldwide. 
The Third Congress was held in Thailand from July 9 to 11, 2010. Panelists participated in further discussions about the quest for world peace and, collectively, constructed the Congress 2010 Resolutions. 
The World Peace Congress held a three-day Medicine Workshop from June 2 to 4, 2012 in Thailand. The workshop's purpose was to educate the public in non-allopathic methods of healing. The workshop was facilitated by Morkeaw (Jaipetch Klajon), a natural medicine practitioner, and was attended by 130 participants. 
Participants of the World Peace Congress assembled in Salt Lake City, Utah in August 2007, and formulated Resolutions for a global action plan to ensure world peace. These Resolutions derived from the labors of twelve panels covering varied topics such as gender, culture, kinship /community, et al. 
The Congress 2012 Resolutions followed the lead established by the 2007 Resolutions: however, they proposed even more detailed action plans geared towards world peace. These Resolutions, produced in similar fashion to the 2007 Resolutions, were submitted by 10 panels with different themes, with one panel specifically focused on the then extant Thai Crisis. 
Two notable heraldic features started appearing in English churches during the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries. One of these was the funerary hatchment, which was basically a coat of arms displayed on either a black or a black and white lozenge, and commemorated a notable local person. 
The other was a representation of the Royal Arms, a feature of Anglican churches, representing the monarch's role as head of the Church of England. The arms has been made in several different forms. It has been done as a painting, as an embroidery, or as a relief made out of wood, stone or iron. 
The usage of the Royal Arms in English churches originated in the mediaeval period, in places associated with the English monarchy. A classic surviving example is the arms of Henry VI in King's College Chapel, Cambridge. 
Mary I, as a Roman Catholic, ordered the Royal Arms to be removed from churches and kept hidden away, but the features were brought back and improved under her successor, Elizabeth I. Oliver Cromwell was the only other ruler who discouraged the use of the Royal Arms. 
The usage of the Royal Arms in English churches started to decline in the 1830s, owing to the Victorian fashion for "Christianisation", and as a consequence, few English churches built from Victorian times onwards use the arms. 
The usage of tracery, buttresses with carved pinnacles, tiled roofs and glazing formed one feature of church architecture in the Victorian era, while a deep chancel, with an arch and crucifix, formed another. Although this was not unusual for Roman Catholic churches, it seemed alien to the Church of England, but was nevertheless adopted. 
During this time, individual architects began to make their influence felt on the churches they built in England. One of the earliest was Augustus Pugin, who designed Roman Catholic churches; however, few of his works are appreciated today except for St Giles' Church at Cheadle in Staffordshire. 
Architects of the mid-Victorian era who brought the Gothic style to perfection, both in church interiors and church exteriors, included William Butterfield and George Gilbert Scott. Two notable churches by the respective architects are the church of All Saints, Margaret Street in London and All Souls Church in Halifax, West Yorkshire. 
The later Victorian era saw the influence of the Arts and Crafts movement, and the churches of this period returned to the less flamboyant styles of the early nineteenth century. The finest churches were often funded by private individuals. Notable architects of this time included George Frederick Bodley, whose most distinguished design is St Mary's Church at Eccleston in Cheshire, and Richard Norman Shaw, whose masterpiece is the Church of St Michael and All Angels in Bedford Park, London. 
New churches continued to be built in the 20th century in the modernist and later Brutalist styles. Two main drivers were the reconstruction or replacement of churches bombed in World War II, and the New Towns movement. Notable C20 church architects include Giles Gilbert Scott, Basil Spence, Nugent Cachemaille-Day, Robert Maguire & Keith Murray and Brett, Boyd and Bosanquet. 
Concruso Nacional de Belleza 1975 was held on April 26, 1975. There were 28 candidates who competed for the national crown. The winner represented the Dominican Republic at the Miss Universe 1975 . Second place was crowned as the Virreina al Miss Mundo, representing the Dominican Republic at Miss World 1975. 
HUH endonucleases are broadly split into two categories of enzymes: replication initiator proteins (Rep) or relaxase / mobilization proteins. They both contain small protein domains that recognize sequence-specific origins of replication  or origin of transfer at which site they nick DNA. The nicking domain of Reps tend to be smaller, on the order of 10-20 kDa while nicking domains from relaxases are larger, roughly 20-40 kDa in size. 
"Guns for Hands" is a song written and recorded by American musical duo Twenty One Pilots, released as a single only in Japan. The song was originally recorded for their second self-released album, Regional at Best. It was re-recorded for their third album Vessel, their 2012 Three Songs EP, and their 2013 EP, Migraine. The video was directed by Mark C. Eshleman. The song experienced some success in Japan, and reached number 21 on their Hot 100 chart. 
This biographical article relating to People's Republic of China athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
James Paul Lake (born December 17, 1976) is an American football coach. He is the head football coach at the University of Washington, a position he has held since the 2020 season. Lake has coached at both the National Football League (NFL) and college football levels, primarily overseeing defensive backs. He is currently on suspension. 
A military brat, Lake was born in Walnut Creek, California; his father served in the U.S. Air Force and the family lived in various locations, including overseas tours in Turkey and the Philippines. He attended North Central High School in Spokane, Washington, was a three-sport letterman for the Indians (football, basketball, and baseball), and was recognized as a scholar-athlete. 
Lake played college football for Eastern Washington University in nearby Cheney as a strong safety from 1995 to 1998, where he was an honorable-mention All-Big Sky recipient, team captain, and named to the All-Big Sky Conference Academic Team. After graduating from Eastern Washington in 1999, Lake worked as graduate assistant there during the spring before taking a full time job with the Spokane Indians, a minor league baseball team, where he worked in ticket sales. 
Lake returned to Tampa Bay for the 2010 and 2011 seasons as defensive backs coach under Raheem Morris, who had replaced Gruden as head coach in 2009. 
Lake joined the Washington Huskies staff in 2014 as a defensive backs coach under head coach Chris Petersen. This was his second stint at the school after serving one year under Keith Gilbertson in 2004. In 2016, he was promoted to co-defensive coordinator. On December 2, 2019, Petersen announced he would step down as Washington's head coach at the end of the 2019 season and Lake would be his successor. 
The commune has been awarded one flower by the National Council of Towns and Villages in Bloom in the Competition of cities and villages in Bloom. 
The commune has a rich environment in terms of Wilderness and ecological potential but industrialization has left traces: in particular the disused Pechiney Aluminium Smelter (closed in 2003) left heavy environmental consequences. 
The smelter was ranked 2 under Directive 96/82/EC (Seveso). The plant had an internal landfill site of 1.8 hectares located several kilometres from the smelter site at a place called Massada on the border with Vicdessos commune. This discharge area, as well as the groundwater and soil that supported the plant operations, are polluted by various pollutants including fluorides, cyanides, hydrocarbons, arsenic, aluminium, and barium. 
Virgilio Barco Isakson (born 1965) is a Colombian economist and political scientist. Barco Isakson is currently Latin America Director at Acumen, a leading impact investing fund that focuses on tackling global poverty. 
Barco Isakson holds a Bachelor of Arts in government from Harvard University (1987), a Master of Science in management from the Massachusetts Institute of Technology, and a Master of Arts in economics from New York University. During his freshman year of college, he lived in Thayer Hall with Eric Prenowitz. 
This biography of an activist for lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender rights is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This is a list of listed buildings in the civil parish of Troqueer in Dumfries and Galloway, Scotland. 
The gens Apronia was a plebeian family at ancient Rome throughout the history of the Republic and into imperial times.  The first member of the gens to achieve prominence was Gaius Apronius, tribune of the plebs in 449 BC.  None of the Apronii obtained the consulship until the first century AD. 
The only cognomen associated with the Apronii is Caesianus, which is probably derived from the nomen of the gens Caesia, and may indicate descent from the Caesii through the female line. 
This biographical article relating to Australian athletics is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This article about a Paralympic medalist of Australia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article relating to a Japanese baseball outfielder is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Genesis, stylized as GENESIS, is a series of Super Smash Bros. tournaments occurring in the San Francisco Bay Area of the United States state of California. The first Genesis tournament took place in 2009 in Antioch at the Contra Costa County Fairgrounds. 
Alongside EVO, The Big House, and Pound, the GENESIS series is considered to be one of the most prestigious Super Smash Bros. tournament series. 
GENESIS 4 was announced to be on January 20, 2017. This tournament was organized by Boback, Dr. Z, and Germ from DBR. The tournament kept the same lineup of games as it did in GENESIS 3 and was hosted at the same venues. 
It was again won by Adam "Armada" Lindgren over Joseph "Mango" Marquez, with the grand finals being a repeat of the previous two tournaments. Wii U was won by Gonzalo "ZeRo" Barrios over Samuel "Dabuz" Buzby. Smash 64 was won by Japanese player wario, who was able to attend the tournament from a crowd fund. 
Also through a fundraiser, a $500 "Bobby Scar Award" was awarded to fifth place; it was named after the Smasher and commentator Scar, who made a run at the first GENESIS, placing 6th. It was given to SFAT after PPMD said he didn't have motivation playing more. 
In crew battles, team Hungrybox won the Smash Draft crew battles and Japan beat SoCal to take the regional crew battles. 
GENESIS 4 took place on January 20 to January 22, 2017 in San Jose, California and used the same venues as GENESIS 3. Nintendo was once again a sponsor of the tournament, along with HTC, Nvidia, Controller Chaos, Twitch, Red Bull, and many other sponsors. Like last year, tournament organizers announced the top 64 Melee players at the event would automatically be in the second round of the tournament, sparking backlash from top players such as Leffen and Armada. 
In crews, team Silent Wolf defeated Team Hungrybox in Melee Draft Crews and Team USA defeated Team Japan in Wii U World Crews. 
Melee doubles was won by brothers Armada and Android over Leffen and Ice. Wii U doubles was won by Ally and MKLeo over the Japanese duo Ranai and Komorikiri. Lastly, Smash 64 doubles won by defending champions JaimeHR and SuPeRbOoMfAn over last year's runners-up tacos and The Z. 
In Wii U singles, Mexican Smash player MKLeo defeated Ally to win GENESIS 4 and Peruvian Alvin defeated favorite SuPeRbOoMfAn in Smash 64 singles. 
GENESIS 5 was announced on July 16, 2017. It was held from January 19, 2018 to January 21, 2018. After two events in San Jose, the tournament organizers moved to Oakland and the event was held at the Oakland Convention Center, which is attached to the Oakland City Center Marriott hotel. Sunday matches were held in the Paramount Theater. 
SuPeRbOoMfAn placed himself at the top once again in Smash 64 after defeating the defending champion Alvin in a close grand finals after Alvin dominated the Canadian in the first set of grand finals. MKLeo defeated the dark horse Mistake from Canada to defend his GENESIS title. 
The Melee singles for GENESIS was a historical one for the Smash scene. HugS became the first ever Samus main to reach top eight at a super major. In addition, Plup won GENESIS 5 after defeating Hungrybox in the grand finals, making him just the second non-God to defeat all five Gods and win a super major. This meant that the GENESIS saga between Armada and Mango in the grand finals came to an end, after Armada placed 4th and Mango placed 5th. 
Ever since Smash 64's Genesis debut at Genesis 2, no American had won the singles event and that trend continued as k y s k defeated Josh Brody in a close series that went all five games. k y s k would also go on to win the doubles event with his partner Prince. 
The news media or news industry are forms of mass media that focus on delivering news to the general public or a target public. These include print media (newspapers, newsmagazines), broadcast news (radio and television), and the Internet (online newspapers, news blogs, news videos, live news streaming, etc.). 
During the 1920s, radio became a news medium, and was a significant source of breaking news. Although, during World War I, radio broadcasts in America were only given information about Allied victories because Great Britain had a monopoly on the transatlantic radio lines. For the newspapers, the government suppressed any radical or German papers during and after the war. 
Television news continued to expand during the 1970s, and by 1990, more than half of American homes had cable systems and nationally oriented newspapers expanded their reach. With technological advancements in the newsroom, notably the Internet, a new emphasis on computer-assisted reporting and a new blending of media forms emerged, with one reporter preparing the same story in print, online, and on camera for a newspaper's cable station. 
Broadcasting is the distribution of audio and video signals (programs) to a number of recipients ("listeners" or "viewers") that belong to a large group.  This group may be the public in general, or a relatively large audience within the public.  Thus, an Internet channel may distribute text or music worldwide, while a public address system in (for example) a workplace may broadcast very limited ad hoc soundbites to a small population within its range. 
Television and radio programs are distributed through radio broadcasting or cable, often simultaneously.  By coding signals and having decoding equipment in homes, the latter also enables subscription-based channels and pay-per-view services. 
A broadcasting organization may broadcast several programs at the same time, through several channels (frequencies), for example BBC One and Two. On the other hand, two or more organizations may share a channel and each use it during a fixed part of the day. Digital radio and digital television may also transmit multiplexed programming, with several channels compressed into one ensemble. 
In a broadcast system (television), journalists or reporters are also involved with editing the video material that has been shot alongside their research, and in working on the visual narrative of the story. Broadcast journalists often make an appearance in the news story at the beginning or end of the video clip. 
In television or broadcast journalism, news analysts (also called news-casters or news anchors) examine, interpret, and broadcast news received from various sources of information. Anchors present this as news, either videotaped or live, through transmissions from on-the-scene reporters (news correspondents). 
News films ("clips") can vary in length; there are some which may be as long as ten minutes, others that need to fit in all the relevant information and material in two or three minutes. News channels these days have also begun to host special documentary films that stretch for much longer durations and are able to explore a news subject or issue in greater detail. 
The desk persons categorise news stories with various formats according to the merit of the story. Such formats include AVO, AVO Byte, Pkg, VO SOT, VOX POP, and Ancho Visual. 
A newspaper is a lightweight and disposable publication (more specifically, a periodical), usually printed on low-cost paper called newsprint. It may be general or of special interest, and may be published daily, weekly, biweekly, monthly, bimonthly, or quarterly. 
General-interest newspapers are usually journals of current news on a variety of topics. Those can include political events, crime, business, sports, and opinions (either editorials, columns, or political cartoons). Many also include weather news and forecasts. Newspapers increasingly use photographs to illustrate stories; they also often include comic strips and other entertainment, such as crosswords. 
A story is a single article, news item or feature, usually concerning a single event, issue, theme, or profile of a person. Correspondents report news occurring in the main, locally, from their own country, or from foreign cities where they are stationed. 
A newsmagazine, sometimes called news magazine, is a usually weekly magazine featuring articles on current events. News magazines generally go more in-depth into stories than newspapers, trying to give the reader an understanding of the context surrounding important events, rather than just the facts. 
A newsreel was a documentary film common in the first half of the 20th century, that regularly released in a public presentation place containing filmed news stories. 
Many news organizations based in other media also distribute news online. How much they take advantage of the medium varies. Some news organizations use the web only or primarily. 
The Internet challenges traditional news organizations in several ways. They may be losing classified ads to Web sites, which are often targeted by interest instead of geography. The advertising on news web sites is sometimes insufficient to support the investment. 
Even before the Internet, technology and perhaps other factors were dividing people's attention, leading to more but narrower media outlets. 
Online journalism also leads to the spread of independent online media such as openDemocracy and the UK, Wikinews as well as allowing smaller news organizations to publish to a broad audience. 
Live online streaming journalism began on various online platforms in the late 2010s, such as youtube.com and twitch.tv (which began primarily as a live streaming platform targeting gamers, then expanding into non-gaming topics including news and political reporting and commentary). 
By covering news, politics, weather, sports, entertainment, and vital events, the daily media shape the dominant cultural, social and political picture of society. Beyond the media networks, independent news sources have evolved to report on events which escape attention or underlie the major stories.  In recent years, the blogosphere has taken reporting a step further, mining down to the experiences and perceptions of individual citizens. 
Media integrity refers to the ability of a news media outlet to serve the public interest and democratic process, making it resilient to institutional corruption within the media system, economy of influence, conflicting dependence and political clientelism. Media integrity encompasses following qualities of a media outlet: 
The concept was devised particularly for the media systems in the region of South East Europe, within the project South East European Media Observatory, gathering organisations which are part of the South East European Network for Professionalization of Media (SEENPM). 
The 27th Assembly district is located within Wisconsin's 9th Senate district, along with the 25th and 26th Assembly districts. 
The district was created in the 1972 redistricting act (1971 Wisc. Act 304) which first established the numbered district system, replacing the previous system which allocated districts to specific counties.  The 27th district  was drawn somewhat in line with the boundaries of the previous Milwaukee County 12th district (downtown Milwaukee) with the addition of northern parts of what had been the Milwaukee County 17th district (Port of Milwaukee). 
This article about a location in the state of Wisconsin is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Protoporphyrinogen IX  is an organic chemical compound which is produced along the synthesis of porphyrins, a class of critical biochemicals that include hemoglobin and chlorophyll. It is a direct precursor of protoporphyrin IX. 
The compound is a porphyrinogen, meaning that it has a non-aromatic hexahydroporphine core, which will be oxidized to a porphine core in later stages of the heme synthesis.  Like most porphyrinogens, it is colorless. 
The compound is synthesized in most organisms from coproporphyrinogen III by the enzyme coproporphyrinogen oxidase: 
The process entails conversion of two of four propionic acid groups to vinyl groups. In coproporphyrinogen III, the substituents on the pyrrole rings have the arrangement MP-MP-MP-PM, where M and P are methyl and propionic acid, respectively.  In protoporphyrinogen IX, the sequence becomes MV-MV-MP-PM, where V is vinyl. 
By the action of protoporphyrinogen oxidase, protoporphyrinogen IX is later converted into protoporphyrin IX, the first colored tetrapyrrole in the biosynthesis of hemes. 
As a young man Burnet's attention was on Whig politics; he was notorious about London for debauchery and wit. Jonathan Swift, writing of the Mohocks in 1712, said: "The bishop of Salisbury's son is said to be of the gang; they are all whigs." His reputation for debauchery caused his father much distress, although there was no permanent estrangement, and Thomas was sincerely grieved by the death of Gilbert, whom he called "the best of fathers", in 1715. 
Burnet returned to England in 1728 and was called to the bar in 1729. He prevailed upon Attorney General Philip Yorke for employment, and was successful in securing a position as Serjeant-at-Law in Easter term 1736, and King's Serjeant in May 1740. He was appointed a judge of the Court of Common Pleas in October 1741, when William Fortescue became Master of the Rolls. He was knighted in November 1745 and was a Fellow of the Royal Society. 
Burnet died unmarried, at his house in Lincoln's Inn Fields, on 8 January 1753, of gout in the stomach, and was buried near his father at St. James's Church, Clerkenwell. Some scandal was created by a clause in his will that he "lived as he trusted he should die, in the true faith of Christ as taught in the scriptures, but not in any one visible church that I know of, though I think the Church of England is as little stuffed with the inventions of men as any of them". 
and a volume of posthumous poems, 1777. He also wrote in The Grumbler, and replied to George Granville's vindication of General George Monck against Gilbert Burnet's strictures. 
The Great Depression hit the school hard, and faculty and staff often forwent paychecks to keep the school running. The end of World War II and the GI Bill saw a resurgence in enrollment and, by the mid-1960s, the "college on the hill" experienced an upswing comparable to the 1920s. Several new buildings were constructed on the campus including four dormitories, a new library, Brengle Hall, a science building, and Stinson Hall. 
Oakland City teams participate as a member of the National Christian College Athletic Association (NCCAA) and the National Association of Intercollegiate Athletics (NAIA). The Mighty Oaks were previously an NCAA Division II Independent. 
Green played and recorded with Bo Diddley until late 1964, when he married and decided to cease performing.  He died in or around 1973, according to some sources in New York City. 
The 1983 Ole Miss Rebels football team represented the University of Mississippi in the sport of American football during the 1983 NCAA Division I-A football season. It was the first year for head coach Billy Brewer. 
"The Immaculate Deflection" - Artie Crosby missed a 27-yard field goal attempt with 24 seconds left when 40 mile-per-hour winds knocked down the football before it could pass the crossbar. 
In the Serer religion, Semou Njekeh Joof is immortalized in the cult of Tagdiam. The principle shrine of Tagdiam is named after him. Tagdiam in present-day Senegal was where he lived. 
This biographical article relating to a Cuban basketball figure is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
This biographical article related to association football in Germany, about a goalkeeper, is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
In the United States and Europe, Larkin is recognized for his 1995 singles "Scatman (Ski-Ba-Bop-Ba-Dop-Bop)" and "Scatman's World". He achieved his greatest success in Japan, where his album Scatman's World (1995) sold over a million copies. Larkin was also a recipient of the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association's Annie Glenn Award for outstanding service to the stuttering community and a posthumous inductee to the National Stuttering Association Hall of Fame. 
Larkin became a professional jazz pianist in the 1970s and 80s, playing many engagements in jazz clubs around Los Angeles.[citation needed] His first known performance on a studio album was in 1981 on the album Animal Sounds by Sam Phipps. In 1986, he released the self-titled album John Larkin on the Transition label. This album was produced by John himself, along with Marcia Larkin. It featured Joe Farrell on saxophone. 
Larkin was worried that listeners would realize he stuttered, and his wife, Judy, suggested that he talk about it directly in his music. Working with dance producers Ingo Kays and Tony Catania, he recorded the first single, "Scatman (Ski-Ba-Bop-Ba-Dop-Bop)". After his first big hit, he adopted the new name and persona of "Scatman" John. 
The second Scatman John album, Everybody Jam!, was released in 1996. While nowhere near as successful on an international level as his debut, the album and accompanying single took off in Japan, the country in which he would see success on a larger scale than anywhere else in the world.[citation needed] In Europe, subsequent singles failed to replicate the chart success of his first two singles, giving him the title two-hit wonder. 
In late 1998 Larkin was diagnosed with lung cancer, but he continued his musical work despite being told to take it easy from his substantial workload. In June 1999, Larkin released his fourth and ultimately final album as Scatman John, Take Your Time. Shortly afterwards, he was sent into intensive treatment. 
Larkin died at his home in Los Angeles on December 3, 1999, at the age of 57. He was surrounded by his wife Judy, his mother Harriet, and his brother Bill. He was cremated, and in 2001 his ashes were scattered over the Pacific Ocean near Malibu, California. 
The Cabinet Secretary for Environment, Climate Change and Land Reform was a cabinet post in the Scottish Government. The Cabinet Secretary was supported by the Minister for Rural Affairs and the Natural Environment, who also reported to the Cabinet Secretary for the Rural Economy. 
The following public bodies report to the Cabinet Secretary for Environment, Climate Change and Land Reform: 
The Ministerial post was abolished in May 2016 at the beginning of the second Sturgeon government. The duties of the junior Ministerial post were upgraded to full Cabinet Secretary status at that point as the Cabinet Secretary for Environment, Climate Change and Land Reform. 
The final Cabinet Secretary for Environment, Climate Change and Land Reform was Roseanna Cunningham. 
This article about a location in Preston County, West Virginia is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
The title music of Surabhi was composed by Indian composer and classical violinist L. Subramaniam. Indian cooperative dairy giant Amul sponsored it for a long time, and the show was titled Amul Surabhi. 
During the 1990s, Surabhi had become a benchmark show and is known as "one of the best television shows ever made that reflected the length and breath of the Indian culture". Subsequently, Kak established the Surabhi Foundation with the assistance of Ford Foundation and started a project on preserving cultural artifacts. 
Neil Lowe played right-second-row, i.e. number 12, in Featherstone Rovers' 22-24 defeat by Wakefield Trinity in the 1998 First Division Grand Final at McAlpine Stadium, Huddersfield on 26 September 1998. 
The 1991 Ben Hogan Tour season was the second season of the Ben Hogan Tour, the PGA Tour's official developmental tour, now known as the Web.com Tour. The top five players on the final money list earned PGA Tour cards for 1992. 
The season ran from February 1 to October 20 and consisted of 30 events. All of the tournament names began with "Ben Hogan", e. g. "Ben Hogan Bakersfield Open"; this is eliminated here for brevity. 
This article about a Russian association football club is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Achyra nigrirenalis is a moth in the family Crambidae. It was described by George Hampson in 1913. It is found in Australia, where it has been recorded from Western Australia, the Northern Territory, Queensland and South Australia. 
Toronto Premium Outlets is an outlet mall in Halton Hills, Ontario, Canada.  Being the first Premium Outlet Center in Canada, and the first conglomeration of stores of its type in that nation, the facility opened on Thursday, August 1, 2013. It is anchored by Saks Off 5th and Restoration Hardware. 
The mall has 800,000 square feet (74,322 square meters) of shopping including the first ever Hudson's Bay Discount Store, which was replaced by Saks Off Fifth. 
The community is located between Pine City and Henriette; near the intersection of Pine County 7 and Pine County 13. 
Originally an Ojibwa village, Pokegama housed a Presbyterian Mission ran by Frederick Ayer, claiming to print the first Christian Bible in the Ojibwe language in Minnesota. 
As of 2004, Pokegama held the Minnesota state record low temperature records for March (-49 F in 1897), November (-45 F in 1896), and December (-57 F in 1898). 
This article about a location in Pine County, Minnesota is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Signaling System No. 6 (SS6) was introduced in the 1970s as an early common channel signalling method for telecommunication trunks between international switching centers (ISCs). It is specified in CCITT Recommendations Q.251-Q.300. 
The system had limited applications since at that time the predecessor systems Signaling System No. 5 (C5) and C4 were widely in use, but there was a need to experience common channel working on a fast digital basis.[citation needed] 
The CCITT 6 signalling channel was typically a 2.4 kbit/s data link. Technology at the time was an M1040 or M1020 analogue Four-wire circuit presented private circuit link. Modems were slowly beginning to exceed these data rates over 4w circuits; these data links had the advantage that there was no national tail from the ISC out to a normal end point in the country. It was often the National Section that detracted the most from the quality and reliability of such links. 
Finally it was considered possible that a mesh of such data channels could be set up between major centres, leading to a system where the link between country A and country B could perform the signalling functions for links to country A from country D for example. 
CCITT No 6 was a method developed & implemented by administrations in a limited number of countries for use in correspondent International Switching of analogue telephone calls. The next development was correspondent and non-correspondent switching of telephone calls by new operators in the countries where more sophisticated methods were required. 
The Yorba Linda Fault or Yorba Linda Trend is a fault system that extends from northeast Yorba Linda, California to the southeastern portion of the Chino Hills and Chino Hills (city), in San Bernardino County, California. 
He graduated with B.Sc from Rangoon Arts and Science University and a diploma in French from Institute of Foreign Language, Rangoon. He also attended the School of Advanced International Studies (SAIS) at Johns Hopkins University near Washington, DC as a Fulbright Scholar from 1984 to 1985. 
In 2017 president Htin Kyaw appointed him in new position, National Security Advisor. The position was created as the government faces ongoing clashes with ethnic armed groups in the country's north and east while attacks by Muslim militants with international connections sparked a large security operation in western Rakhine State. 
He became the union minister of newly formed ministry, Union Government Office Ministry in November 2017. He was appointed by president Htin Kyaw. This ministry will served the duties of the Union Government. 
After the resignation of Planning and Finance minister Kyaw Win who also the Chairman of Myanmar Investment Commission, Thaung Tun became the new chairman. President Win Myint formed the new commission with 13 members. Investment and Foreign Economic minister Thaung Tun served as chairman and Commerce minister Than Myint served as vice chairman. 
The 2011 AFL season was the Adelaide Football Club's 21st season in the AFL. Neil Craig coached from round 1 to round 18, but was replaced by Mark Bickley who coached from round 19. Nathan van Berlo was appointed captain and the leadership group consisted of Scott Stevens, Ben Rutten, Michael Doughty and Scott Thompson. 
In 2019 World Museum in Liverpool staged the first-ever exhibition of Taki Katei's work outside Japan. 
Katei's student, Ishibashi Kazunori, took a large group of drawings from the studio with him to Britain in 1904, which he sold to the Liverpool businessman, Cedric Boult and his wife, Katharine, in 1913. The couple's son, Sir Adrian Boult, donated these in 1956 to National Museums Liverpool, and some were transferred to the Royal Ontario Museum and the National Museum of Scotland. 
Elections to the United States House of Representatives in Florida were held November 5, 1878 for the 46th Congress. 
For the first few post-Reconstruction elections in Florida, the Republicans dominated Congressional elections.  The previous election was the first election in which a Democrat won on the initial results (a Republican victory was successfully contested by a Democrat after the 1870 and 1874 elections).  Going into the election, Florida's delegation was split between one Republican and one Democrat. 
As in the 1874 and 1876 elections, the results in the 2nd district were successfully contested.  This time, Horatio Bisbee, Jr. (R) successfully challenged the election of Noble A. Hull (D), and was declared with victor with a vote of 11,194 - 10,844, serving in House January 22 - March 3, 1881 
Song Ji-young (born 6 June 1996) is a South Korean handball player for SK Sugar Gliders and the South Korean national team. 
This biographical article related to South Korean team handball is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Grandma's Pet is an animated short film by Walter Lantz Productions and as part of the Oswald the Lucky Rabbit series. It is the 53rd Lantz Oswald and the 106th overall. 
One night, Oswald is reading to three kittens the story of Little Red Riding Hood. After reading his book, he falls to sleep in his bed. 
As Oswald and the doll go on walking, the wolf decided to reach the grandmother's home before them which is part of his plan. The wolf invades the house and harasses the old lady before putting her in a freezer. He then disguises himself in a nightgown and tucks himself in the bed. 
When the two little friends finally arrived at the house, the doll proceeds to the bedroom while Oswald stays near door. While the rabbit waits, a rat came to and tells him to open the freezer. Oswald opens it and was shocked to find the real grandmother trapped in a block of ice. At the bedroom, the doll eventually realizes who she's speaking to and begins to make her run as the wolf aggressively goes forth. 
In no time, the wolf got his hands on the doll and takes her basket which he finds a magic wand inside. Before Oswald could intervene, he magically sends the rabbit into a skyscraper area, dangling on two clotheslines. The wolf then teleports Oswald onto an elevated railway with an incoming train, then into the mouth of a whale, and finally in a shooting gallery with firing shooters. He and the doll (still in his grasp) were in every place Oswald was transported to, but at safer locations. 
Finding his way out of the shooters' gunfire, Oswald was able to take the wand, and teleports everybody back to the grandmother's place. When they returned to the house, the wolf, for some reason, was lying on a table unconscious. Oswald then uses the wand to transform their tormentor into a large roasted turkey. The grandmother, who is finally defrosted, came to the dining room and decides to have a meal of what's on the table. For a job well done, Oswald and the doll kissed each other. 
Morning came and Oswald wakes up from his dream. He was, however, surprised to see that what he had been kissing was a cow which sticks its head in the window. 
The cartoon is available on the Woody Woodpecker and Friends Classic Cartoon Collection DVD box set. 
Yam was born in 1998 in Herzliya, Israel. Yam grew up living on board a boat in the Herzliya marina. She was labeled an academically gifted child, and at age 14 she became a youth horse-riding champion in Israel. 
On June 6, 2016 Yam Kaspers Anshel came in second-place in Miss Israel 2016 competition, after Karin Alia. As a result, she competed in Miss Universe 2016. 
Spirou (Walloon for "squirrel, mischievous") is a Belgian comic strip character and protagonist in the comic strip series Spirou et Fantasio and Le Petit Spirou. He also serves as the mascot of the Belgian comic strip magazine Spirou. 
The character was originally created by Robert Velter (Rob-Vel) for the launch of Le journal de Spirou (Spirou magazine) in 1938. Spirou was originally an elevator operator and bell-boy at the fictional Moustique Hotel.  At some point he became a reporter for the  eponymous magazine, though he remained dressed in his trademark red uniform. 
Spirou's design was changed through the years by the various writers and artists who created his adventures but he has kept his spiky red-hair and clothes of the same colour even after ditching his hotel uniform. 
A six-year-old version of Spirou is the star of the spin-off series Le Petit Spirou, which is concerned with his tribulations at school and the anatomy of girls. This later series and its star are generally acknowledged to have little in common with the old one. 
After his defeat, Cameron worked as Commonwealth medical officer in Sydney and was High Commissioner to New Zealand from 1962 to 1965.  He was then a general practitioner in the Brisbane suburb of Nundah.  
 Andrew Norton (born 7 July 1965) is an Australian author and researcher. He was a Research Fellow at the Centre for Independent Studies, and Policy and Government Relations Adviser at the University of Melbourne. He is former director of the CIS's Liberalising Learning research programme and editor of its journal Policy. Norton  was the Program Director of Higher Education at the Grattan Institute from 2011 to 2019. 
During the 2001 election, Andrew Norton was interviewed on SBS Worldview, ABC Life Matters, and The 7:30 Report concerning his opinions on ALP's higher education funding plans. Various newspapers and magazines have published articles by Norton about his market-based approach to higher education.[citation needed] 
In 2013 he was appointed by then Minister for Education Christopher Pyne to review the previous government's decision to remove controls on the number of government-supported bachelor's degree students in Australian public universities, known as demand driven funding. His co-reviewer was David Kemp. 
The review of the demand driven system was released in April 2014. The main recommendations to keep and extend the system were accepted by the government. However the government's legislation, which also included deregulation undergraduate fees, was twice defeated in the Australian Senate. 
  A by-election for the seat of Canterbury in the New South Wales Legislative Assembly was held on 12 November 2016. The by-election was triggered by the resignation of Labor MP and former interim Labor leader Linda Burney on 6 May to contest the division of Barton at the 2016 federal election. 
In its second incarnation from 1927, the electoral district of Canterbury has been held by the Labor Party, excepting between 1932 and 1935 when Edward Hocking held the seat for the United Australia Party following the Lang dismissal crisis. 
St. Stanislaus Kostka Parish is a former parish in Waterbury, Connecticut, United States, originally designated for Polish immigrants. 
Founded on January 30, 1913. It is one of the Polish-American Roman Catholic parishes in New England in the Archdiocese of Hartford. In 2017, the parish was merged with Saint Anne Church in the south end to form All Saints Parish. The building was closed for regularly scheduled worship, and subsequently sold to a Pentecostal church. 
On July 7, 1912, Bishop John Joseph Nilan appointed Fr. Ignatius Maciejewski as administrator of a Polish parish in Waterbury. The priest soon celebrated the first parish Mass in the chapel of Our Lady of Lourdes Church, which the Polish immigrants had rented.  
St. Stanislaus Kostka Parish became legally founded on January 30, 1913. Land on East Farm Street was purchased from the Immaculate Conception parish for a church. On August 13, 1914, Bishop John Joseph Nilan named Fr. Theodore Zimmerman first resident pastor.  
The gray granite foundation having been laid, the church cornerstone was blessed on September 14, 1914. The first Mass was celebrated in the completed edifice on October 24, 1915. The completed church superstructure was dedicated on September 26, 1926. 
This article about a Catholic Church in the United States church building is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A small river flows from the entrance of the village. The existing school is no longer operating. The Central Church of the village is dedicated to the Prophet Elias. 
The village is famous for its beautiful square with tall plane trees . Also near the village there is a chapel dedicated to Saint Paisios of Mount Athos. 
Fantasy Book Review stated "In a change from the traditional sword and sorcery based FF books, this sci-fi romp has dispensed with Gold Pieces, Potions and Items and replaced them with Hero Points and Clues...While this is not the best FF book that Steve Jackson ever wrote it is an excellent gamebook..." 
Aerolite is a urea-formaldehyde gap filling adhesive which is water- and heat-resistant. It is used in large quantities by the chipboard industry and also by wooden boat builders for its high strength and durability. It is also used in joinery, veneering and general woodwork assembly. Aerolite has also been used for wooden aircraft construction, and a properly made Aerolite joint is said to be three times stronger than spruce wood. 
When World War II broke out, the small company began to grow.  Morris Motors used Aerolite and Aero Research's strip heating process to assemble Airspeed Horsa gliders, as did de Havilland on its Mosquito, as well as on other aircraft and also naval launches and patrol boats. On the Mosquito, Aerolite soon replaced the original "Beetle Cement" (known as "Kaurit" in Germany) synthetic resin adhesive used, after this glue was found not to stand up to the hot and humid climate in the Far East. 
Following the end of the war, in 1948 de Bruyne sold control of Aero Research to the Swiss company Ciba, but remained as managing director until 1960. 
Taylor Springs is a village in Montgomery County, Illinois, United States. The population was 690 at the 2010 census. 
As of the census of 2000, there were 583 people, 250 households, and 162 families residing in the village. The population density was 677.1 people per square mile (261.7/km2). There were 264 housing units at an average density of 306.6 per square mile (118.5/km2). The racial makeup of the village was 98.80% White, 0.17% Native American, 0.69% from other races, and 0.34% from two or more races. Hispanic or Latino of any race were 1.03% of the population. 
There were 250 households, out of which 31.2% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 52.4% were married couples living together, 9.2% had a female householder with no husband present, and 34.8% were non-families. 31.2% of all households were made up of individuals, and 13.2% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.33 and the average family size was 2.91. 
In the village, the population was spread out, with 24.7% under the age of 18, 7.5% from 18 to 24, 29.2% from 25 to 44, 22.0% from 45 to 64, and 16.6% who were 65 years of age or older. The median age was 39 years. For every 100 females, there were 107.5 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 99.5 males. 
The median income for a household in the village was $29,773, and the median income for a family was $35,000. Males had a median income of $37,361 versus $18,056 for females. The per capita income for the village was $14,279. About 3.8% of families and 9.1% of the population were below the poverty line, including 5.4% of those under age 18 and 15.1% of those age 65 or over. 
Bobsleigh at the 2022 Winter Olympics will be held at the Xiaohaituo Bobsleigh and Luge Track which is one of the Yanqing cluster venues. A total of four bobsleigh events will be held, between 4 and 20 February 2022. 
In July 2018, the International Olympic Committee (IOC) officially added the women's monobob event to the program, increasing the total number of events to four. 
A maximum of 170 quota spots will be available to athletes to compete at the games (124 men and 46 women). The qualification is base on the world rankings of 16 January 2022. 
All times are in local time (UTC+8), according to the official schedule correct as of March 2021. This schedule may be subject to change in due time. 
Da Silva won three victories at World Cup competitions (1985, 1989, and 1992) over 200 m. He set two South American records over 100 metres and five over 200 m. In 1989, he was ranked No. 1 in the world with a time of 19.96 s over 200 m. His personal best of 10.00 makes him the fastest South American in history.[citation needed] 
Regarding performance-enhancing drugs, Da Silva has stated he decided "not to take [them] and lose because it was a matter of character [and] dignity". 
The aircraft involved was a seven-year-old DC-9-14, which had been delivered to Avensa from McDonnell Douglas in 1967. 
Venezuelan authorities and the United States National Transportation Safety Board (NTSB) investigated the accident. 
The cause of the accident was determined as an engine failure. The cause for the engine failure and loss of control was not determined. 
Paris City Vision is a tour operator in Paris and other parts of France. Founded in 1929 as Paris Vision, the company is one of the oldest professional tourism businesses in Paris. 
Paris changed its commercial name to become Paris City Vision after its merger with Cityrama  in 2010. 
The CityVision group is also a shareholder in Paris City Vision La Marina, which owns boat restaurants on the River Seine. 
Paris City Vision was created through successive mergers of different activities: tour bus and minibus excursions and cruises on the Seine. 
Localers is a walking tours specialist that was founded in 2012 and joined the CityVision Group in 2016. 
There are also 2 night-clubs adjacent including 'Kube', which has regular live music from respected dj's. 
An outdoor skate-park had been added underneath the raised road, which included a half-pipe and a funbox, although they often became waterlogged in heavy rain. This was demolished in 2008 and rebuilt in 2009 by Freestyle, thanks to local grants and the Youth Capital Fund. It was re-located adjacent to the main Playground within the Castle Grounds, replacing one of several Tennis Courts. 
This article includes a list of U.S. states sorted by birth and death rate, expressed per 1,000 inhabitants, for 2018, using the most recent data available from the U.S. National Center for Health Statistics. 
Paris (foaled 1803) was a British Thoroughbred racehorse. In a career that lasted from April 1806 to April 1808, he ran fourteen times and won seven races. In 1806 he won the Derby on his third racecourse appearance shortly after being sold by his breeder. Paris stayed in training for two more years and had some success in match races. His racing career was ended by an injury at Newmarket Racecourse in 1808, after which he was retired to stud where he proved a to be a complete failure. 
Paris was a brown horse bred by his first owner Sir Frank Standish.  Paris's sire, Sir Peter Teazle (or simply "Sir Peter") won the Epsom Derby in 1787 and became the most successful stallion of the time, winning the title of Champion sire on ten occasions between 1799 and 1809. Paris was the last foal of Horatia, a highly successful broodmare, who had previously produced the Derby winner Archduke and the double Doncaster Cup winner Stamford, both sired by Sir Peter. 
In late summer, Paris was sent on an unsuccessful journey to York. On 24 August he started 1/2 favourite for a Sweepstakes over four miles but finished last of the five runners behind Thorn. Two days later he ran in a three-mile Sweepstakes for four-year-olds against Thorn, Smuggler and the St Leger winner Fyldener, who was made 7/4 favourite. Paris started at odds of 6/1 and finished second to Smuggler. 
On his return to Newmarket, Paris started favourite for a Subscription race on 29 September and finished second to the Duke of Grafton's filly Vanity. 
Paris stayed in training as a five-year-old, but his season was restricted to a single race. On 18 April at Newmarket, he broke down injured in a 500 guinea match against the Derby runner-up Trafalgar. He did not race again and was withdrawn from matches against Canopus in April and Smuggler in May. 
Paris was never advertised as a stallion in the Racing Calendar, and appears to have made no impact whatsoever as a sire. According to the General Stud Book he sired only two known foals, fillies born in 1810 (out of Venom) and 1812 (out of Roxana). 
Erandio is a town and municipality located in the province of Biscay, in the autonomous community of Basque Country, northern Spain. The name comes from euskera ARANDIO that means plum plantation or field. 
In 1415, during the War of the Bands, the corregidor, the royally-appointed governor of the Biscayan hermandad, acting on royal orders, siphoned off Biscayan wheat to the Asturias, inciting a rebellion. The Biscayans were defeated at Erandio with the loss of sixty men and the wheat transfers continued. 
Several annual festivals are celebrated in Erandio. Most of them are fiestas patronales (patronage festivals, held in the days around the date dedicated to the patron saints under whose advocation churches and hermits are). The local public holiday of the municipality rotates yearly on August 10, August 28 and the corpus Christi day. 
Erandio has also celebrated a street music festival called Musikale, with music bands marching and playing in the neighbourhoods of Altzaga and Astrabudua. Musikale was originally conceived in the neighbouring municipality of Leioa. For some years it was held simultaneously in Leioa, Erandio, Basauri and Sestao, but the other municipalities dropped it, and in 2013 only Erandio organised it. 
Erandio is connected to other municipalities of Biscay (like Barakaldo, Bermeo, Bilbao, Derio, Getxo, Larrabetzu, Laukiz, Leioa, Mungia and Muskiz) by Bizkaibus bus services  and by Line 1 of Metro Bilbao, which has three stations in Erandio (Lutxana, Erandio, and Astrabudua). It is also connected to Barakaldo by regular fluvial transport over the Estuary of Bilbao. 
McAlister was born on March 1, 1928, in Lynchburg, Virginia. He died at age 80 on November 23, 2008, in Katy, Texas.  He was survived by his wife, Patty Neal Hunter McAlister, three daughters and three step-children. McAlister was the grandfather of eleven and the great-grandfather of three. 
The narK RNA motif is a conserved RNA structure that was discovered by bioinformatics. narK motif RNAs are found in Beta- and Gammaproteobacteria. 
Valle de Zaragoza  is one of the 67 municipalities of Chihuahua, in northern Mexico. The municipal seat lies at Valle de Zaragoza.  
As of 2010, the town of Valle de Zaragoza had a population of 2,223. Other than the town of Valle de Zaragoza, the municipality had 156 localities, none of which had a population over 1,000. 
This article about a location in the Mexican state of Chihuahua is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
A stage version of Dangerous Lady opened at the Theatre Royal Stratford East, London, her third to be presented at the Royal Stratford, to positive reviews. The play ran from Friday 19 October 2012 - Saturday 17 November 2012. 
Samaraweera is a surname of Sinhalese origin and primarily used in Sri Lanka, but is also used in southern India and Housewives. It may refer to: 
This biographical article related to a Brazilian association football defender born in the 1990s is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.
Having finished the thirty-volume Carl Barks Library, Another Rainbow Publishing is no longer an active publisher, although they still sell previously published works. 
Another Rainbow Publishing also produced and issued the award-winning book The Fine Art of Walt Disney's Donald Duck by Carl Barks, a comprehensive collection of the Disney duck paintings of this artist and storyteller. Not long after, the company began producing fine art lithographs of many of these paintings, in strictly limited editions, all signed by Barks, who eventually produced many original works for the series. 
In 2001, all of these figurines were destroyed due to a licensing disagreement with the new management at the Walt Disney Company. 
Bruce Hamilton, co-founder, and driving force behind Another Rainbow Publishing, died on June 20, 2005, after a long illness. 
This article is a list of Super Bowl commercials, that is, commercials that aired on the television  network during the broadcast of the Super Bowl. In 2010, Nielsen reported that 51% of viewers prefer the commercials to the game itself. This does not include advertisements towards a local region or network (e.g. promoting local news shows), pre-kickoff and post-game commercials/sponsors, or in-game advertising sponsors and television bumpers. 
The commercials included ads from "Ford, Chrysler, RCA, RJ Reynolds Tobacco, McDonald's, Budweiser, among others." 
This year was known for its many commercials for websites, with 17 websites posing commercials. Many became defunct after the "dot-com Bowl". 
The Black Andrew Nature Reserve is a protected nature reserve located on the south west slopes of New South Wales, Australia. The 1,559-hectare (3,850-acre) reserve is situated on the southern shore of Burrinjuck Dam on the Murrumbidgee River, an important reservoir for the Murrumbidgee Irrigation Area. 
The reserve was created in 2001 and is managed by the New South Wales National Parks and Wildlife Service under the provisions of the Southern Regional Forest Agreement (SRFA). Prior to creation of the reserve, it was Crown land and was managed by the then-New South Wales Department of Land and Water Conservation. 
Three amphibian species, 16 reptile species, 29 mammal species and 83 bird species have been observed in the reserve. Of the mammal species, 11 are bats and 5 are non-native. 
The Australian anchor plant (Discaria pubescens), yellow-bellied glider (Petaurus australis), common bent-wing bat (Miniopterus schreibersii), powerful owl (Ninox strenua), barking owl (Ninox connivens), brown treecreeper (Climacteris picumnus) and booroolong frog (Litoria booroolongensis) are all identified as vulnerable species in the Threatened Species Conservation Act 1995. 
Anton R. Valukas (born 1943) is an American attorney who served as the United States Attorney for the Northern District of Illinois from 1985 to 1989. In 2007, he became the chairman of Jenner & Block. He was later appointed bankruptcy examiner during the bankruptcy of Lehman Brothers. 
Valukas is the son of Anton J. Valukas, a former Illinois Circuit Court judge. His grandfather, Anton Kasmir, migrated to the United States from Lithuania. He attended Lawrence University, graduating in 1965, and Northwestern University School of Law, graduating in 1968. He was admitted to the bar of Illinois in 1968. 
Valukas became an Assistant United States Attorney in 1970. In 1974, he became Chief of the Special Prosecutions Division of the United States Department of Justice. Then, in 1975-76, he served as First Assistant United States Attorney. In addition to his duties at the Department of Justice, from 1972 to 1976, Valukas was an instructor at the John Marshall Law School. 
A Republican, Valukas left the DOJ in 1976 when Jimmy Carter assumed office as President of the United States. Valukas joined Jenner & Block as a partner at this time. He also served as an adjunct professor at the Northwestern University School of Law from 1980 to 1982. 
In 1985, President Ronald Reagan appointed Valukas as United States Attorney for the Northern District of Illinois. The most notable event of Valukas' four-year term as United States Attorney was Operation Greylord, an investigation into judicial corruption in Cook County, Illinois that ultimately resulted in the indictment of 92 people, including 17 judges. 
At the end of his term as United States Attorney, in 1989, Valukas returned to Jenner & Block. There, his practice has focused on white collar criminal defense. He also tutored three young men from Chicago's projects, all of whom earned college degrees. 
In 2009, Valukas was appointed bankruptcy examiner in the bankruptcy of Lehman Brothers. His Examiner's report was released to the public in March 2010. 
Recently,[when?] he enquired into and submitted a report on General Motor Company's safety record.[citation needed] 
The University of Georgia (UGA or Georgia) is a public land-grant research university with its main campus in Athens, Georgia. Founded in 1785, it is one of the oldest public universities in the United States. The flagship of the University System of Georgia, it has been classified as a Public Ivy, a public institution which offers an academic experience equivalent to an Ivy League university. 
In June 1961, Holmes and Hunter were joined by another African American, Mary Frances Early, who transferred to the school as a graduate student. Before Holmes and Hunter, Early became the first African American to graduate from UGA in 1962. The College of Education later established a professorship in her honor.  In February 2020, the UGA College of Education was officially named in honor of Mary Frances Early. 
The university has seventeen schools and colleges, the titles "college" or "school" not indicating any distinction between them for the university. In addition to the colleges and schools, the university is home to the University of Georgia/Medical College of Georgia Medical Partnership that provides education leading to the Doctor of Medicine (M.D.) degree from the University of Georgia as well as extensive facilities for medically related education and research at the University of Georgia. 
The President of the University of Georgia (Jere Morehead) is the head administrator and is appointed and overseen by the Georgia Board of Regents. University of Georgia has had 22 presidents since its founding in 1785. Each individual college and school is headed by a dean. The university has a student-to-faculty ratio of 17 students per faculty member. 
The main campus is traditionally divided into five sections, North, South, Central, East and West Campuses. The university has academic, research, residential, dining, and athletic facilities spread throughout the campus and on several off-campus facilities. 
Located south of the Ramsey Center, the University Health Center provides health services to the university's student and faculty with a staff of more than 200 health professionals. 
The university's year-round residential study-abroad program is held at Trinity College of Oxford University in England, where students and faculty study, learn and teach at Trinity College and live in a three-story Victorian house near the heart of the city. 
The 56-acre UGA Health Sciences Campus has an extensive landscaped green space with more than 400 trees and several historic buildings. The nearly 63,000 square-feet of building space on the new Health Sciences Campus include classrooms, rooms for small group and clinical skills teaching, lab space for gross anatomy, pathology and histology, a medical library, and faculty offices. The Medical Partnership administration is housed in Winnie Davis Hall which was built in 1902. 
The basketball, volleyball, and gymnastics teams also have a practice facility in the adjacent Coliseum Training Facility. Stegeman Coliseum was the venue for the 1996 Summer Olympics Volleyball and Rhythmic Gymnastics, 
A large black marble Olympics Monument on the west lawn of Stegeman Coliseum, erected in preparation for the 1996 Summer Olympics, commemorates the more than 115 UGA students who participated in the Olympics, including Forrest "Spec" Towns. The Spec Towns Track located nearby was constructed in 1964 and is home to UGA's track and field teams. 
The Dan Magill Tennis Complex, located south of Stegeman Coliseum, includes sixteen tennis courts with seating for a total of about 5,000 spectators. 
UGA also has its own University Golf Course that is a par 71 Robert Trent Jones designed golf course that is regarded as one of the best university courses in the United States. 
The overall average high school GPA of all enrolled first-year students was 4.07, first year students had taken an average of eight high school advanced placement courses, and more than 97% were in their school's "advanced" or "most difficult" curriculum. 
The average SAT score for all admitted first-year students was 1400 out of 1600 (in the top five percent nationally), and the average ACT Composite score was 31 (in the "highly selective" category - also in top five percent nationally). For honors students, the average SAT score was 1530 out of 1600 and the average ACT Composite score was 34, both being in top 99th percentile nationally. 
In 2019, the university was tied for with Harvard and Columbia in U.S. News & World Report's rankings of "Best National Universities for Undergraduate Teaching." In keeping with the teaching portion of its motto, the university has a student-to-faculty ratio of 17 students per faculty member, and 46 percent of its classes have fewer than 20 students. 
The University of Georgia's Office of International Education offers numerous study abroad destinations for a wide array of majors and areas of study. Destinations include, for example, Argentina, Belize, Brazil, Antarctica, Canada, China, Croatia, Czech Republic, Costa Rica, Ireland, Japan, South Korea, India, Finland, France, Germany, Ghana, Italy, New Zealand, Mexico, Poland, Puerto Rico, Russia, the Netherlands, Spain, South Africa, Tanzania, Turkey, and the United Kingdom. 
The university began its first year-round residential study-abroad program at Trinity College of Oxford University in England, where students and faculty live in a three-story Victorian house owned by UGA and located in the heart of the city of Oxford. Founded in 1987, the UGA at Oxford program began as a summer option and expanded to include spring in 1994. With the purchase of the house in 1999, the program became available throughout the academic year. 
In 2019, the Association of American Medical Colleges ranked UGA 11th in the U.S. among undergraduate 